UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
Form 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
    
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021
or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from              to             
Commission File Number: 001-35480
Enphase Energy , Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 20-4645388
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
47281 Bayside Parkway
Fremont, CA 94538
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(877) 774-7000
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class: Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, $0.00001 par value per share ENPH Nasdaq Global Market
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☒  No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐  No ☒
Indicate by check mark  whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports),
and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒  No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant
to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant
was required to submit such files).  Yes x  No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting
company , or an emerging growth company . See definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company ,”
and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company , indicate by checkmark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its manage ment’ s assessment of the effectiveness
of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public
accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐  No ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-af filiates of the registrant on June 30, 2021, based upon the closing price of
$183.63 of the registrant’ s common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Market, was approximately $ 19.4 billion.
As of February 7, 2022, there were 133,935,574  shares of the registrant’ s common stock outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the registran t’s Proxy Statement for the 2022 Annual Meeting of Stockholders to be filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission within 120 days after the end of the registrant’ s fiscal year ended December 31, 2021 are incorporated by reference into Part
III of this Annual Report on Form 10-K .
Enphase Energy, Inc.
Table of Contents
Page
PART I
Item 1. Business 6
Item 1A. Risk Factors 15
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 48
Item 2. Properties 49
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 49
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 50
PART II
Item 5. Market for the Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 51
Item 6. [Reserved] 52
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 53
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 68
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 70
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 132
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 132
Item 9B. Other Information 132
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 132
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 133
Item 11. Executive Compensation 133
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 133
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 133
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 133
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 134
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 138
Signatures
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains “forward-looking statements” as defined under securities laws. Forward-
looking statements include statements that are not historical facts and can be identified by terms such as “anticipates,”
“believes,” “could,” “seeks,” “estimates,” “expects,” “intends,” “may,” “plans,” “potential,” “predicts, “projects,” “should,” “will,”
“would” or similar expressions and the negatives of those terms. These forward-looking statements are contained principally
in Item 1, Business; Item 1A, Risk Factors; Item 7, Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations; and other sections of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our actual results or experience could differ
significantly from the forward-looking statements. Factors that could cause or contribute to these differences include those
discussed in Item 1A, Risk Factors, as well as those discussed elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Forward-looking statements are inherently uncertain, and you should not place undue reliance on these statements,
which speak only as of the date that they were made. These cautionary statements should be considered in connection with
any written or oral forward-looking statements that we may issue in the future. We do not undertake any obligation to
release publicly any revisions to these forward-looking statements after completion of the filing of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K to reflect later events or circumstances or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
In this report, unless otherwise indicated or the context otherwise requires, “Enphase Energy,” “Enphase,” “the
Company,” “we,” “us,” and “our” refer to Enphase Energy, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and its subsidiaries.
Risk Factors Summary
Below is a summary of material factors that make an investment in our securities speculative or risky. Importantly, this
summary does not address all of the risks and uncertainties that we face. Additional discussion of the risks and
uncertainties summarized in this risk factor summary, as well as other risks and uncertainties that we face, can be found
under “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A of this Annual Report on Form 10‑K. The below summary is qualified in its entirety by
that more complete discussion of such risks and uncertainties. You should consider carefully the risks and uncertainties
described under “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A of this Annual Report on Form 10‑K as part of your evaluation of an
investment in our securities:
•The reduction, elimination or expiration of government subsidies and economic incentives for on-grid solar
electricity applications could reduce demand for solar PV systems and harm our business.
•If demand for solar energy solutions does not grow or grows at a slower rate than we anticipate, including as a
result of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, our business will suffer.
•The rapidly changing solar industry makes it difficult to evaluate our current business and future prospects.
•We depend on limited-source suppliers for key components and products. If we are unable to source these
components and products on a timely basis, we will not be able to deliver our products to our customers.
•Our business has been affected by, is currently being adversely affected and could be materially and adversely
affected in the future by the current impacts and evolving effects of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. The COVID-
19 pandemic may continue to, and other actual or threatened epidemics, pandemics, outbreaks, or public health
crises may in the future, adversely affect our and our customers’ results of operations and financial condition, our
supply chain and our business.
•We depend upon a small number of outside contract manufacturers, and our business and operations could be
disrupted if we encounter problems with these contract manufacturers.
•If we or our contract manufacturers are unable to obtain raw materials in a timely manner or if the price of raw
materials increases significantly, production time and product costs could increase, which may adversely affect our
business.
•Manufacturing problems could result in delays in product shipments, which would adversely affect our revenue,
competitive position and reputation.
•We rely primarily on distributors, installers and providers of solar financing to assist in selling our products to
customers, and the failure of these customers to perform at the expected level, or at all, would have an adverse
effect on our business, financial condition and results of our operations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 4
•The loss of, or events affecting, one of our major customers could reduce our sales and have an adverse effect on
our business, financial condition and results of operations.
•Our energy systems, including our storage solution, integrated AC Module, IQ8 solar microinverters and
Ensemble technology, may not achieve broader market acceptance, which would prevent us from increasing our
revenue and market share.
•If we fail to retain our key personnel or if we fail to attract additional qualified personnel, we may not be able to
achieve our anticipated level of growth and our business could suffer.
•Any failure by management to properly manage growth could have a material adverse effect on our business,
operating results, and financial condition.
•We are dependent on information technology systems, infrastructure and data. We could be subject to breaches of
our information technology systems caused by system security risks, failure of our data protection, cyber-attacks,
and erroneous or non-malicious actions or failures to act by our employees or others with authorized access to our
networks, which could cause significant reputational, legal and financial damages.
•We are subject to stringent privacy laws, information security policies and contractual obligations governing the use,
processing and transfer of personal information and any unauthorized access to, or disclosure or theft of personal
information we gather, store or use could harm our reputation and subject us to claims or litigation.
•We may be subject to disruptions or failures in information technology systems and network infrastructures that
could have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition.
•Changes in the U.S. trade environment, including the recent imposition of import tariffs, could adversely affect the
amount or timing of our revenues, results of operations or cash flows.
•Our significant international operations subject us to additional risks that could adversely affect our business,
results of operations and financial condition.
•Our gross profit may fluctuate over time, which could impair our ability to achieve or maintain profitability.
•We are under continuous pressure to reduce the prices of our products, which has adversely affected, and may
continue to adversely affect, our gross margins.
•If we do not forecast demand for our products accurately, we may experience product shortages, delays in product
shipment, excess product inventory, difficulties in planning expenses or disputes with suppliers, any of which will
adversely affect our business and financial condition.
•Our focus on a limited number of specific markets increases risks associated with the modification, elimination or
expiration of governmental subsidies and economic incentives for on-grid solar electricity applications.
•We may fail to realize some or all of the anticipated benefits of the SunPower transaction which may result in
conflicts between us and SunPower.
•As part of growing our business, we have made and expect to continue to make acquisitions. If we fail to
successfully select, execute or integrate our acquisitions, then our business and operating results could be harmed
and our stock price could decline.
•We invest in companies for both strategic and financial reasons but may not realize a return on our investments.
•An impairment in the carrying value of goodwill or other intangible and long-lived assets could negatively affect our
operating results.
•Conversion of our Convertible Notes may dilute the ownership interest of existing stockholders or may otherwise
depress the price of our common stock, adversely affect our financial condition and operating results.
•The market price of our common stock may be volatile or may decline regardless of our operating performance.TM
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 5
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1.    Business
Our Company
We are a global energy technology company. We deliver smart, easy-to-use solutions that manage solar generation,
storage and communication on one platform. We revolutionized the solar industry with our microinverter technology and we
produce a fully integrated solar-plus-storage solution. To date, we have shipped more than 42 million microinverters, and
approximately 1.9 million Enphase residential and commercial systems have been deployed in more than 130 countries.
COVID-19 Update
We are actively monitoring, evaluating, and responding to developments relating to the COVID-19 pandemic, which
has resulted in, and is expected to continue to result in substantial manufacturing or supply chain problems, disruptions in
local and global economies, volatility in the global financial markets, overall reductions in demand, delays in payment,
restrictions on the shipment of our products, or other ramifications. The extent of the impact of COVID-19 on our operational
and financial performance will depend on further developments, including the duration and spread of the virus and its
variants, impact on our end-customers’ spending, volume of sales, impact on our partners, suppliers, and employees and
actions that may be taken by governmental authorities. The global supply chain and the semiconductor industry are
experiencing challenges. We have seen supply chain challenges and logistics constraints increase, including component
shortages, which have, in certain cases, caused delays in critical components and inventory and have resulted in increased
costs. We continue to work to minimize the effects from supply chain constraints. Given the dynamic nature of these
circumstances, the full impact of COVID-19 and other macroeconomic factors on our ongoing business, results of
operations and overall financial performance cannot be reasonably estimated at this time. Further information relating to the
risks and uncertainties related to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic may be found in Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Industry Background
Historically, traditional central inverters were the only inverter technology used for solar photovoltaic (“PV”)
installations. In an installation consisting of a traditional central inverter, the solar PV modules are connected in series
strings. In a large installation, there are multiple series strings connected in parallel. The aggregated voltage from each of
these strings is then fed into a large central inverter. We believe that traditional central inverters have a number of design
and performance challenges limiting innovation and their ability to reduce the cost of solar power systems, including the
following:
•Productivity limits. If solar modules are wired using a traditional central inverter—group or “string” of modules are
wired in series, and an entire string’s output is limited by the output of the lowest-performing module. Because of
its string design, there is a single point of failure risk with the traditional central inverter approach.
•Reliability issues. Traditional central inverters are the single most common component of solar installations to fail,
resulting in system downtime and adversely impacting total energy output. As a result, central inverters typically
carry warranties of only 5 to 10 years.
•Complex design and installation requirements. The central inverter-based solar PV installation requires greater
effort on the part of the installer, both in terms of design and on-site labor. Central inverter installations require
string design and calculations for safe and reliable operation, as well as specialized equipment such as direct
current (“DC”) combiners, conduits and disconnects. In addition, the use of high-voltage DC requires specialized
knowledge and training and safety precautions to install central inverter technology.
•Lack of monitoring. The majority of solar installations with central inverter technology offer limited monitoring
capabilities. If a module in a central inverter system fails or is not performing to specification, the resulting loss of
energy can go unnoticed for an extended period of time.
•Safety issues. Central inverter solar PV installations have a wide distribution of high-voltage (600 volts to 1,000
volts) DC wiring. If damaged, DC wires can generate sustained electrical arcs, reaching temperatures of more
than 5,000 °F. This creates the risk of fire for solar PV installation owners and injury for installers and
maintenance personnel.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 6
Table of Contents
These challenges of traditional central inverters have a direct impact on the cost and expected return on investment
of solar installations to both installers and system owners:
•Installer. Solar PV installers aim for simple installation design, fast installation times and maximum system
performance and predictability. The installation of high-voltage DC central inverter technology, however, requires
significant preparation, precautionary safety measures, time-consuming string calculations, extensive design
expertise and specialized installation equipment, training and knowledge. Together, these factors significantly
increase complexity and cost of installation and limit overall productivity for the installer.
•System owner. Solar power system owners aim for high energy production, low cost, high reliability, and low
maintenance requirements, as well as reduced fire risks. With traditional central inverters, owners often are
unable to optimize the size or shape of their solar PV installations due to string design limitations. As such, they
experience performance loss from shading and other obstructions, can face frequent system failures and lack the
ability to effectively monitor the performance of their solar PV installation. In addition, central inverter installations
operate at high-voltage DC which bears significant fire risks. Further, due to their large size, central inverter
installations can affect architectural aesthetics of the house or commercial building.
The solar industry is transitioning from solar only systems to complete energy management solutions, which consist
of solar-plus storage and load control.
Our Products
We design, develop, manufacture and sell home energy solutions that manage energy generation, energy storage
and control and communications on one intelligent platform. We have revolutionized the solar industry by bringing a
systems approach to solar technology and by pioneering a semiconductor-based microinverter that converts energy at the
individual solar module level and, combined with our proprietary networking and software technologies, provides advanced
energy monitoring and control. This is vastly different than a central inverter system using string modules, with or without an
optimizer, approach that only converts energy of the entire array of solar modules from a single high voltage electrical unit
and lacks intelligence about the energy producing capacity of the solar array. The Enphase Energy System, powered by
IQ™ Microinverters and IQ™ Batteries, our current generation integrated solar, storage, and energy management offering,
enables self-consumption and delivers our core value proposition of yielding more energy, simplifying design and
installation, and improving system uptime and reliability. The IQ family of microinverters, like all of our previous
microinverters, is fully compliant with NEC 2014 and 2017 rapid shutdown requirements. Unlike string inverters, this
capability is built-in, with no additional equipment necessary.
The Enphase Energy System brings a high technology, networked approach to solar generation plus energy storage,
by leveraging our design expertise across power electronics, semiconductors and cloud-based software technologies. Our
integrated approach to energy solutions maximizes a home’s energy potential while providing advanced monitoring and
remote maintenance capabilities. The Enphase Energy System with IQ uses a single technology platform for seamless
management of the whole solution, enabling rapid commissioning with the Enphase Installer App™; consumption
monitoring with Enphase IQ Gateway™ with IQ Combiner+™, Enphase App™, a cloud-based energy management
platform, and our IQ Battery™. System owners can use the Enphase App to monitor their home’s solar generation, energy
storage and consumption from any web-enabled device. Unlike some of our competitors, who utilize a traditional inverter, or
offer separate components of solutions, we have built-in system redundancy in both PV generation and energy storage,
eliminating the risk that comes with a single-point of failure. Further, the nature of our cloud-based, monitored system allows
for remote firmware and software updates, enabling cost-effective remote maintenance and ongoing utility compliance.
The Enphase IQ7™ microinverter and Enphase IQ7+™ microinverter, part of our seventh-generation IQ product
family, support high-powered 60-cell and 72-cell solar modules and integrate with alternating current (“AC”) modules. Our
IQ7X™ microinverter addresses 96-cell PV modules up to 400W DC and with its 97.5% California Energy Commission
(“CEC”) efficiency rating, is ideal for integration into high power modules.
During 2020, we started shipping our IQ7A™ for high-power monofacial and bifacial solar modules to customers in
Australia and Europe. Our IQ7A microinverters, which began shipping to customers in North America in November 2019,
support up to 450W high-power modules, targeting high-power residential and commercial applications. Our customers will
be able to pair the IQ7A microinverter with monofacial or bifacial solar modules, up
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 7
Table of Contents
to 450 W, from solar module manufacturers who are expected to introduce high-power variants of their products in the next
three years.
AC Module (“ACM”) products are integrated systems which allow installers to be more competitive through improved
logistics, reduced installation times, faster inspection and training. We continue to make steady progress with our ACM
partners, including SunPower Corporation, Panasonic Corporation of North America, LONGi Solar, Solaria Corporation,
Hanwha Q CELLS, and Maxeon Solar Technologies, Sonnenstromfabrik (CS Wismar GmBH), and DMEGC Solar.
We introduced our Enphase IQ Battery storage systems, with usable and scalable capacity of 10.1 kWh and 3.4 kWh,
based on Ensemble OS™ energy management technology, which powers the world’s first grid-independent microinverter-
based storage system to customers in North America during the second quarter of 2020. The Enphase IQ™ Battery storage
systems feature Enphase embedded grid-forming microinverters that enable the Always-On capability that keeps homes
powered when the grid goes down, and the ability to save money when the grid is up. These systems are now compatible
with both new and existing Enphase IQ solar systems with M-series™, IQ6™ and IQ7™ microinverters. In January 2021,
we announced expanded compatibility of the Enphase Energy System with our M-series microinverters and string inverters.
The expanded compatibility provides approximately 300,000 additional Enphase system owners with the possibility of
achieving grid-agnostic energy resilience through the Enphase Upgrade Program. The program provides solar installers the
opportunity to renew engagements with the installed base of Enphase system owners through microinverter, solar, and
energy storage upgrades, and reflects our continued commitment to reliability, service, and long-term customer
relationships.
We started production shipments of Enphase IQ Batteries to customers in North America during the second quarter of
2020, to customers in Germany during the second quarter of 2021, and to customers in Belgium in October 2021.
During the second quarter of 2021, we introduced Load Control for our Enphase IQ Battery storage systems. Load
control allows homeowners to decide what gets power in their home in the event of a grid outage, with the ability to choose
up to four loads. These loads will be on when the grid is present and shed automatically in the event of a grid failure. We
began shipping our IQ Load Controller™, which includes updated features, in December 2021. This product will make
installation simpler and save time for installers
On October 21, 2021, we announced that our home energy systems will soon integrate with most leading models of
home standby AC generators, providing enhanced performance and a glitch-free transition for homeowners during power
outages. Homeowners can also monitor real-time power flow, start and stop their generator remotely, set quiet hours to
prevent their generator from operating until their batteries fall below a designated threshold, and control it all with the
Enphase App. The new feature functions without a generator automatic transfer switch and eliminates the power glitches
that reset home electronic appliances when switching to generator power.
On October 25, 2021, we announced our Enphase Energy System with IQ8™ solar microinverters for customers in
North America and started shipping IQ8 products in the fourth quarter of 2021. Our investment in custom application
specific integrated circuit (ASIC) chips has resulted in a software-defined microinverter smart enough to form a microgrid, a
self-sufficient energy system that serves a discrete geographic footprint. Many homeowners often assume that their solar
systems will function if the sun is shining, even during a utility outage. This has unfortunately not been true until the
introduction of IQ8. Now, with IQ8 homeowners can realize the true promise of solar — to make and use their own power.
IQ8 solar microinverters can provide Sunlight Backup during an outage, even without a battery.
In 2021, we announced our participation in the ConnectedSolutions program which is an incentive program
implemented by two utilities in the Northeast region of the U.S. to reduce electrical demand during high-use periods.
Enphase Storage customers in Connecticut, Massachusetts and Rhode Island can sign-up, monitor, track money earned,
and control participation in the program using the Enphase App. In addition, we announced during the third quarter of 2021
our participation in Hawaiian Electric’s Battery Bonus grid services program. This program offers a new incentive for
homeowners on the island of Oahu to install a new home battery. These grid services programs enable utilities to leverage
the IQ Battery instead of turning on polluting peaker plants, while generating an income stream for the IQ Battery owner.
Facilitating grid services participation for our customers intended to reduce the lifetime cost of Enphase IQ Batteries and
help drive increased demand.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 8
Table of Contents
Recent Acquisitions
In January of 2021, we acquired Sofdesk Inc. (“Sofdesk”), which provides design and proposal software. In March of
2021, we acquired the solar design services business of DIN Engineering Services LLP (“DIN”), which provides proposal
and permitting services, and is focused on automating the creation of permit plan sets to further expand the installer base.
We acquired 365 Pronto, Inc (“365 Pronto”) in December of 2021, which offers a predictive software platform dedicated to
simplifying the cleantech service landscape by matching cleantech asset owners to a local and on-demand workforce of
service providers. On December 31, 2021, we acquired ClipperCreek, Inc. (“ClipperCreek”), which offers electric vehicle
(EV) charging solutions for residential and commercial customers in the U.S. The increasing penetration of EVs has
implications for home energy management, as households not only consume significantly more power with an EV, but also
have a large battery that can be used for both backup and grid services. This acquisition leverages our power conversion
and software platform to manage loads and resources within the home.
Our home energy systems are architected to efficiently manage generation, storage, and consumption resources in
the home to ensure the best customer experience. During 2021, we also introduced generator compatibility and grid
services products as part of our home energy systems. These systems are integrated with most leading models of home
standby AC generators, providing enhanced performance and a glitch-free transition for homeowners during power outages.
Homeowners can also monitor real-time power flow, start, and stop their generator remotely, set quiet hours to prevent their
generator from operating until their batteries fall below a certain state of charge, and control it all with the Enphase App.
Our Strategy
Our objective is to build best-in-class home energy systems and deliver them to homeowners through our installer
and distribution partners, enabled by a comprehensive digital platform. Key elements of our strategy include:
•Best-in-class customer experience. Our value proposition is to deliver products that are productive, reliable,
smart, simple and safe, and superior customer service, to enable homeowners’ storage and energy
independence. On the service front, our installer, distributor and module partners are our first line of association
with our ultimate customer, the homeowner and business user. Our goals are to partner better with these service
providers so that we can provide exceptional high quality service to our homeowner. We are convinced that
continued reinforcement of customer experience improvements can be a competitive advantage for us.
•Grow market share worldwide. We intend to capitalize on our market leadership in the microinverter category and
our momentum with installers and owners to expand our market share position in our core markets. In addition,
we intend to further increase our market share in Europe, Asia Pacific and Latin America regions. Further, we
intend to expand into new markets, including emerging markets, with new and existing products and local go-to-
market capabilities.
•Expand our product offerings. We distinguish ourselves from other inverter companies with our systems-based
and high technology approach as we continue to invest in research and development to develop all components
of our energy management solution and remain committed to providing our customers and partners with best-in-
class power electronics, storage solutions, communications, and load control all managed by a cloud-based
energy management system.
•Increase power and efficiency and reduce cost per watt. Our engineering team is focused on continuing to
increase average power conversion efficiency and AC output power in order to pair with higher rated DC modules
while reducing costs per watt.
•Increase storage energy density, reduce install time and cost per kWh. Our engineering team is focused on
increasing the energy density of our battery capacity, reducing installation time and reducing cost per kWh to
make solar-plus-storage resilient, sustainable and affordable for the masses.
•Focus on the homeowner and installer partners. We are focused on generating revenue through digitalization of
the business-to-business and business-to-customer process of the partner and customer journey. Future key
focus is to expand our digital presence through enhancing our array of tools on our digital platforms to keep us
continually connected with our installers and homeowners, as well as increasing the use of the online store
significantly.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 9
Table of Contents
Customers and Sales
We currently offer solutions targeting the residential and commercial markets in the U.S., Canada, Mexico, Europe,
Australia, New Zealand, India, Brazil, South Africa, and certain other Central American and Asian markets. We sell primarily
to solar distributors who combine our products with others, including solar modules products and racking systems, and
resell to installers in each target region. In addition to our solar distributors, we sell directly to select large installers, original
equipment manufacturers (“OEM”) and strategic partners. Our OEM customers include solar module manufacturers who
integrate our microinverters with their solar module products and resell to both distributors and installers. We also sell
certain products and services to homeowners, primarily in support of our warranty services and legacy product upgrade
programs, via our online store. Strategic partners include a variety of companies including industrial equipment suppliers
and providers of solar financing solutions. In 2021, one customer accounted for approximately 34% of total net revenues.
The revenues generated from the U.S. market have represented 80%, 82% and 84% of our total revenue for the annual
period ending on December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Manufacturing, Quality Control and Key Suppliers
We outsource the manufacturing of our products to manufacturing partners. Flex Ltd. and affiliates (“Flex”), Salcomp
Manufacturing India Pvt. Ltd. (“Salcomp”) and Sunwoda Electric Co. Ltd. (“Sunwoda”) assemble and test our microinverter,
IQ Battery storage systems and Envoy products. Prices for such services are agreed to by the parties on a quarterly basis,
and we are obligated to purchase manufactured products and raw materials that cannot be resold upon the termination of
the agreement. Flex also provides receiving, kitting, storage, transportation, inventory visibility and other value-added
logistics services at locations managed by Flex. Hong Kong Sinbon Industrial Limited manufactures our custom AC cables.
During the fourth quarter of 2020, we qualified Amperex Technology Limited (“ATL”) in addition to A123 Systems LLC
(“A123”) as our lithium-ion battery suppliers to help increase our available capacity. In addition, we rely on several
unaffiliated companies to supply certain components used in the fabrication of our products.
Our partnership with Flex, Salcomp and Sunwoda provides us with strategic manufacturing capabilities and flexibility.
During the fourth quarter of 2021, we announced the shipment of eighth-generation Enphase IQ microinverters produced
at Flex in Mexico and Salcomp in India. In addition, we began microinverter production at Salcomp in India and started
shipping to customers in the fourth quarter of 2020. We anticipate that this additional manufacturing capacity in Mexico and
India could help us to not only mitigate tariffs, but also better serve our customers by cutting down delivery times and
diversifying our supply chain.
Customer Service
We continue to cultivate an organizational focus on customer satisfaction and are committed to providing a best-in-
class customer experience. We maintain high levels of customer engagement through our customer support group and the
Enlighten cloud-based software portal. During 2020, we introduced the Enphase Community to help installers and
homeowners solve their problems quickly. We launched Service-on-the-Go™ in Australia, which installers can use from
their mobile devices to get service instantly. During 2021, we introduced 24/7 support for installers and Enphase system
owners globally across its phone, online chat, and email communications channel. We continue to hire and train our
customer service agents with a goal of reducing average customer wait times to under one minute and we introduced field
service technicians to provide direct homeowner assistance. Our Net Promoter Score (commonly referred to as “NPS”)
improved from 65% in 2020 to 67% in 2021 through multiple customer service initiatives.
Research and Development
We plan to continue to devote substantial resources to research and development with the objective of developing
new products and systems, adding new features to existing products and systems and reducing unit costs. Our research
and development roadmap identifies new system-level features and defines improvement targets for product cost and
performance to support our growth and to optimize the effectiveness of our energy management solutions for our
customers. We measure the effectiveness of our research and development against metrics that include product cost,
efficiency, reliability and power output, as well as feature content and ease-of-use.TM
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 10
Table of Contents
Intellectual Property
We operate in an industry in which innovation, investment in new ideas and protection of our intellectual property
rights are critical for success. We protect our technology through a variety of means, including through patent, trademark,
copyright and trade secrets laws in the U.S. and similar laws in other countries, confidentiality agreements and other
contractual arrangements. As of December 31, 2021, we had 250 issued U.S. patents, 79 issued foreign patents, 71
pending U.S. patent applications and 60 pending foreign counterpart patent applications. Our issued patents are scheduled
to expire between years 2022 and 2046. There are no significant patents expiring in 2022.
We have licensed certain technologies for application in hardware and software in our products. Such licenses are
generally fully-paid, royalty-free licenses. Given the volume and pace of new patents worldwide, it may become necessary
in the future to license intellectual property on terms that are yet unknown to us, and that may be less favorable than
licenses in the past. In addition, we license open source software from various third parties for use in hardware and
software. Such open source software is licensed under open source licenses and we take efforts to maintain compliance
with such licenses.
We continually assess the need for patent protection for those aspects of our technology that we believe provide
significant competitive advantages. A majority of our patents relate to DC to AC power conversion, energy storage devices,
and related energy environments.
With respect to proprietary know-how that is not patentable and processes for which patents are difficult to enforce,
we rely on trade secret protection and confidentiality agreements to safeguard our interests. We believe that many elements
of our microinverter and storage manufacturing processes involve proprietary know-how, technology or data that are not
covered by patents or patent applications, including technical processes, test equipment designs, algorithms and
procedures.
We own or have rights to various trademarks and service marks in the U.S. and in other countries, including Enphase,
the Enphase “e”, IQ, Ensemble OS, Encharge, Envoy, Enpower and Enlighten. We rely on both registration of our marks as
well as common law protection where available.
All of our research and development personnel have entered into confidentiality and proprietary information
agreements with us. These agreements address intellectual property protection and require our employees to assign to us
all of the inventions, designs and technologies they develop during the course of employment with us.
We also require our customers and business partners to enter into confidentiality agreements before we disclose any
sensitive aspects of our technology or business plans.
As part of our overall strategy to protect our intellectual property, we may take legal actions to prevent third parties
from infringing or misappropriating our intellectual property or from otherwise gaining access to our technology.
Government Regulations
Our business activities are global and are subject to various federal, state, local, and foreign laws, rules and
regulations. For example, substantially all of our import operations are subject to complex trade and customs laws,
regulations and tax requirements such as sanctions orders or tariffs set by governments through mutual agreements or
unilateral actions. In addition, the countries in which our products are manufactured or imported may from time to time
impose additional duties, tariffs or other restrictions on our imports or adversely modify existing restrictions. Changes in tax
policy or trade regulations, the disallowance of tax deductions on imported merchandise, or the imposition of new tariffs on
imported products, could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Compliance with these laws,
rules and regulations has not had, and is not expected to have, a material effect on our capital expenditures and results of
operations.
Privacy and Security Laws
There are privacy and data security laws to which we are currently subject, and/or may in the future be subject. Every
U.S. state, members of the European Economic Area, Switzerland, United Kingdom, Brazil, Mexico, Australia, New
Zealand, China, and many other jurisdictions in which we operate have adopted privacy and data security laws and
regulations which impose significant compliance obligations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 11
Table of Contents
The European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), which is wide-ranging in scope, imposes
several requirements relating to a variety of matters, including the control over personal data by individuals to whom the
personal data relates, the information provided to the individuals, the documentation we must maintain, the security and
confidentiality of the personal data, data breach notification, and the use of third-party processors in connection with the
processing of personal data. The GDPR also imposes strict rules on the transfer of personal data outside of the EU,
provides an enforcement authority and authorizes the imposition of large penalties for noncompliance, including the
potential for significant fines. The GDPR requirements apply not only to third-party transactions, but also to transfers of
information between us and our subsidiaries, including employee information. The GDPR has increased our responsibility
and potential liability in relation to all types of personal data that we process and we may be required to put in place
additional mechanisms to ensure compliance with the GDPR, which could divert management’s attention and increase our
cost of doing business. However, despite our ongoing efforts to bring our practices into compliance with the GDPR, we may
not be successful either due to various factors within our control or other factors outside our control.
Additionally, we are governed by a California state privacy law called the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
(“CCPA”), which contains requirements similar to GDPR for the handling of personal information of California residents. The
CCPA establishes a privacy framework for covered businesses, including an expansive definition of personal information
and data privacy rights for California residents. The CCPA includes a framework with potentially severe statutory damages
and private rights of action. The CCPA requires covered companies to provide new disclosures to California consumers (as
that word is broadly defined in the CCPA), and new ways for such consumers to opt-out of certain sales of personal
information, and to allow for a new cause of action for data breaches. Further, California voters approved a new privacy law,
the California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”) in the November 3, 2020 election. Effective starting on January 1, 2023, the
CPRA will significantly modify the CCPA, including by expanding the consumers’ rights with respect to certain sensitive
personal information. The CPRA also creates a new state agency that will be vested with authority to implement and
enforce the CCPA and the CPRA. New legislation proposed or enacted in various other states will continue to shape the
data privacy environment nationally. For example, on March 2, 2021, Virginia enacted the Virginia Consumer Data
Protection Act (“CDPA”), which becomes effective on January 1, 2023, and on June 8, 2021, Colorado enacted the
Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”) which takes effect on July 1, 2023. The CPA and CDPA are similar to the CCPA and CPRA,
but aspects of these state privacy statutes remain unclear, resulting in further legal uncertainty.
The GDPR, CCPA, CPRA, CPA and CDPA exemplify the vulnerability of our business to the evolving regulatory
environment related to personal data. Other states in the U.S. have passed or are considering privacy laws, and additional
countries have in recent years implemented new privacy laws. Our compliance costs and potential liability may increase
with this scattered regulatory environment.
Seasonality
Historically, the majority of our revenues are from the North American and European regions which experience higher
sales of our products in the second, third and fourth quarters and have been affected by seasonal customer demand trends,
including weather patterns and construction cycles. The first quarter historically has had softer customer demand in our
industry, due to these same factors. Although these seasonal factors are common in the solar sector, historical patterns
should not be considered a reliable indicator of our future sales activity or performance.
Government Incentives
U.S. federal, state, and local government bodies, as well as non-U.S. government bodies provide incentives to
owners, distributors, system integrators and manufacturers of solar energy systems to promote solar energy in the form of
rebates, tax credits, lower VAT rate and other financial incentives such as system performance payments, payments for
renewable energy credits associated with renewable energy generation and exclusion of solar energy systems from
property tax assessments. The market for on‑grid applications, where solar power is used to supplement a customer’s
electricity purchased from the utility network or sold to a utility under tariff, often depends in large part on the availability and
size of these government subsidies and economic incentives, which vary by geographic market and from time to time, thus
helping to catalyze customer acceptance of solar energy as an alternative to utility-provided power. The disallowance or
changes in government subsidies or economic incentives could have an adverse effect on our business and results of
operations.
Our revenue in the fourth quarter of 2019 and first quarter of 2020 was positively impacted by the scheduled phase-
down of the investment tax credit for solar projects under Section 48(a) (the “ITC”) of the Internal Revenue
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 12
Table of Contents
Code of 1986, as amended (the “Code”). The Renewable Energy and Job Creation Act of 2008 provided a 30% federal tax
credit for residential and commercial solar installations through December 31, 2019, which was reduced to a tax credit of
26% for any solar energy system that began construction during 2020 through December 31, 2022, and 22% thereafter to
December 31, 2023 before being reduced to 10% for commercial installations and 0% for residential installations beginning
on January 1, 2024. As a result, several of our customers explored opportunities to purchase products in 2019 to take
advantage of safe harbor guidance from the IRS published in June 2018, allowing them to preserve the historical 30%
investment tax credit for solar equipment purchased in 2019 for solar projects that are completed after December 31, 2019.
Competition
The markets for our products are highly competitive, and we compete with central and string inverter manufacturers,
storage system manufacturers and new technologies that compete with our business. The principal areas in which we
compete with other companies include:
•product performance and features;
•total cost of ownership;
•breadth of product line;
•local sales and distribution capabilities;
•module compatibility and interoperability;
•reliability and duration of product warranty;
•technological expertise;
•brand recognition;
•customer service and support;
•compliance with industry standards and certifications;
•compliance with current and planned local electrical codes;
•integration with storage offerings;
•size and financial stability of operations;
•size of installed base; and
•local manufacturing and product content.
Several of our existing and potential competitors are significantly larger than we are and may have greater financial,
marketing, distribution, and customer support resources, and may have significantly broader brand recognition, especially in
certain markets. In addition, some of our competitors have more resources and experience in developing or acquiring new
products and technologies and creating market awareness for these offerings.
Competitors in the inverter market include, among others, SolarEdge Technologies, Inc., Fronius International GmbH,
SMA Solar Technology AG, AP Systems, Generac, Tesla, Inc., Huawei Technologies Co. Ltd., Delta, Ginglong, Sungrow,
Solax and other companies offering string inverters with and without solar optimizers. We believe that our microinverter
solutions offer significant advantages and competitive differentiation relative to traditional central or string inverter
technology, even when supplemented by DC-to-DC optimizers on the roof. Competitors in the storage market include Tesla,
SolarEdge, LG Chem, Sonnen, Generac, Panasonic, BYD, E3/DC, Senec, Schneider, Goal Zero, SimpliPhi and other
producers of battery cells and integrated storage systems.
Human Capital Resources
As of December 31, 2021, we had 2,260 full-time employees. Of the full-time employees, 630 were engaged in
research and development, 615 in sales and marketing, 180 in general and administration, 732 in design permitting
services and 103 in manufacturing and operations. Of these employees, 561 were in the United States, 1,428 in India, 85 in
New Zealand, 67 in Europe, 48 in Canada, 25 in Australia, 21 in China, 17 in Mexico and 8 in Brazil.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 13
Table of Contents
None of our employees are represented by a labor union; however, our employees in France are represented by a
collective bargaining agreement. We have not experienced any employment-related work stoppages, and we consider our
relations with our employees to be good.
Culture
Supporting our purpose of “Advancing a sustainable future for all,” all employees are expected to uphold the following
core values that drive our culture:
•Customer First
•Integrity
•Innovation
•Teamwork
•Quality
These core values are represented by how we work together, how we perform, and how we all get rewarded. Values
are reinforced in new hire training, culture workshops and everyday interactions.
Talent
Our talent and culture are critical to our success. Our human capital management philosophy and objectives focus on
creating a high performance culture in which our employees deliver, succeed and lead. We achieve our objectives through
various employee engagement and talent development efforts. Our employee engagement efforts include our quarterly all-
employee town hall meetings, through which we aim to keep our employees well-informed and to increase transparency,
and employee engagement surveys through which we incorporate critical employee feedback into our culture, operations
and strategic plans. We have established relationships with top universities worldwide, professional associations and
industry groups to build a talent pipeline, and established the Enphase Learning Academy to provide employees with on
demand relevant technical and professional programs.
We are committed to promoting and cultivating an inclusive and diverse culture that welcomes and celebrates
everyone without bias. In addition, we look to actively engage within our communities to foster and attain social equity. We
became a corporate sponsor of the non-profit Women in Cleantech and Sustainability and our Chief Executive Officer
signed the CEO Action for Diversity & Inclusion pledge. This shows our commitment to advancing diversity and inclusion in
the workplace.
Compensation Philosophy
Our compensation philosophy creates the framework for our rewards strategy. We have a pay-for-performance
culture that ties compensation to the performance of the individual and our company. We provide competitive compensation
programs that focus on the following five key elements:
•Pay-for-performance: Reward and recognize leading contributors and high potential employees by paying market
competitive total direct compensation, which includes base salary, quarterly bonus or commission, and stock-based
compensation;
•External market-based research: Pay levels that are competitive with respect to the labor markets and industries in
which we compete for talent;
•Internal equity: Maintaining internally consistent and non discriminatory pay and pay practices;
•Fiscal responsibility: Providing programs in line with economic conditions and our company’s financial health; and
•Legal compliance: Ensure the organization is legally compliant in all states and countries in which we operate.
Health and Wellness
We invest in our employees through high-quality benefits and various health and wellness initiatives. Our benefits
packages provide a balance of protection along with the flexibility to meet the individual needs of our employees. In
response to the global COVID-19 pandemic, we instituted a global work-from-home policy beginning in March 2020, which
has been modified to allow certain employees to work in certain of our offices when and as business necessitate. We are
conducting business as usual with restrictions to employee travel, and we have
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 14
Table of Contents
transitioned in-person marketing events to virtual formats, among other modifications. We expect these changes will
substantially remain in effect in the first quarter of 2022 and could extend to future quarters. We will continue to actively
monitor the situation, including progress made through vaccinations, and we will make further changes to our business
operations as may be required by federal, state, or local authorities and that we determine are in the best interests of our
employees, end-customers, partners, suppliers, and stockholders. Our focus remains on the safety of our employees, and
we strive to protect the health and well-being of the communities in which we operate, in part, by providing technology to
our employees, end-customers, and partners to help them do their best work while remote.
Available Information
We file electronically with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”), our Annual Reports on Form 10-K,
Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports filed pursuant to Section
13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended ( the “Exchange Act”), can be accessed on our Investor
Relations website at www.investor.enphase.com. Alternatively, you may access these reports at the SEC’s website at
www.sec.gov. We make available, free of charge, copies of these reports as soon as reasonably practicable after filing
these reports with the SEC or otherwise furnishing it to the SEC. The contents of our websites are not incorporated by
reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K or in any other report or document we file with the SEC, and any references
to our websites are intended to be inactive textual references only.
Item 1A.    Risk Factors
We have identified the following risks and uncertainties that may have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition or results of operations. The risks described below are not the only ones we face. Additional risks not
presently known to us or that we currently believe are not material may also significantly impair our business operations.
Our business could be harmed by any of these risks. The trading price of our common stock could decline due to any of
these risks, and you may lose all or part of your investment. In assessing these risks, you should also refer to the other
information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, including our consolidated financial statements and related
notes. See also “Forward-Looking Statements” in the forepart of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Risks Related to our Business, Operations and Our Industry
The reduction, elimination or expiration of government subsidies and economic incentives for on-grid solar
electricity applications could reduce demand for solar PV systems and harm our business.
The market for on-grid applications, where solar power is used to supplement a customer’s electricity purchased from
the utility network or sold to a utility under tariff, depends in large part on the availability and size of government and
economic incentives that vary by geographic market. Because our customers’ sales are typically into the on-grid market, the
reduction, elimination or expiration of government subsidies and economic incentives for on-grid solar electricity may
negatively affect the competitiveness of solar electricity relative to conventional and non-solar renewable sources of
electricity and could harm or halt the growth of the solar electricity industry and our business.
In general, the cost of solar power currently exceeds retail electricity rates, and we believe this tendency will continue
in the near term. As a result, national, state and local government bodies in many countries, including the U.S., have
provided incentives in the form of feed-in tariffs (“FiTs”), rebates, tax credits and other incentives to system owners,
distributors, system integrators and manufacturers of solar PV systems to promote the use of solar electricity in on-grid
applications and to reduce dependency on other forms of energy. Many of these government incentives expire, phase out
over time, terminate upon the exhaustion of the allocated funding, require renewal by the applicable authority or are being
changed by governments due to changing market circumstances or changes to national, state or local energy policy.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 15
Table of Contents
Electric utility companies or generators of electricity from other non-solar renewable sources of electricity may
successfully lobby for changes in the relevant legislation in their markets that are harmful to the solar industry. Reductions
in, or eliminations or expirations of, governmental incentives in regions where we focus our sales efforts could result in
decreased demand for and lower revenue from solar PV systems there, which would adversely affect sales of our products.
In addition, our ability to successfully penetrate new geographic markets may depend on new countries adopting and
maintaining incentives to promote solar electricity, to the extent such incentives are not currently in place. Furthermore,
electric utility companies may establish pricing structures or interconnection requirements that could adversely affect our
sales and be harmful to the solar and distributed rooftop solar generation industry.
Among other government-established incentives, net metering and related policies have supported the growth of on-
grid solar products, and changes to such policies may significantly reduce demand for electricity from our solar service
offerings. Net metering is a utility rate program that requires a consumer’s electric company to purchase the excess solar
energy that the consumer’s solar panels produce and pay Net Surplus Compensation (“NSC”) (i.e., the retail rate for
electricity exported to the grid, less certain non-bypassable fees to the consumer). For example, in 2016 California’s Public
Utilities Commission (“CPUC”) issued an order retaining retail-based net metering credits for residential customers of
California's major utilities as part of Net Energy Metering 2.0 ("NEM 2.0"). Under NEM 2.0, new distributed generation
customers receive the NSC. Customers under NEM 2.0 also are subject to interconnection charges and time‑of-use rates
with different electricity prices during peak and off-peak hours. Existing customers who receive service under the prior net
metering program, as well as new customers under the NEM 2.0 program, remain eligible for the NEM 2.0 program for a
period of 20 years. On September 3, 2020, the CPUC opened a new proceeding to review its current net metering policies
and to develop Net Energy Metering 3.0 ("NEM 3.0"), also referred to by the CPUC as the NEM 2.0 successor tariff, and
issued its draft decision on December 13, 2021. While the outcome of this proceeding is uncertain, it could result in a
significant reduction of the NSC payments for new solar customers and introduces a monthly grid participation charge of
approximately $8/KW, which significantly affects the economics of buying solar. Proceedings on distributed energy policy
and utility rates before the CPUC could also result in changes that affect customers with distributed generation systems.
Changes such as NEM 3.0 in California or other jurisdictions could reduce demand for solar PV systems (including our
products) and harm our business.
If demand for solar energy solutions does not grow or grows at a slower rate than we anticipate, including as a
result of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, our business will suffer.
Our IQ™ microinverter, AC and IQ™ Battery storage systems are utilized in solar PV installations, which provide on-
site distributed power generation. As a result, our future success depends on continued demand for solar energy solutions
and the ability of solar equipment vendors to meet this demand. The solar industry is an evolving industry that has
experienced substantial changes in recent years, and we cannot be certain that consumers and businesses will adopt solar
PV systems as an alternative energy source at levels sufficient to continue to grow our business. Traditional electricity
distribution is based on the regulated industry model under which businesses and consumers obtain their electricity from a
government regulated utility. For alternative methods of distributed power to succeed, businesses and consumers must
adopt new purchasing practices. The viability and continued growth in demand for solar energy solutions, and in turn, our
products, may be impacted by many factors outside of our control, including:
•market acceptance of solar PV systems based on our product platform;
•cost competitiveness, reliability and performance of solar PV systems compared to conventional and non-solar
renewable energy sources and products;
•availability and amount of government subsidies and incentives to support the development and deployment of
solar energy solutions;
•the extent to which the electric power industry and broader energy industries are deregulated to permit broader
adoption of solar electricity generation;
•the cost and availability of key raw materials and components used in the production of solar PV systems;
•prices of traditional utility-provided energy sources;
•levels of investment by end-users of solar energy products, which tend to decrease when economic growth slows;
and
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 16
Table of Contents
•the emergence, continuance or success of, or increased government support for, other alternative energy
generation technologies and products.
If demand for solar energy solutions does not grow, demand for our customers’ products as well as demand for our
products will decrease, which would have an adverse impact on our ability to increase our revenue and grow our business.
Short-term demand and supply imbalances, especially for solar module technology, have recently caused prices for
solar technology solutions to decline rapidly. Furthermore, competition in the solar industry has increased due to the
emergence of lower-cost manufacturers along the entire solar value chain causing further price declines, excess inventory
and oversupply. These market disruptions may continue to occur and may increase pressure to reduce prices, which could
adversely affect our business and financial results.
Further, our success depends on continued demand for solar energy solutions and the ability of solar equipment
vendors to meet this demand. The ongoing impact of the COVID-19 pandemic is fluid and uncertain, but it has caused and
may continue to cause various negative effects, including an inability to meet the needs of our existing or potential end-
customers due to supply chain constraints. The demand for solar energy solutions may continue to decrease, or at least not
continue its growth relative to pre-pandemic periods and recent years, as a result of government orders associated with the
COVID-19 pandemic, due to adverse worldwide economic and market conditions, or other factors. If demand for solar
energy solutions decreases or does not grow, demand for our customers’ products as well as demand for our products will
decrease, which would have an adverse impact on our ability to increase our revenue and grow our business.
The rapidly changing solar industry makes it difficult to evaluate our current business and future prospects.
The solar energy industry is one of the fastest growing forms of renewable energy and is undergoing and subject to
rapid change. The solar energy industry will take several more years to develop and further mature, which makes it difficult
to evaluate our current business, and we cannot be certain that the market will grow to the size or at the rate we expect. We
have encountered and will continue to encounter risks and difficulties frequently experienced by growing companies in
rapidly changing industries, including increased expenses as we continue to grow our business. If we do not manage these
risks and overcome these difficulties successfully, our business will suffer.
Since we began commercial shipments of our products, our revenue, gross profit and results of operations have
varied and are likely to continue to vary from quarter to quarter due to a number of factors, many of which are not within our
control. It is difficult for us to accurately forecast our future revenue and gross profit and plan expenses accordingly and,
therefore, it is difficult for us to predict our future results of operations.
We depend on limited-source suppliers for key components and products. If we are unable to source these
components and products on a timely basis, we will not be able to deliver our products to our customers.
We depend on sole-source and limited-source suppliers for key components of our products, such as our ASICs and
lithium-ion batteries. Any of the sole-source and limited-source suppliers upon whom we rely could experience quality and
reliability issues, stop producing our components, cease operations, or be acquired by, or enter into exclusive arrangements
with, our competitors. We generally do not have long-term supply agreements with our suppliers, and our purchase volumes
may currently be too low for us to be considered a priority customer by most of our suppliers. As a result, most of these
suppliers could stop selling to us at commercially reasonable prices, or at all. Any such quality or reliability issue, or
interruption or delay may force us to seek similar components or products from alternative sources, which may not be
available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all. Switching suppliers may require that we redesign our products to
accommodate new components, and may potentially require us to re-qualify our products, which would be costly and time-
consuming. Any interruption in the quality or supply of sole-source or limited-source components for our products would
adversely affect our ability to meet scheduled product deliveries to our customers and could result in lost revenue or higher
expenses and would harm our business.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 17
Table of Contents
Our business has been affected by, is currently being adversely affected and could be materially and adversely
affected in the future by the current impacts and evolving effects of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. The COVID-
19 pandemic may continue to, and other actual or threatened epidemics, pandemics, outbreaks, or public health
crises may in the future, adversely affect our and our customers’ results of operations and financial condition, our
supply chain and our business.
The global spread of COVID-19 and the efforts to control it have adversely affected, and could continue to adversely
affect, global supply chains. Any disruptions to our suppliers and manufacturers by, for example, worker absenteeism,
quarantines, office and factory closures, disruptions to ports and other shipping infrastructure, or other travel or health-
related restrictions have adversely affected and could continue to have an adverse impact on our business and operations.
For example, the general constraints in the market for the semiconductors has been disrupted by the COVID-19 pandemic,
and that disruption has impacted and may in future further impact the component supply for our IQ7 and IQ8 products. As a
result of these supply chain constraints and possible disruptions, we are working to expand our supplier base, but there can
be no assurance that these efforts will be successful or that supply chain constraints and disruptions will not continue, or
worsen. Limits on manufacturing availability or capacity, or delays in production or delivery of components, due to COVID-
19-related restrictions could delay or inhibit our ability to obtain supply of components and produce finished products and
offerings, which could adversely affect our business, operations and customer relationships.
Our liquidity also may be negatively impacted if sales decline significantly for an extended period due to the impact of
the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. Further, the extent to which the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and our precautionary
measures in response thereto impact our business and liquidity will depend on future developments, which are uncertain
and cannot be precisely predicted at this time.
The ultimate extent of the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our business, financial condition and results of
operations will depend on future developments, including those that are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted with
confidence at this time, including the ultimate duration of the pandemic, travel restrictions, quarantines, social distancing
and business closure requirements in the U.S. and other countries, and the effectiveness of actions taken globally to
contain and treat the disease. It is possible that additional legislation or governmental action will be taken in response to the
evolving effects of the COVID-19 pandemic. We cannot assure you as to the ultimate content, timing, or effect of changes,
nor is it possible at this time to estimate the impact of any such potential legislation or governmental action; however, such
changes or the ultimate impact of changes could negatively affect our revenue or sales of our current and or potential future
products. Moreover, the long-term effects of the COVID-19 pandemic remain unknown, and it is possible that following the
pandemic in-person interactions will remain limited, which would negatively impact our sales team and our future revenues.
These and other potential impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic discussed elsewhere in this “Risk Factors” section, as well as
any future and unforeseen risks related to the pandemic not yet contemplated, could materially and adversely affect our
business, financial condition and results of operations. To the extent the evolving effects of the COVID-19 pandemic
adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations, they may also have the effect of heightening
many of the other risks and uncertainties described elsewhere in this “Risk Factors” section.
It is also possible that future global pandemics could also occur and also materially and adversely affect our business,
financial condition and results of operations.
We depend upon a small number of outside contract manufacturers, and our business and operations could be
disrupted if we encounter problems with these contract manufacturers.
We do not have internal manufacturing capabilities and rely upon a small number of contract manufacturers to build
our products. In particular, we outsource the manufacturing of our products to manufacturing partners. Flex and Salcomp
assemble and test our IQ microinverter, AC and IQ Battery storage systems and Envoy products. Prices for such services
are agreed to by the parties on a quarterly basis, and we are obligated to purchase manufactured products and raw
materials that cannot be resold upon the termination of the related agreements. As of December 31, 2021, our related
purchase obligations (including amounts related to component inventory procured by our primary contract manufacturers on
our behalf) were approximately $424.6 million. The timing of purchases in future periods could differ materially from our
estimates due to fluctuations in demand requirements related to varying sales levels as well as changes in economic
conditions.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 18
Table of Contents
Flex also provides receiving, kitting, storage, transportation, inventory visibility and other value-added logistics
services at locations managed by Flex. Hong Kong Sinbon Industrial Limited manufactures our custom AC cables. During
the fourth quarter of 2020, we qualified ATL in addition to A123 as our lithium-ion battery suppliers to help increase our
available capacity. In addition, we rely on several unaffiliated companies to supply certain components used in the
fabrication of our products.
Our reliance on a small number of contract manufacturers makes us vulnerable to possible capacity constraints and
reduced control over component availability, delivery schedules, manufacturing yields and costs. We do not have long-term
supply contracts with our contract manufacturing partners. Consequently, these manufacturers are not obligated to supply
products to us for any period, in any specified quantity or at any certain price. If any of these suppliers reduce or eliminate
the supply of the components to us in the future, our revenues, business, financial condition and results of operations would
be adversely impacted.
Further, the revenues that our contract manufacturers generate from our orders may represent a relatively small
percentage of their overall revenues. As a result, fulfilling our orders may not be considered a priority in the event of
constrained ability to fulfill all of their customer obligations in a timely manner. In addition, the facilities in which the vast
majority of our products are manufactured are located outside of the U.S. We believe that the location of these facilities
outside of the U.S. increases supply risk, including the risk of supply interruptions or reductions in manufacturing quality or
controls.
If any of our contract manufacturers were unable or unwilling to manufacture our products in required volumes and at
high quality levels or renew existing terms under supply agreements, we would have to identify, qualify and select
acceptable alternative contract manufacturers, which may not be available to us on favorable terms, if at all. For example,
we have experienced a volume shortage of components and may experience in future as well. An alternative contract
manufacturer may not be available to us when needed or may not be in a position to satisfy our quality or production
requirements on commercially reasonable terms. Any significant interruption in manufacturing would require us to reduce
our supply of products to our customers, which in turn would reduce our revenues, harm our relationships with our
customers and cause us to forgo potential revenue opportunities.
If we or our contract manufacturers are unable to obtain raw materials in a timely manner or if the price of raw
materials increases significantly, production time and product costs could increase, which may adversely affect
our business.
The manufacturing and packaging processes used by our contract manufacturers depend on raw materials such as
copper, aluminum, silicon and petroleum-based products. From time to time, suppliers may extend lead times, limit supplies
or increase prices due to capacity constraints or other factors. Certain of our suppliers have the ability to pass along to us
directly or through our contract manufacturers any increases in the price of raw materials. If the prices of these raw
materials rise significantly, we may be unable to pass on the increased cost to our customers. While we may from time to
time enter into hedging transactions to reduce our exposure to wide fluctuations in the cost of raw materials, the availability
and effectiveness of these hedging transactions may be limited. Due to all these factors, our results of operations could be
adversely affected if we or our contract manufacturers are unable to obtain adequate supplies of raw materials in a timely
manner or at reasonable cost. In addition, from time to time, we or our contract manufacturers may need to reject raw
materials that do not meet our specifications, resulting in potential delays or declines in output. Furthermore, problems with
our raw materials may give rise to compatibility or performance issues in our products, which could lead to an increase in
product warranty claims. Errors or defects may arise from raw materials supplied by third parties that are beyond our
detection or control, which could lead to additional product warranty claims that may adversely affect our business and
results of operations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 19
Table of Contents
Manufacturing problems could result in delays in product shipments, which would adversely affect our revenue,
competitive position and reputation.
We have in the past and may in the future experience delays, disruptions or quality control problems in our
manufacturing operations. Our product development, manufacturing and testing processes are complex and require
significant technological and production process expertise. Such processes involve a number of precise steps from design
to production. Any change in our processes could cause one or more production errors, requiring a temporary suspension
or delay in our production line until the errors can be researched, identified and properly addressed and rectified. This may
occur particularly as we introduce new products, modify our engineering and production techniques, and expand our
capacity. In addition, our failure to maintain appropriate quality assurance processes could result in increased product
failures, loss of customers, increased production costs and delays. Any of these developments could have a material
adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
A disruption could also occur in one of our contract manufacturers’ facilities due to any number of reasons, such as
equipment failure, contaminated materials, COVID-19 pandemic impacts or process deviations, which could adversely
impact manufacturing yields or delay product shipments. As a result, we could incur additional costs that would adversely
affect our gross profit, and product shipments to our customers could be delayed beyond the schedules requested, which
would negatively affect our revenue, competitive position and reputation.
Additionally, manufacturing yields depend on a number of factors, including the stability and manufacturability of the
product design, manufacturing improvements gained over cumulative production volumes, and the quality and consistency
of component parts. Capacity constraints, raw materials shortages, logistics issues, labor shortages, and changes in
customer requirements, manufacturing facilities or processes have historically caused, and may in the future cause,
reduced manufacturing yields, negatively impacting the gross profit on, and our production capacity for, those products.
Moreover, an increase in the rejection and rework rate of products during the quality control process before, during or after
manufacture would result in our experiencing lower yields, gross profit and production capacity. Furthermore, counterfeit
parts in our supply chain have been and continue to be a concern, since any counterfeit part can be a lower quality product,
which may affect our system reliability.
Component shortages have required us and may continue to require us to incur expedited shipping costs to meet
delivery schedules, which impacts our revenue and gross profit.
The risks of these types of manufacturing problems are further increased during the introduction of new product lines,
which has from time to time caused, and may in the future cause, temporary suspension of product lines while problems are
addressed or corrected. Since our business is substantially dependent on a limited number of product lines, any prolonged
or substantial suspension of an individual product line could result in a material adverse effect on our revenue, gross profit,
competitive position, and distributor and customer relationships.
We rely primarily on distributors, installers and providers of solar financing to assist in selling our products to
customers, and the failure of these customers to perform at the expected level, or at all, would have an adverse
effect on our business, financial condition and results of our operations.
We sell our solutions primarily through distributors, as well as through direct sales to solar equipment installers and
developers of third-party solar finance offerings. We do not have exclusive arrangements with these third parties. As a
result, many of our customers also use or market and sell products from our competitors, which may reduce our sales. Our
customers may generally terminate their relationships with us at any time, or with short notice. Our customers may fail to
devote resources necessary to sell our products at the prices, in the volumes and within the time frames that we expect, or
may focus their marketing and sales efforts on products of our competitors. In addition, participants in the solar industry are
becoming increasingly focused on vertical integration of the solar financing and installation process, which may lead to an
overall reduction in the number of potential parties who may purchase and install our products.
In addition, while we provide our distributors and installers with training and other programs, including accreditations
and certifications, these programs may not be effective or utilized consistently. In addition, new partners may require
extensive training and may take significant time and resources to achieve productivity. Our partners may subject us to
lawsuits, potential liability, and reputational harm if, for example, any of our partners misrepresent the functionality of our
platform or products to customers, fail to perform services to our customers’ expectations, or violate laws or our policies. In
addition, our partners may utilize our platform to develop products and services that could potentially compete with products
and services that we offer currently or in the future.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 20
Table of Contents
Concerns over competitive matters or intellectual property ownership could constrain the growth and development of these
partnerships or result in the termination of one or more partnerships. If we fail to effectively manage and grow our network
of partners, or properly monitor the quality and efficacy of their service delivery, our ability to sell our products and efficiently
provide our services may be impacted, and our operating results may be harmed.
Our future performance depends on our ability to effectively manage our relationships with our existing customers, as
well as to attract additional customers that will be able to market and support our products effectively, especially in markets
in which we have not previously distributed our products. Termination of agreements with current customers, failure by
customers to perform as expected, or failure by us to cultivate new customer relationships, could hinder our ability to
expand our operations and harm our revenue and operating results.
The solar industry is highly competitive, and we expect to face increased competition as new and existing
competitors introduce products or develop alternative technologies, which could negatively impact our business,
financial condition and results of operations.
We compete primarily against central and string inverter manufacturers, as well as against new solutions and
emerging technologies that directly compete with our business. A number of companies have developed or are developing
microinverters and other products that will compete directly with our solutions in the module-level power electronics market.
Competitors in the inverter market include, among others, SolarEdge Technologies, Inc., Fronius International GmbH,
SMA Solar Technology AG, AP Systems, Generac, Tesla, Inc., Huawei Technologies Co. Ltd., Delta, Ginglong, Sungrow,
Solax and other companies offering string inverters. Other existing or emerging companies may also begin offering
alternative microinverter, DC-to-DC optimizer, energy storage, monitoring and other solutions that compete with our
products. Competitors in the storage market include Tesla, LG Chem, Sonnen, Generac, Panasonic, BYD, E3/DC, Senec,
Schneider, Goal Zero, Simpliphi and other producers of battery cells and integrated storage systems.
Several of our existing and potential competitors are significantly larger than we are and may have greater financial,
marketing, distribution, and customer support resources, and may have significantly broader brand recognition, especially in
certain markets. In addition, some of our competitors have more resources and experience in developing or acquiring new
products and technologies and creating market awareness for these offerings. Further, certain competitors may be able to
develop new products more quickly than we can and may be able to develop products that are more reliable or that provide
more functionality than ours. In addition, some of our competitors have the financial resources to offer competitive products
at aggressive or below-market pricing levels, which could cause us to lose sales or market share or require us to lower
prices of our products in order to compete effectively. Suppliers of solar products, particularly solar modules, have
experienced eroding prices over the last several years and as a result many have faced margin compression and declining
revenues. If we have to reduce our prices, or if we are unable to offset any future reductions in our average selling prices by
increasing our sales volume, reducing our costs and expenses or introducing new products, our revenues and gross profit
would suffer.
Significant developments in alternative technologies, such as advances in other forms of distributed solar PV power
generation, storage solutions such as batteries, the widespread use or adoption of fuel cells for residential or commercial
properties or improvements in other forms of centralized power production may have a material adverse effect on our
business and prospects. Any failure by us to adopt new or enhanced technologies or processes, or to react to changes in
existing technologies, could result in product obsolescence, the loss of competitiveness of our products, decreased revenue
and a loss of market share to competitors.
We also may face competition from some of our customers or potential customers who evaluate our capabilities
against the merits of manufacturing products internally. Other solar module manufacturers could also develop or acquire
competing inverter technology or attempt to develop components that directly perform DC-to-AC conversion in the module
itself. Due to the fact that such customers may not seek to make a profit directly from the manufacture of these products,
they may have the ability to manufacture competitive products at a lower cost than we would charge such customers. As a
result, these customers or potential customers may purchase fewer of our systems or sell products that compete with our
systems, which would negatively impact our revenue and gross profit.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 21
Table of Contents
The loss of, or events affecting, one of our major customers could reduce our sales and have an adverse effect on
our business, financial condition and results of operations.
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021, one customer accounted for approximately 34% of total net revenues.
Further, as of December 31, 2021, amounts due from one customer represented approximately 38% of the total accounts
receivable balance. Our customers’ decisions to purchase our products are influenced by a number of factors outside of our
control, including retail energy prices and government regulation and incentives, among others. Although we have
agreements with some of our largest customers, these agreements generally do not have long-term purchase commitments
and are generally terminable by either party after a relatively short notice period. In addition, these customers may decide to
no longer use, or to reduce the use of, our products and services for other reasons that may be out of our control. We may
also be affected by events impacting our large customers that result in their decreasing their orders with us or impairing
their ability to pay for our products. The loss of, or events affecting, one or more of our large customers have had from time
to time, and could in the future have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Our energy systems, including our storage solution, integrated AC Module, IQ8 solar microinverters and
Ensemble technology, may not achieve broader market acceptance, which would prevent us from increasing our
revenue and market share.
If we fail to achieve broader market acceptance of our products, including international acceptance of our IQ8
microinverters and Ensemble technology, there would be an adverse impact on our ability to increase our revenue, gain
market share and achieve and sustain profitability. Our ability to achieve broader market acceptance for our products and
services will be impacted by a number of factors, including:
•our ability to produce PV systems that compete favorably against other solutions on the basis of price, quality,
reliability and performance;
•our ability to timely introduce and complete new designs and timely qualify and certify our products;
•whether installers, system owners and solar financing providers will continue to adopt our systems, which have a
relatively limited history with respect to reliability and performance;
•whether installers, system owners and solar financing providers will adopt our storage solution, which is a
relatively new technology with a limited history with respect to reliability and performance;
•the ability of prospective system owners to obtain long-term financing for solar PV installations based on our
product platform on acceptable terms or at all;
•our ability to develop products and services that comply with local standards and regulatory requirements, as well
as potential in-country manufacturing requirements; and
•our ability to develop and maintain successful relationships with our customers and suppliers.
In addition, our ability to achieve increased market share will depend on our ability to increase sales to established
solar installers, who have traditionally sold central or string inverters, or who currently sell DC-to-DC optimizers. These
installers often have made substantial investments in design, installation resources and training in traditional central or
string inverter systems or DC optimizers, which may create challenges for us to achieve their adoption of our solutions.
Our success in marketing and selling “AC module” versions of our microinverter system depends in part upon our
ability to continue to work closely with leading solar module manufacturers.
We continue to work on variants of our microinverter systems that enable direct attachment of a microinverter to solar
modules. The market success of such “AC Module” solutions will depend in part on our ability to continue to work closely
with SunPower and other solar module manufacturers to design microinverters that are compatible with and can be
attached directly to solar modules. We may not be able to encourage solar module manufacturers to work with us on the
development of such compatible solutions for a variety of reasons, including differences in marketing or selling strategy,
competitive considerations, lack of competitive pricing, and technological compatibility. In addition, our ability to form
effective partnerships with solar module manufacturers may be adversely affected by the substantial challenges faced by
many of these manufacturers due to declining prices and revenues from sales of solar modules and the tariffs in the U.S.TM
TM
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 22
Table of Contents
Our recent and planned expansion into existing and new markets could subject us to additional business, financial
and competitive risks.
We currently offer solar microinverter systems targeting the residential and commercial markets throughout the world,
and we intend to expand into other international markets. Our success in new geographic and product markets will depend
on a number of factors, such as:
•acceptance of microinverters in markets in which they have not traditionally been used;
•our ability to compete in new product markets to which we are not accustomed;
•our ability to manage manufacturing capacity and production;
•willingness of our potential customers to incur a higher upfront capital investment than may be required for
competing solutions;
•timely qualification and certification of new products;
•our ability to reduce production costs in order to price our products competitively;
•availability of government subsidies and economic incentives for solar energy solutions;
•accurate forecasting and effective management of inventory levels in line with anticipated product demand;
•our customer service capabilities and responsiveness; and
•timely hiring of the skilled employees and efficient execution of our project plan.
Further, new geographic markets and larger commercial and utility-scale installation markets have different
characteristics from the markets in which we currently sell products, and our success will depend on our ability to properly
address these differences. These differences may include:
•differing regulatory requirements, including tax laws, trade laws, labor, safety, local content, recycling and
consumer protection regulations, tariffs, export quotas, customs duties or other trade restrictions;
•limited or unfavorable intellectual property protection;
•risk of change in international political or economic conditions;
•restrictions on the repatriation of earnings;
•fluctuations in the value of foreign currencies and interest rates;
•difficulties and increased expenses in complying with a variety of U.S. and foreign laws, regulations and trade
standards, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (“FCPA”) and U.K. Bribery Act;
•potentially longer sales cycles;
•generally longer payment cycles and greater difficulty in collecting accounts receivable;
•higher volume requirements;
•increased customer concentrations;
•warranty expectations and product return policies; and
•cost, performance and compatibility requirements.
Failure to address these new markets successfully, to generate sufficient revenue from these markets to offset
associated research and development, marketing and manufacturing costs, or to otherwise effectively anticipate and
manage the risks and challenges associated with our potential expansion into new product and geographic markets, could
adversely affect our revenues and our ability to achieve or sustain profitability.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 23
Table of Contents
We may fail to capture customers in the new product and geographic markets that we are pursuing.
We are pursuing opportunities in energy management and energy storage which are highly competitive markets. We
have made investments in our infrastructure, increased our operating costs and forgone other business opportunities in
order to seek opportunities in these areas and will continue to do so. Any new product is subject to certain risks, including
component sourcing, strategic partner selection and execution, customer acceptance, competition, product differentiation,
market timing, challenges relating to economies of scale in component sourcing and the ability to attract and retain qualified
personnel. There can be no assurance that we will be able to develop and grow these or any other new concepts to a point
where they will become profitable or generate positive cash flow. If we fail to execute on our plan with respect to new
product introductions, these new potential business segments fail to translate into revenue in the quantities or timeline
projected, thus, having a materially adverse impact on our revenue, operating results and financial stability.
In the fourth quarter of 2019, we announced our IQ8solar microinverters and Ensemble technology. We started
production shipments of Ensemble technology and IQ8 microinverters to customers in North America during the second
quarter of 2020 and fourth quarter of 2021, respectively. Our new products are complex and require significant preparation,
precautionary safety measures, time-consuming string calculations, extensive design expertise and specialized installation
equipment, training and knowledge. Together, these factors significantly increase complexity and cost of installation and
limit overall productivity for the installer. Our installers may not have sufficient resources or expertise necessary to sell our
products at the prices, in the volumes and within the time frames that we expect, which could hinder our ability to expand
our operations and harm our revenue and operating results.
If we fail to retain our key personnel or if we fail to attract additional qualified personnel, we may not be able to
achieve our anticipated level of growth and our business could suffer.
Our future success and ability to implement our business strategy depends, in part, on our ability to attract and retain
key personnel, and on the continued contributions of members of our senior management team and key personnel in areas
such as engineering, marketing, and sales, any of whom would be difficult to replace. For example, we are highly
dependent on our president and chief executive officer, Badrinarayanan Kothandaraman. Mr. Kothandaraman possesses
technical knowledge of our business, operations and strategy, and he has substantial experience and contacts that help us
implement our goals, strategy and plan. If we lose his services or if he decides to join a competitor or otherwise compete
directly or indirectly with us, our business, operating results and financial condition could be materially harmed.
All of our employees, including our senior management, are free to terminate their employment relationships with us
at any time. Competition for highly skilled executives and employees in the technology industry is intense, and our
competitors have targeted individuals in our organization that have desired skills and experience. If we are not able to
continue to attract, train and retain our leadership team and our qualified employees necessary for our business, the
progress of our product development programs could be hindered, and we could be materially adversely affected. To help
attract, retain and motivate our executives and qualified employees, we use stock-based incentive awards, including
restricted stock units. If the value of such stock awards does not appreciate as measured by the performance of the price of
our common stock, or if our share-based compensation otherwise ceases to be viewed as a valuable benefit, our ability to
attract, retain and motivate our executives and employees could be weakened, which could harm our business and results
of operations. Also, if the value of our stock awards increases substantially, this could potentially create substantial personal
wealth for our executives and employees and affect our ability to retain our personnel. In addition, any future restructuring
plans may adversely impact our ability to attract and retain key employees.
Additionally, our ability to attract qualified personnel, including senior management and key technical personnel, is
critical to the execution of our growth strategy. Competition for qualified senior management personnel and highly skilled
individuals with technical expertise is extremely intense, and we face challenges identifying, hiring, and retaining qualified
personnel in all areas of our business. In addition, integrating new employees into our team could prove disruptive to our
operations, require substantial resources and management attention, and ultimately prove unsuccessful. Our failure to
attract and retain qualified senior management and other key technical personnel could limit or delay our strategic efforts,
which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, and prospects.TM 
TM
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 24
Table of Contents
Any failure by management to properly manage growth could have a material adverse effect on our business,
operating results, and financial condition.
Our business has grown rapidly, and if our business develops as currently expected, we anticipate that we will
continue to grow rapidly in the near future. Our expected rapid growth could place significant demands on our management,
operations, systems, accounting, internal controls and financial resources, and it may also negatively impact our ability to
retain key personnel. If we experience difficulties in any of these or other areas, we may not be able to expand our business
successfully or effectively manage our growth. Any failure by management to manage our growth and to respond to
changes in our business could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations.
If we are unsuccessful in continuing to expand our direct-to-consumer sales channel by driving purchases through
our website, our business and results of operation could be harmed.
We are subject to general business regulations and laws, as well as federal, state, foreign and provincial regulations
and laws specifically governing the internet and e-commerce. Existing and future laws and regulations may impede the
growth of the use of the internet, availability of economic broadband access, or other online services, and increase the cost
of providing our digital delivery of content and services. These regulations and laws may cover taxation, tariffs, user privacy,
data protection, pricing, content, copyrights, distribution, electronic contracts and other communications, consumer
protection, broadband internet access and the characteristics and quality of services. It is not clear how existing laws
governing issues such as property ownership, sales, use and other taxes, libel and personal privacy apply to the internet
and e-commerce. Unfavorable resolution of these issues may harm our business and results of operations.
Although we primarily sell our solutions and products directly to solar distributors, who resell to installers and
integrators, who then in turn integrate our products into complete solar PV installations for residential and commercial
system owners, we have recently invested significant resources in our direct-to-consumer sales channel through our
website, and our future growth relies, in part, on our ability to attract consumers through this channel. Expanding our direct-
to-consumer sales model will require significant expenditures in marketing, software development and infrastructure.
Further, the success of direct-to-consumer sales through our website is also subject to general business regulations and
laws, as well as federal, state, foreign and provincial regulations and laws specifically governing the internet and e-
commerce. These regulations and laws may cover taxation, tariffs, privacy, data protection, pricing, distribution, electronic
contracts and other communications, consumer protection and intellectual property. These laws and regulations can be
complex, difficult to interpret and may change over time. Continued regulatory limitations and other obstacles interfering
with our ability to sell our products directly to consumers could have a negative and material impact our business,
prospects, financial condition and results of operations.
Further, the expansion of our direct-to-consumer channel could alienate some of our existing partners and cause a
reduction in sales from these partners. Our existing partners may perceive themselves to be at a disadvantage based on
the direct-to-consumer sales offered through our website. Due to these and other factors, conflicts in our sales channels
could arise and cause our existing partners to divert resources away from the promotion and sale of our products. If we are
unable to successfully continue to drive traffic to, and increase sales through, our website, our business and results of
operations could be harmed.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 25
Table of Contents
Risks Related to our Intellectual Property and Technology
We are dependent on information technology systems, infrastructure and data. We could be subject to breaches of
our information technology systems caused by system security risks, failure of our data protection, cyber-attacks,
and erroneous or non-malicious actions or failures to act by our employees or others with authorized access to
our networks, which could cause significant reputational, legal and financial damages.
Like many companies, we use and store a wide variety of confidential and proprietary information relating to our
business. The secure maintenance of this information is critical to our business and reputation. Despite our implementation
of security measures, our systems are vulnerable to damages from computer viruses, computer denial-of-service attacks,
ransomware, supply chain attacks, worms, and other malicious software programs or other attacks, covert introduction of
malware to computers and networks, unauthorized access, including impersonation of unauthorized users, efforts to
discover and exploit any security vulnerabilities or securities weaknesses, and other similar disruptions. These types of
attacks have increased, in general, as more businesses implement remote working environments. Although we make
significant efforts to maintain the security and integrity of our information technology and related systems, and have
implemented measures to manage the risk of a security breach or disruption, there can be no assurance that our security
efforts and measures will be effective, or that attempted security breaches or disruptions would not be successful or
damaging.
The techniques used in attempted cyber-attacks and intrusions are sophisticated and constantly evolving, and may
be difficult to detect for long periods of time. We may be unable to anticipate these techniques or implement adequate
preventative measures. Although to date we have not experienced any material breaches of our systems that could have
material adverse effect on our business, attacks and intrusions on our systems will continue and we may experience a
breach of our systems that compromises sensitive company information or customer data. In addition, hardware, software,
or applications we develop or procure from third parties may contain defects in design or manufacture or other problems
that could unexpectedly compromise information security. Intentional or non-malicious breaches by employees or others
may pose a risk that sensitive data, including our intellectual property, trade secrets or personal information of our
employees, customers or users, or other business partners may be exposed to unauthorized persons or to the public, or
that risks of loss or misuse of this information could occur. Furthermore, if we experience a significant data security breach,
we could be exposed to reputational damage and significant costs, including to rebuild our systems, modify our products
and services, defend litigation, respond to government enforcement actions, pay damages or take other remedial steps, any
of which could adversely affect our business, results of operations, and financial condition. In addition, we may be required
to incur significant costs to protect against damage caused by these disruptions or security breaches in the future.
We may also share information with contractors and third-party providers to conduct our business. Although such
contractors and third-party providers typically implement encryption and authentication technologies to secure the
transmission and storage of data, those third-party providers may experience a significant data security breach, which may
also detrimentally affect our business, results of operations, and financial condition.
The effects of a security breach of privacy violation could be further amplified during the current COVID-19 pandemic.
In addition, the cost and operational consequences of implementing further data protection measures could be significant
and theft of our intellectual property or proprietary business information could require substantial expenditures to remedy.
Further, we cannot be certain that (a) our liability insurance will be sufficient in type or amount to cover us against claims
related to security breaches, cyberattacks and other related breaches; (b) such coverage will cover any indemnification
claims against us relating to any incident, will continue to be available to us on economically reasonable terms, or at all; or
(c) any insurer will not deny coverage as to any future claim. The successful assertion of one or more large claims against
us that exceed available insurance coverage, or the occurrence of changes in our insurance policies, including premium
increases or the imposition or large deductible or co-insurance requirements, could adversely affect our reputation,
business, financial condition and results of operations.
The software we use in providing system configuration recommendations or potential energy savings estimates to
customers relies in part on third party information that may not be accurate or up-to-date; this may therefore
generate inaccurate recommendations or estimates, resulting in a loss of reputation and customer confidence.
We provide our customers online tools to help them determine proper system sizing and configurations, estimates of
bill savings, and potential revenues resulting from executing a specific curtailment strategy. These
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 26
Table of Contents
estimates are in turn based on a number of factors such as customer tariff structures, estimated wholesale electricity prices
and estimates of the reduction in electricity usage as a result of a curtailment activity. If the estimates we provide prove to
be significantly different from actual payments or savings received by our customers, it may result in the loss of reputation
and/or customer confidence.
We are subject to stringent privacy laws, information security policies and contractual obligations governing the
use, processing and transfer of personal information and any unauthorized access to, or disclosure or theft of
personal information we gather, store or use could harm our reputation and subject us to claims or litigation.
We receive, store and use certain personal information of our customers, and the end-users of our customers’ solar
PV systems, including names, addresses, e-mail addresses, credit information and energy production statistics. We also
store and use personal information of our employees. We take steps to protect the security, integrity and confidentiality of
the personal information we collect, store and transmit, but there is no guarantee that inadvertent or unauthorized use or
disclosure will not occur or that third parties will not gain unauthorized access to this information despite our efforts.
Because techniques used to obtain unauthorized access or sabotage systems change frequently and generally are not
identified until they are launched against a target, we and our suppliers or vendors may be unable to anticipate these
techniques or to implement adequate preventative or mitigation measures.
We are subject to a variety of local, state, national and international laws, directives and regulations that apply to the
collection, use, retention, protection, disclosure, transfer and other processing of personal data in the different jurisdictions
in which we operate, including comprehensive regulatory systems in the U.S. and Europe. California enacted the CCPA,
which creates individual privacy rights for California consumers and increases the privacy and security obligations of entities
handling certain personal data. The CCPA went into effect on January 1, 2020, and became enforceable by the California
Attorney General on July 1, 2020. The CCPA has been amended from time to time, and, further a new privacy law, the
California Privacy Rights Act, or CPRA, was approved by California voters in the November 3, 2020 election. Effective
starting January 1, 2023, the CPRA will significantly modify the CCPA, including by expanding consumers’ rights with
respect to certain sensitive personal information. The CPRA also creates a new state agency that will be vested with
authority to implement and enforce the CCPA and the CPRA. It remains unclear what, if any, further modifications will be
made to the CCPA or CPRA, or how such legislation will be interpreted. New legislation proposed or enacted in various
other states will continue to shape the data privacy environment nationally. For example, on March 2, 2021, Virginia enacted
the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“CDPA”), which becomes effective on January 1, 2023, and on June 8, 2021,
Colorado enacted the Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”), which takes effect on July 1, 2023. The CPA and CDPA are similar to
the CCPA and CPRA but aspects of these state privacy statutes remain unclear, resulting in further legal uncertainty and
potentially requiring us to modify our data practices and policies and to incur substantial additional costs and expenses in
an effort to comply. Complying with the GDPR, CCPA, CPRA, CDPA, CPA, or other laws, regulations, amendments to or re-
interpretations of existing laws and regulations, and contractual or other obligations relating to privacy, data protection, data
transfers, data localization, or information security may require us to make changes to our services to enable us or our
customers to meet new legal requirements, incur substantial operational costs, modify our data practices and policies, and
restrict our business operations. Certain other state laws impose similar privacy obligations and all 50 states have laws
including obligations to provide notification of security breaches of computer databases that contain personal information to
affected individuals, state officers and others. Any actual or perceived failure by us to comply with these laws, regulations or
other obligations may lead to significant fines, penalties, regulatory investigations, lawsuits, significant costs for remediation,
damage to our reputation, or other liabilities.
In May 25, 2018, the European Union (“EU”), implemented the GDPR, a broad data protection framework that
expands the scope of current EU data protection law to non-EU entities that process, or control the processing of, the
personal information of EU subjects.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 27
Table of Contents
The GDPR imposes stringent requirements for controllers and processors of personal data, including, for example,
more robust disclosures to individuals and a strengthened individual data rights regime, shortened timelines for data breach
notifications, limitations on retention of information, increased requirements pertaining to special categories of data, such as
health data, and additional obligations when we contract with third-party processors in connection with the processing of the
personal data. The GDPR also imposes strict rules on the transfer of personal data out of the EU and the EEA to the United
States and other third countries. In July 2020, the Court of Justice of the European Union issued a decision that struck
down the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield framework, which provided companies with a mechanism to comply with data protection
requirements when transferring personal data from the EU to the United States and additionally called into question the
validity of the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses, on which U.S. companies rely to transfer personal
data from Europe to the United States and elsewhere. If we or our vendors fail to comply with the GDPR and the applicable
national data protection laws of the EU or EEA member states, or if regulators assert we have failed to comply with these
laws, it may lead to regulatory enforcement actions, which can result in monetary penalties of up to €20,000,000 or up to
4% of the total worldwide annual turnover of the preceding financial year, whichever is higher, and other administrative
penalties.
Further, following the United Kingdom’s withdrawal from the EU and the EEA, and the expiry of the transition period,
companies have to comply with both the GDPR and the GDPR as incorporated into the United Kingdom national law, the
Data Protection Act of 2018, the latter regime having the ability to separately fine up to the greater of £17.5 million or 4% of
global turnover. On June 28, 2021, the European Commission announced a decision of “adequacy” concluding that the UK
ensures an equivalent level of data protection to the GDPR, which provides some relief regarding the legality of continued
personal data flows from the EEA to the UK. Some uncertainty remains, however, as this adequacy determination must be
renewed after four years and may be modified or revoked in the interim. We cannot fully predict how the Data Protection
Act, the UK GDPR, and other UK data protection laws or regulations may develop in the medium to longer term nor the
effects of divergent laws and guidance regarding how data transfers to and from the UK will be regulated.
Compliance with U.S. and international data protection laws and regulations could cause us to incur substantial costs
or require us to change our business practices and compliance procedures in a manner adverse to our business. Our and
our collaborators’ and contractors’ failure to fully comply with GDPR, the CCPA and other laws could lead to significant fines
and require onerous corrective action. In addition, data security breaches experienced by us, our collaborators or
contractors could result in the loss of trade secrets or other intellectual property, public disclosure of sensitive commercial
data, and the exposure of personally identifiable information (including sensitive personal information) of our employees,
customers, collaborators and others. Compliance with these and any other applicable privacy and data security laws and
regulations is a rigorous and time-intensive process, and we may be required to put in place additional mechanisms
ensuring compliance with the new data protection rules. Furthermore, the laws are not consistent, and compliance with
various different requirements may be costly. If we fail to comply with any such laws or regulations, we may face significant
fines and penalties that could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Unauthorized use or disclosure of, or access to, any personal information maintained by us or on our behalf, whether
through breach of our systems, breach of the systems of our suppliers or vendors by an unauthorized party, or through
employee or contractor error, theft or misuse, or otherwise, could harm our business. If any such unauthorized use or
disclosure of, or access to, such personal information was to occur, our operations could be seriously disrupted, and we
could be subject to demands, claims and litigation by private parties, and investigations, related actions, and penalties by
regulatory authorities. In addition, we could incur significant costs in notifying affected persons and entities and otherwise
complying with the multitude of foreign, federal, state and local laws and regulations relating to the unauthorized access to,
or use or disclosure of, personal information. Finally, any perceived or actual unauthorized access to, or use or disclosure
of, such information could harm our reputation, substantially impair our ability to attract and retain customers and have an
adverse impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 28
Table of Contents
If we fail to protect, or incur significant costs in defending, our intellectual property and other proprietary rights,
our business and results of operations could be materially harmed.
Our success depends to a significant degree on our ability to protect our intellectual property and other proprietary
rights. We rely on a combination of patent, trademark, copyright, trade secret and unfair competition laws, as well as
confidentiality and license agreements and other contractual provisions, to establish and protect our intellectual property
and other proprietary rights. We have applied for patent and trademark registrations in the U.S. and in other countries,
some of which have been issued. We cannot guarantee that any of our pending applications will be approved or that our
existing and future intellectual property rights will be sufficiently broad to protect our proprietary technology, and any failure
to obtain such approvals or finding that our intellectual property rights are invalid or unenforceable could force us to, among
other things, rebrand or re-design our affected products. In countries where we have not applied for patent protection or
where effective intellectual property protection is not available to the same extent as in the U.S., we may be at greater risk
that our proprietary rights will be misappropriated, infringed or otherwise violated.
To protect our unregistered intellectual property, including our trade secrets and know-how, we rely in part on trade
secret laws and confidentiality and invention assignment agreements with our employees and independent contractors. We
also require other third parties who may have access to our proprietary technologies and information to enter into non-
disclosure agreements. Such measures, however, provide only limited protection, and we cannot assure that our
confidentiality and non-disclosure agreements will prevent unauthorized disclosure or use of our confidential information,
especially after our employees or third parties end their employment or engagement with us, or provide us with an adequate
remedy in the event of such disclosure. Furthermore, competitors or other third parties may independently discover our
trade secrets, copy or reverse engineer our products or portions thereof, or develop similar technology. If we fail to protect
our intellectual property and other proprietary rights, or if such intellectual property and proprietary rights are infringed,
misappropriated or otherwise violated, our business, results of operations or financial condition could be materially harmed.
In the future, we may need to take legal action to prevent third parties from infringing upon or misappropriating our
intellectual property or from otherwise gaining access to our technology. Protecting and enforcing our intellectual property
rights and determining their validity and scope could result in significant litigation costs and require significant time and
attention from our technical and management personnel, which could significantly harm our business. In addition, we may
not prevail in such proceedings. An adverse outcome of any such proceeding may reduce our competitive advantage or
otherwise harm our financial condition and our business.
We may be subject to disruptions or failures in information technology systems and network infrastructures that
could have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition.
We rely on the efficient and uninterrupted operation of complex information technology systems and network
infrastructures to operate our business. In addition, our Enlighten web-based monitoring service, which our installers and
end-user customers use to track and monitor the performance of their solar PV systems, is dependent on cloud-based
hosting services, along with the availability of WiFi or mobile data services at end-user premises. Despite testing by us, real
or perceived errors, failures or bugs in our customer solutions, software or technology or the technology or software we
license from third parties, including open source software, may not be found until our customers use our products. Real or
perceived errors, failures or bugs in our products could result in negative publicity, loss of or delay in market acceptance of
our products, harm to our brand, weakening of our competitive position or claims by customers for losses sustained by
them. A disruption, infiltration or failure of our information technology systems, third-party cloud hosting platforms or end-
user data services as a result of software or hardware malfunctions, system implementations or upgrades, computer
viruses, cyber-attacks, third-party security breaches, employee/human error, theft or misuse, malfeasance, power
disruptions, natural disasters or accidents could cause breaches of data security, failure of our Enlighten service, loss of
intellectual property and critical data and the release and misappropriation of sensitive competitive information and partner,
customer and employee personal data. We have been and may in the future be subject to fraud attempts from outside
parties through our electronic systems (such as “phishing” e-mail communications to our finance, technical or other
personnel), which could put us at risk for harm from fraud, theft or other loss if our internal controls do not operate as
intended. Any such future events could further harm our competitive position, result in a loss of customer confidence, cause
us to incur significant costs to remedy any damages and ultimately materially adversely affect our business and financial
condition.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 29
Table of Contents
Third parties may assert that we are infringing upon their intellectual property rights, which could divert
management’s attention, cause us to incur significant costs and prevent us from selling or using the technology to
which such rights relate.
Our competitors and other third parties hold numerous patents related to technology used in our industry, and claims
of patent or other intellectual property right infringement or violation have been litigated against our competitors. We may
also be subject to such claims and litigation. Regardless of their merit, responding to such claims can be time consuming,
divert management’s attention and resources, and may cause us to incur significant expenses. While we believe that our
products and technology do not infringe upon any intellectual property rights of third parties, we cannot be certain that we
would be successful in defending against any such claims. Furthermore, patent applications in the U.S. and most other
countries are confidential for a period of time before being published, so we cannot be certain that we are not infringing third
parties’ patent rights or that we were the first to conceive or protect inventions covered by our patents or patent applications.
An adverse outcome with respect to any intellectual property claim could invalidate our proprietary rights and force us to do
one or more of the following:
•obtain from a third-party claiming infringement a license to sell or use the relevant technology, which may not be
available on reasonable terms, or at all;
•stop manufacturing, selling, incorporating or using products that embody the asserted intellectual property;
•pay substantial monetary damages;
•indemnify our customers under some of our customer contracts; or
•expend significant resources to redesign the products that use the infringing technology, or to develop or acquire
non-infringing technology.
Any of these actions could result in a substantial reduction in our revenue and could result in losses over an extended
period of time.
Our failure to obtain the right to use necessary third-party intellectual property rights on reasonable terms, or our
failure to maintain, and comply with the terms and conditions applicable to these rights, could harm our business
and prospects.
We have licensed, and in the future we may choose or be required to license, technology or intellectual property from
third parties in connection with the development and marketing of our products. We cannot assure you that such licenses
will be available to us on commercially reasonable terms, or at all, and our inability to obtain such licenses could require us
to substitute technology of lower quality or of greater cost.
Further, such licenses may be non-exclusive, which could result in our competitors gaining access to the same
intellectual property. The licensing or acquisition of third party intellectual property rights is a competitive area, and other
established companies may pursue strategies to license or acquire third party intellectual property rights that we may
consider attractive or necessary. These established companies may have a competitive advantage over us due to their size,
capital resources or greater development or commercialization capabilities. In addition, companies that perceive us to be a
competitor may be unwilling to assign or license rights to us. We could encounter delays and incur significant costs, in
product or service introductions while we attempt to develop alternative products or services, or redesign our products or
services, to avoid infringing third party patents or proprietary rights. Failure to obtain any such licenses or to develop a
workaround could prevent us from commercializing products or services, and the prohibition of sale or the threat of the
prohibition of sale of any of our products or services could materially affect our business and our ability to gain market
acceptance for our products or services.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 30
Table of Contents
In addition, we incorporate open source software code in our proprietary software. Use of open source software can
lead to greater risks than use of third-party commercial software, since open source licensors generally do not provide
warranties or controls with respect to origin, functionality or other features of the software. Further, companies that
incorporate open source software into their products have, from time to time, faced claims challenging their use of open
source software and compliance with open source license terms. As a result, we could be subject to lawsuits by parties
claiming ownership of what we believe to be open source software or claiming noncompliance with open source licensing
terms. Some open source software licenses require users who distribute open source software as part of their products to
publicly disclose all or part of the source code in their software and make any derivative works of the open source code
available for limited fees or at no cost. Although we monitor our use of open source software, open source license terms
may be ambiguous, and many of the risks associated with the use of open source software cannot be eliminated. If we were
found to have inappropriately used open source software, we may be required to release our proprietary source code, re-
engineer our software, discontinue the sale of certain products in the event re-engineering cannot be accomplished on a
timely basis, or take other remedial action. Furthermore, if we are unable to obtain or maintain licenses from third parties or
fail to comply with open source licenses, we may be subject to costly third party claims of intellectual property infringement
or ownership of our proprietary source code. There is little legal precedent in this area and any actual or claimed
requirement to disclose our proprietary source code or pay damages for breach of contract could harm our business and
could help third parties, including our competitors, develop products and services that are similar to or better than ours. Any
of the above could harm our business and put us at a competitive disadvantage.
We may not be able to protect and enforce our trademarks and trade names, or build name recognition in our
markets of interest thereby harming our competitive position.
The registered or unregistered trademarks or trade names that we own may be challenged, infringed, circumvented,
declared generic, lapsed or determined to be infringing on or dilutive of other marks. We may not be able to protect our
rights in these trademarks and trade names, which we need in order to build name recognition. In addition, third parties
have filed, and may in the future file, for registration of trademarks similar or identical to our trademarks, thereby impeding
our ability to build brand identity and possibly leading to market confusion. If they succeed in registering or developing
common law rights in such trademarks, and if we are not successful in challenging such rights, we may not be able to use
these trademarks to develop brand recognition of our technologies, products or services. In addition, there could be
potential trade name or trademark infringement claims brought by owners of other registered trademarks or trademarks that
incorporate variations of our registered or unregistered trademarks or trade names. If third parties succeed they succeed in
registering such trademarks in the U.S. or other countries, and if we are not successful in challenging such third party rights,
we may not be able to use these trademarks to market our products and technologies such countries. If we do not secure
registrations for our trademarks, we may encounter more difficulty in enforcing them against third parties than we otherwise
would. If we are unable to establish name recognition based on our trademarks and trade names, we may not be able to
compete effectively, which could harm our business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. And, over the
long-term, if we are unable to establish name recognition based on our trademarks, then our marketing abilities may be
materially adversely impacted.
Obtaining and maintaining our patent protection depends on compliance with various required procedures,
document submissions, fee payments and other requirements imposed by governmental patent agencies, and our
patent protection could be reduced or eliminated for non-compliance with these requirements.
Periodic maintenance fees, renewal fees, annuity fees and various other governmental fees on patents and/or
applications will be due to be paid to the USPTO and various governmental patent agencies outside of the United States at
several stages over the lifetime of the patents and/or applications. We have systems in place to remind us to pay these
fees, and we engage an outside service and rely on our outside counsel to pay these fees due to non-U.S. patent agencies.
The USPTO and various non-U.S. governmental patent agencies require compliance with a number of procedural,
documentary, fee payment and other similar provisions during the patent application process. We employ reputable law
firms and other professionals to help us comply, and in many cases, an inadvertent lapse can be cured by payment of a late
fee or by other means in accordance with the applicable rules. However, there are situations in which non-compliance can
result in abandonment or lapse of the patent or patent application, resulting in partial or complete loss of patent rights in the
relevant jurisdiction. In such an event, our competitors may be able to enter the market without infringing our patents and
this circumstance would have a material adverse effect on our business.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 31
Table of Contents
Patent terms may be inadequate to protect our competitive position on our products for an adequate amount of
time.
Patents have a limited lifespan. In the United States, if all maintenance fees are timely paid, the natural expiration of a
patent is generally 20 years from its earliest U.S. non-provisional filing date. Various extensions may be available, but the
life of a patent, and the protection it affords, is limited. Even if patents covering our products are obtained, once the patent
life has expired, we may be open to competition from competitive products. If one of our products requires extended
development, testing and/or regulatory review, patents protecting such products might expire before or shortly after such
products are commercialized. As a result, our owned and licensed patent portfolio may not provide us with sufficient rights
to exclude others from commercializing products similar or identical to ours.
Risks related to Legal Proceedings and Regulations
Changes in current laws or regulations or the imposition of new laws or regulations, or new interpretations thereof,
in the solar energy sector or international trade, by federal or state agencies in the United States or foreign
jurisdictions could impair our ability to compete, and could materially harm our business, financial condition and
results of operations.
There has been and will continue to be regulatory uncertainty in the clean energy sector generally and the solar
energy sector in particular. Changes in current laws or regulations, or the imposition of new laws and regulations around the
world, could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, changes
in our products or further changes in tariffs, export and import laws and implementing regulations may create delays in the
introduction of new products in international markets, prevent our customers from deploying our products internationally or,
in some cases, prevent the export or import of our products to certain countries altogether.
For example, several states or territories, including California, Hawaii and Queensland, Australia, have either
implemented or are considering implementing new restrictions on incentives or rules regulating the installation of solar
power systems with which we may not be able to comply. In the event that we cannot comply with these or other new
regulations or implement a solution to such noncompliance as they arise, the total market available for our microinverter
products in such states, and our business as a result, may be adversely impacted.
While we are not aware of any other current or proposed export or import regulations that would materially restrict our
ability to sell our products in countries where we offer our products for sale, any change in export or import regulations or
related legislation, shift in approach to the enforcement or scope of existing regulations, or change in the countries, persons
or technologies targeted by these regulations, could result in decreased use of our products by, or in our decreased ability
to export or sell our products to, existing or potential customers with international operations. In such event, our business
and results of operations could be adversely affected.
Additionally, if the U.S. takes action to eliminate or reduce laws, regulations and incentives supporting solar energy,
such actions may result in a decrease in demand for solar energy in the U.S. and other geographical markets, it would harm
our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Changes in the U.S. trade environment, including the recent imposition of import tariffs, could adversely affect the
amount or timing of our revenues, results of operations or cash flows.
Escalating trade tensions between the U.S. and China have led to increased tariffs and trade restrictions, including
tariffs applicable to certain of our products. For example, in September 2018, the U.S. began assessing 10% tariffs on
certain solar products manufactured in China including our microinverter products and related accessories which are
manufactured in China. These tariffs increased to 25% in May 2019, and on January 2020, the United States and China
entered into an initial trade deal which preserves the bulk of the tariffs imposed in 2018 and maintains a threat of additional
sanctions should China breach the terms of the deal.
However, in March 2020, the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative announced certain exclusion requests related to
tariffs on Chinese imported microinverter products that fit the dimensions and weight limits within a Section 301 Tariff
exclusion (the “Tariff Exclusion”). The Tariff Exclusion applied to covered products exported from China to the United States
from September 24, 2018 until August 7, 2020. Accordingly, we sought and received refunds totaling approximately $38.9
million plus approximately $0.6 million accrued interest on tariffs previously paid from September 24, 2018 to March 31,
2020 for certain microinverters that qualify for the Tariff Exclusion. This
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 32
Table of Contents
exemption expired in August 2020, and our request to extend it has been denied. Unless U.S. policy changes, or we are
eligible for other exemptions or take other actions to avoid them, such tariffs will continue to apply to our microinverters and
other products. Such tariffs could hurt the demand for these products and materially harm our business, financial condition
and results of operations. There is no guarantee that we will be successful in obtaining exemptions or that any actions that
we may pursue with respect to the organization and operation of our business will effectively mitigate the effects of any
tariffs that apply to our business. If we are not able to avoid or mitigate the effects of such tariffs, the tariffs (or mitigating
actions we might take) could result in material additional costs to us and our suppliers, and our results of operations could
be negatively impacted as a result.
It is unknown whether and to what extent additional new tariffs or other new laws or regulations will be adopted that
increase the cost of manufacturing in China and/or importing components from China to the United States. Further, it is
unknown what effect that any such new tariffs or retaliatory actions would have on us or our industry and customers. Our
LFP lithium-ion phosphate battery cells for our storage products are supplied solely via our two suppliers in China. Although
we are in the process of searching for other suppliers outside of China for future supplies, the expertise and industry for the
LFP lithium-ion phosphate battery cell is primarily in China and we cannot be certain that we will locate additional qualified
suppliers with the right expertise to develop our battery cells outside of China, if at all.
In response to the tensions in US-China trade relations and increased tariffs, we focused efforts and resources on
attaining manufacturers outside of China, primarily in Mexico and India. The tariffs and the possibility of additional tariffs in
the future have created uncertainty in the industry. If the price of solar power systems in the United States increases, the
use of solar power systems could become less economically feasible and could reduce our gross margins or reduce the
demand of solar power systems manufactured and sold, which in turn may decrease demand for our products. Additionally,
existing or future tariffs may negatively affect key partners, suppliers, and manufacturers. Such outcomes could adversely
affect the amount or timing of our revenues, results of operations or cash flows, and continuing uncertainty could cause
sales volatility, price fluctuations or supply shortages or cause our customers to advance or delay their purchase of our
products. It is difficult to predict what further trade-related actions governments may take, which may include additional or
increased tariffs and trade restrictions, and we may be unable to quickly and effectively react to such actions. As additional
new tariffs, legislation and/or regulations are implemented, or if existing trade agreements are renegotiated or if China or
other affected countries take retaliatory trade actions, such changes could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition, results of operations or cash flows.
Our significant international operations subject us to additional risks that could adversely affect our business,
results of operations and financial condition.
We have significant international operations, including in emerging markets such as India, and we are continuing to
expand our international operations as part of our growth strategy. As of December 31, 2021, approximately 63% of our
total employees were located in India, where we primarily conduct our research and development activities, procurement,
customer support services, and other general and administrative support functions. Our current international operations and
our plans to expand our international operations have placed, and will continue to place, a strain on our employees,
management systems and other resources. We have instituted work-from-home policy which we expect will remain in effect
in the first quarter of 2022 and could extend to future quarters. We will continue to actively monitor the situation, including
progress made through vaccinations, and we will make further changes to our business operations as may be required by
federal, state, or local authorities and that we determine are in the best interests of our employees.
Our international operations may fail to succeed due to risks inherent in operating businesses internationally, such as:
•our lack of familiarity with commercial and social norms and customs in countries which may adversely affect our
ability to recruit, retain and manage employees in these countries;
•difficulties and costs associated with staffing and managing foreign operations;
•the potential diversion of management’s attention to oversee and direct operations that are geographically distant
from our U.S. headquarters;
•compliance with multiple, conflicting and changing governmental laws and regulations, including employment, tax,
privacy and data protection laws and regulations;
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 33
Table of Contents
•legal systems in which our ability to enforce and protect our rights may be different or less effective than in the
United States and in which the ultimate result of dispute resolution is more difficult to predict;
•higher employee costs and difficulty in terminating non-performing employees;
•differences in workplace cultures;
•unexpected changes in regulatory requirements;
•tariffs, export controls and other non-tariff barriers such as quotas and local content rules;
•more limited protection for intellectual property rights in some countries;
•adverse tax consequences, including as a result of transfer pricing adjustments involving our foreign operations;
•fluctuations in currency exchange rates;
•anti-bribery compliance by us or our partners;
•restrictions on the transfer of funds;
•global epidemics, pandemics, or contagious diseases; and
•new and different sources of competition.
Our failure to manage any of these risks successfully could harm our existing and future international operations and
seriously impair our overall business.
We could be adversely affected by any violations of the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and other foreign anti-bribery
laws.
The U.S. FCPA generally prohibits companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non-U.S.
government officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Other countries in which we operate also have anti-
bribery laws, some of which prohibit improper payments to government and non-government persons and entities, and
others (e.g., the FCPA and the U.K. Bribery Act) extend their application to activities outside of their country of origin. Our
policies mandate compliance with all applicable anti-bribery laws. We currently operate in, and may further expand into, key
parts of the world that have experienced governmental corruption to some degree and, in certain circumstances, strict
compliance with anti-bribery laws may conflict with local customs and practices. In addition, due to the level of regulation in
our industry, our entry into new jurisdictions through internal growth or acquisitions requires substantial government contact
where norms can differ from U.S. standards. Although, we implement policies and procedures and conduct training
designed to facilitate compliance with these anti-bribery laws, thereby mitigating the risk of violations of such laws, our
employees, subcontractors, agents and partners may take actions in violation of our policies and anti-bribery laws. Any such
violation, even if prohibited by our policies, could subject us to criminal or civil penalties or other sanctions, which could
have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, cash flows, and reputation.
From time to time we are involved in a number of legal proceedings and, while we cannot predict the outcomes of
such proceedings and other contingencies with certainty, some of these outcomes could adversely affect our
business and financial condition.
We are, or may become, involved in legal proceedings, government and agency investigations, and consumer,
employment, tort and other litigation. We cannot predict with certainty the outcomes of these legal proceedings (see
discussion of “Legal Proceedings” in Item 3, Part I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K). The outcome of some of these
legal proceeding could require us to take, or refrain from taking, actions which could negatively affect our operations or
could require us to pay substantial amounts of money adversely affecting our financial condition and results of operations.
There can also be no assurance that we are adequately insured to protect against all claims and potential liabilities.
Additionally, defending against lawsuits and legal proceedings may involve significant expense and could divert the
attention of our key personnel.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 34
Table of Contents
Risks Related to Our Financial Condition and Liquidity
Our gross profit may fluctuate over time, which could impair our ability to achieve or maintain profitability.
Our gross profit has varied in the past and is likely to continue to vary significantly from period to period. Our gross
profit may be adversely affected by numerous factors, some of which are beyond our control, including:
•changes in customer, geographic or product mix;
•increased price competition, including the impact of customer and competitor discounts and rebates;
•our ability to reduce and control product costs, including our ability to make product cost reductions in a timely
manner to offset declines in our product prices;
•warranty costs and reserves, including changes resulting from changes in estimates related to the long-term
performance of our products, product replacement costs and warranty claim rates, as well as changes in the
discount rates;
•loss of cost savings due to changes in component or raw material pricing or charges incurred due to inventory
holding periods if product demand is not correctly anticipated;
•introduction of new products;
•ordering patterns from our distributors;
•price reductions on older products to sell remaining inventory;
•component shortages and related expedited shipping costs;
•our ability to reduce production costs, such as through technology innovations, in order to offset price declines in
our products over time;
•changes in shipment volume;
•changes in distribution channels;
•excess and obsolete inventory and inventory holding charges;
•expediting costs incurred to meet customer delivery requirements;
•tariffs assessed on our products imported to the U.S. and elsewhere; and
•fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates.
Fluctuations in gross profit may adversely affect our ability to manage our business or achieve or maintain profitability.
We are under continuous pressure to reduce the prices of our products, which has adversely affected, and may
continue to adversely affect, our gross margins.
The solar power industry has been characterized by declining product prices over time. We have reduced the prices
of our products in the past, and we expect to continue to experience pricing pressure for our products in the future, including
from our major customers. In addition, we have reduced our prices ahead of planned cost reductions of our products, which
has adversely affected our gross margins. When seeking to maintain or increase their market share, our competitors may
also reduce the prices of their products. In addition, our customers may have the ability or seek to internally develop and
manufacture competing products at a lower cost than we would otherwise charge, which would add additional pressure on
us to lower our selling prices. If we are unable to offset any future reductions in our average selling prices by increasing our
sales volume, reducing our costs and expenses or introducing new products, our gross margins would continue to be
adversely affected.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 35
Table of Contents
Given the general downward pressure on prices for our products driven by competitive pressure and technological
change, a principal component of our business strategy is reducing the costs to manufacture our products to remain
competitive. If our competitors are able to drive down their manufacturing costs faster than we can or increase the efficiency
of their products, our products may become less competitive even when adjusted for efficiency, and we may be forced to
sell our products at a price lower than our cost. Further, if raw materials costs and other third-party component costs were to
increase, we may not meet our cost reduction targets. If we cannot effectively execute our cost reduction roadmap, we may
not be able to remain price competitive, which would result in lost market share and lower gross margins.
A drop in the retail price of electricity derived from the utility grid or from alternative energy sources, or a change
in utility pricing structures, may harm our business, financial condition and results of operations.
We believe that a system owner’s decision to purchase a solar PV system is strongly influenced by the cost of
electricity generated by solar PV installations relative to the retail price of electricity from the utility grid and the cost of other
renewable energy sources, including electricity from solar PV installations using central inverters. Decreases in the retail
prices of electricity from the utility grid would make it more difficult for all solar PV systems to compete. In particular, growth
in unconventional natural gas production and an increase in global liquefied natural gas capacity are expected to keep
natural gas prices relatively low for the foreseeable future. Persistent low natural gas prices, lower prices of electricity
produced from other energy sources, such as nuclear power or coal-fired plants, or improvements to the utility infrastructure
could reduce the retail price of electricity from the utility grid, making the purchase of solar PV systems less economically
attractive and depressing sales of our products. In addition, energy conservation technologies and public initiatives to
reduce demand for electricity also could cause a fall in the retail price of electricity from the utility grid.
Moreover, technological developments by our competitors in the solar industry, including manufacturers of central
inverters and DC-to-DC optimizers, could allow these competitors or their partners to offer electricity at costs lower than
those that can be achieved from solar PV installations based on our product platform, which could result in reduced demand
for our products. Additionally, as increasing adoption of distributed generation places pressure on traditional utility business
models or utility infrastructure, utilities may change their pricing structures to increase the cost of installation or operation of
solar distributed generation. Such measures can include grid access fees, costly or lengthy interconnection studies,
limitations on distributed generation penetration levels, or other measures. If the cost of electricity generated by solar PV
installations incorporating our solutions is high relative to the cost of electricity from other sources, our business, financial
condition and results of operations may be harmed.
If we do not forecast demand for our products accurately, we may experience product shortages, delays in product
shipment, excess product inventory, difficulties in planning expenses or disputes with suppliers, any of which will
adversely affect our business and financial condition.
We manufacture our products according to our estimates of customer demand. This process requires us to make
multiple forecasts and assumptions relating to the demand of our distributors, their end customers and general market
conditions. Because we sell most of our products to distributors, who in turn sell to their end customers, we have limited
visibility as to end-customer demand. We depend significantly on our distributors to provide us visibility into their end-
customer demand, and we use these forecasts to make our own forecasts and planning decisions. If the information from
our distributors turns out to be incorrect, then our own forecasts may also be inaccurate. Furthermore, we do not have long-
term purchase commitments from our distributors or end customers, and our sales are generally made by purchase orders
that may be canceled, changed or deferred without notice to us or penalty. As a result, it is difficult to forecast future
customer demand to plan our operations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 36
Table of Contents
If we overestimate demand for our products, or if purchase orders are canceled or shipments are delayed, we may
have excess inventory that we cannot sell. We may have to make significant provisions for inventory write-downs based on
events that are currently not known, and such provisions or any adjustments to such provisions could be material. We may
also become involved in disputes with our suppliers who may claim that we failed to fulfill forecast or minimum purchase
requirements. Conversely, if we underestimate demand, we may not have sufficient inventory to meet end-customer
demand, and we may lose market share, damage relationships with our distributors and end customers and forgo potential
revenue opportunities. Obtaining additional supply in the face of product shortages may be costly or impossible, particularly
in the short term due to the COVID-19 pandemic and in light of our outsourced manufacturing processes, which could
prevent us from fulfilling orders in a timely and cost-efficient manner or at all. In addition, if we overestimate our production
requirements, our contract manufacturers may purchase excess components and build excess inventory. If our contract
manufacturers, at our request, purchase excess components that are unique to our products and are unable to recoup the
costs of such excess through resale or return or build excess products, we could be required to pay for these excess parts
or products and recognize related inventory write-downs.
In addition, we plan our operating expenses, including research and development expenses, hiring needs and
inventory investments, in part on our estimates of customer demand and future revenue. If customer demand or revenue for
a particular period is lower than we expect, we may not be able to proportionately reduce our fixed operating expenses for
that period, which would harm our operating results for that period.
Our focus on a limited number of specific markets increases risks associated with the modification, elimination or
expiration of governmental subsidies and economic incentives for on-grid solar electricity applications.
To date, we have generated the majority of our revenues from North America, and a substantial majority of our
revenues come from the U.S., and revenues generated from the U.S. market have represented 80%, 82% and 84% of our
total revenue for annual period ending on December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively. We also expect to continue to
generate a substantial amount of our revenues from North America in the future.
There are a number of important incentives (including U.S. federal and state tax incentives) that are expected to
phase-out or terminate in the future, which could adversely affect sales of our products in North America and other markets.
For instance, the Renewable Energy and Job Creation Act of 2008 provided a 30% federal tax credit for residential and
commercial solar installations through December 31, 2019, which was reduced to a tax credit of 26% for any solar energy
system that began construction during 2020 through December 31, 2022, and 22% thereafter to December 31, 2023 before
being reduced to 10% for commercial installations and 0% for residential installations beginning on January 1, 2024. As a
result, several of our customers explored opportunities to purchase products in 2019 to take advantage of safe harbor
guidance from the IRS published in June 2018, allowing them to preserve the historical 30% investment tax credit for solar
equipment purchased in 2019 for solar projects that are completed after December 31, 2019. These tax credits could be
reduced or eliminated as part of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the “Code”), changes or regulatory
reform initiatives by the current Congress or the new presidential administration.
In addition, net energy metering tariffs are being evaluated and, in some instances modified, which may have a
negative impact on future inverter sales. We derive a significant portion of our revenues from California’s residential solar
market and the existing California net energy metering tariff has been very successful in incentivizing the installation of
residential solar power systems. Future legislative or regulatory changes in California, such as the current NEM 3.0
proposal, may discourage further growth in the residential solar market.
A number of European countries, including Germany, Belgium, Italy and the United Kingdom have adopted reductions
in or concluded their net energy metering or FiT programs. Certain countries have proposed or enacted taxes levied on
renewable energy. These and related developments have significantly impacted the solar industry in Europe and may
adversely affect the future demand for the solar energy solutions in Europe.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 37
Table of Contents
We also sell our products in Australia. In 2012 Australia enacted a Renewable Energy Target that is intended to
ensure that 33,000 Gigawatt-hours of Australia’s electricity comes from renewable sources by 2020. This policy supports
both the installation of large-scale centralized renewable generation projects, along with small-scale systems of under
100kW each for residential and small business customers. This target was met in 2019; however, the scheme continues to
require high-energy users to meet their obligations under the policy until 2030. During 2018, the states of Victoria and South
Australia introduced state-based incentive schemes, aimed at solar customers in the state of Victoria and battery storage in
the state of South Australia. Other Australian states and territories introduced similar programs in 2019. Any change in, or
failure to implement, these programs may adversely affect the demand for solar energy solutions in Australia.
U.S. federal and state tax credits, grants and other incentive programs have had a positive effect on our sales since
inception. However, unless these programs are further extended or modified to allow for continued growth in the residential
solar market, the phase-out of such programs could adversely affect sales of our products in the future. Reductions in
incentives and uncertainty around future energy policy, including local content requirements, have negatively affected and
may continue to negatively affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations as we seek to increase our
business domestically and abroad. Additionally, as we further expand to other countries, changes in incentive programs or
electricity policies could negatively affect returns on our investments in those countries as well as our business, financial
condition, and results of operations.
Our portfolio of marketable securities is subject to market, interest and credit risk that may reduce its value.
As of December 31, 2021, we had approximately $897.3 million in debt security investments. These investments
consisted primarily of money market funds, U.S. Treasuries, U.S. government securities, commercial paper and debt
securities of corporations. We currently do not use derivative financial instruments to adjust our investment portfolio risk or
income profile. These investments, as well as any cash deposited in bank accounts, are subject to general credit, liquidity,
market and interest rate risks, which may be exacerbated by unusual events, such as the COVID-19 pandemic and the U.S.
debt ceiling crisis, which affected various sectors of the financial markets and led to global credit and liquidity issues. If the
global credit market continues to experience volatility or deteriorates, our investment portfolio may be impacted and some
or all of our investments may experience other-than-temporary impairment, which could adversely impact our operating
results and position.
Risks Related to our Acquisition Activity
We may fail to realize some or all of the anticipated benefits of the SunPower transaction which may result in
conflicts between us and SunPower.
Our ability to realize the anticipated benefits of the SunPower transaction will depend, to a large extent, on our ability
to successfully execute the terms of the SunPower Master Supply Agreement (“MSA”), which is a complex and time-
consuming process. Any delay, failure or breach of obligations under the MSA could adversely impact the expected benefits
of the transaction and could otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of
operations. Additionally, in connection with the SunPower APA transaction, SunPower acquired 7.5 million shares of our
common stock in August 2018 and the right to designate one member of our board of directors. As of December 31, 2021,
SunPower held 2.5 million shares of our common stock.
As part of growing our business, we have made and expect to continue to make acquisitions. If we fail to
successfully select, execute or integrate our acquisitions, then our business and operating results could be
harmed and our stock price could decline.
From time to time, we will undertake acquisitions to add new product lines and technologies, gain new sales channels
or enter new sales territories. For example, we acquired Sofdesk, the solar design business of DIN, 365 Pronto and
ClipperCreek. Acquisitions involve numerous risks and challenges, including but not limited to the following:
•integrating the companies, assets, systems, products, sales channels and personnel that we acquire;
•higher than anticipated acquisition and integration costs and expenses;
•reliance on third parties to provide transition services for a period of time after closing to ensure an orderly transition
of the business;
•growing or maintaining revenues to justify the purchase price and the increased expenses associated with
acquisitions;
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 38
Table of Contents
•entering into territories or markets with which we have limited or no prior experience;
•establishing or maintaining business relationships with customers, vendors and suppliers who may be new to us;
•overcoming the employee, customer, vendor and supplier turnover that may occur as a result of the acquisition;
•disruption of, and demands on, our ongoing business as a result of integration activities including diversion of
management's time and attention from running the day to day operations of our business;
•inability to implement uniform standards, disclosure controls and procedures, internal controls over financial
reporting and other procedures and policies in a timely manner;
•inability to realize the anticipated benefits of or successfully integrate with our existing business the businesses,
products, technologies or personnel that we acquire; and
•potential post-closing disputes.
As part of undertaking an acquisition, we may also significantly revise our capital structure or operational budget,
such as issuing common stock that would dilute the ownership percentage of our stockholders, assuming liabilities or debt,
utilizing a substantial portion of our cash resources to pay for the acquisition or significantly increasing operating expenses.
Our acquisitions have resulted and may in the future result in charges being taken in an individual quarter as well as future
periods, which results in variability in our quarterly earnings. In addition, our effective tax rate in any particular quarter may
also be impacted by acquisitions. Following the closing of an acquisition, we may also have disputes with the seller
regarding contractual requirements and covenants, purchase price adjustments, contingent payments or for indemnifiable
losses. Any such disputes may be time consuming and distract management from other aspects of our business. In
addition, if we increase the pace or size of acquisitions, we will have to expend significant management time and effort into
the transactions and integrations, and we may not have the proper human resources bandwidth to ensure successful
integrations and accordingly, our business could be harmed or the benefits of our acquisitions may not be realized.
As part of the terms of an acquisition, we may commit to pay additional contingent consideration if certain revenue or
other performance milestones are met. We are required to evaluate the fair value of such commitments at each reporting
date and adjust the amount recorded if there are changes to the fair value.
We cannot ensure that we will be successful in selecting, executing and integrating acquisitions. Failure to manage
and successfully integrate acquisitions could materially harm our business and operating results. In addition, if stock market
analysts or our stockholders do not support or believe in the value of the acquisitions that we choose to undertake, our
stock price may decline.
We invest in companies for both strategic and financial reasons but may not realize a return on our investments.
We have made, and continue to seek to make, investments in companies around the world to further our strategic
objectives and support our key business initiatives. These investments may include equity or debt instruments of public or
private companies and may be non-marketable at the time of our initial investment. We do not restrict the types of
companies in which we seek to invest. These companies may range from early-stage companies that are often still defining
their strategic direction to more mature companies with established revenue streams and business models. If any company
in which we invest fails, we could lose all or part of our investment in that company. If we determine that an other-than-
temporary decline in the fair value exists for an equity or debt investment in a public or private company in which we have
invested, we will have to write down the investment to its fair value and recognize the related write-down as an investment
loss. The performance of any of these investments could result in significant impairment charges and gains (losses) on
other equity investments. We must also analyze accounting and legal issues when making these investments. If we do not
structure these investments properly, we may be subject to certain unfavorable accounting impact, such as potential
consolidation of financial results.
Furthermore, if the strategic objectives of an investment have been achieved, or if the investment or business
diverges from our strategic objectives, we may seek to dispose of the investment. Our non-marketable equity investments in
private companies are not liquid, and we may not be able to dispose of these investments on favorable terms or at all. The
occurrence of any of these events could harm our results. Gains or losses from equity securities could vary from
expectations depending on gains or losses realized on the sale or exchange of securities and impairment charges related to
debt instruments as well as equity and other investments.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 39
Table of Contents
An impairment in the carrying value of goodwill or other intangible and long-lived assets could negatively affect
our operating results.
We record goodwill from the purchase consideration paid in excess of the fair value of the net assets recorded in
connection with a business acquisition. We may not realize all the economic benefit from our business acquisitions, which
could result in an impairment of goodwill or intangibles. As of December 31, 2021, goodwill and amortizable intangible
assets were approximately $181.3 million and $97.8 million, respectively. We test goodwill for impairment at least annually
during the fourth quarter of each fiscal year or between annual tests if an event occurs or circumstances change that would
indicate the carrying amount may be impaired. Goodwill is tested at the reporting unit level, which we have determined to be
the same as the entity as a whole (entity level). We first perform a qualitative assessment to determine whether it is more
likely than not that the fair value of our reporting unit is less than its carrying value. If, after assessing the qualitative factors,
we determine that it is more likely than not that the fair value of our reporting unit is less than its carrying value, an
impairment analysis will be performed.
Qualitative factors include industry and market consideration, overall financial performance, share price trends and
market capitalization and Company-specific events. We may be required to record a significant charge in our financial
statements during the period in which any impairment of our goodwill or amortizable intangible assets is determined, which
would negatively impact our operating results.
Risks Related to our Debt and Equity Securities
Conversion of our Convertible Notes may dilute the ownership interest of existing stockholders or may otherwise
depress the price of our common stock, adversely affect our financial condition and operating results.
In March 2021, we issued and sold a total of $575.0 million aggregate principal amount of our 0.0% convertible senior
notes due 2028 (the “Notes due 2028”) and $632.5 million aggregate principal amount of our 0.0% convertible senior notes
due 2026 (the “Notes due 2026”).
In March 2020, we issued and sold a total of $320.0 million aggregate principal amount of our 0.25% convertible
senior notes due 2025 (the “Notes due 2025”).
In June 2019, we issued and sold a total of $132.0 million aggregate principal amount of our 1.0% convertible senior
notes due 2024 (the “Notes due 2024”). During the period ended December 31, 2021, the remaining $88.1 million
aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024 were converted and, as of December 31, 2021, Notes due 2024 are no
longer outstanding.
In August 2018, we issued and sold a total of $65.0 million aggregate principal amount of our 4.0% convertible senior
notes due 2023 (the “Notes due 2023”) in a private placement to qualified institutional buyers and an affiliate of ours. In May
2019, we entered into separately and privately negotiated transactions with certain holders of the Notes due 2023 resulting
in the repurchase and exchange of $60.0 million aggregate principal amount of the notes in consideration for the issuance
of shares of common stock and separate cash payments.
The Conversion Condition for the Notes due 2025 was met during the quarter ended December 31, 2021. Therefore,
the Notes due 2025 became convertible at the holders’ option beginning on January 1, 2022 and continue to be convertible
through March 31, 2022. Accordingly, we have classified the net carrying amount of the Notes due 2025 of $86.1 million as
debt, current on the consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2021.
We may receive conversion requests that require settlement in the first quarter of 2022. If more holders elect to
convert their Notes due 2025 in future periods, we intend to settle all or a portion of our conversion obligation related to the
aggregate principal amount in cash, which could adversely affect our liquidity and result in a material adverse effect on our
financial position, results of operations and cash flows. In addition, to the extent we receive conversion requests, we may
also record a loss on early conversions of the Notes due 2025 converted by note holders based on the difference between
the fair market value allocated to the liability component on the settlement date and the net carrying amount of the liability
component and unamortized debt issuance on the settlement date.
As of December 31, 2021,
•$575.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2028 were outstanding; (the foregoing, collectively, the
“2028 Convertible Notes”);
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 40
Table of Contents
•$632.5 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2026 were outstanding; (the foregoing, collectively, the
“2026 Convertible Notes”);
•$102.2 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025 were outstanding; (the foregoing, collectively, the
“2025 Convertible Notes”);
•$5.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2023 were outstanding; (the foregoing, collectively, the
“2023 Convertible Notes”, together with the 2028 Convertible Notes, the 2026 Convertible Notes and the 2025
Convertible Notes, the “Convertible Notes”).
The conversion of some or all of the Convertible Notes may dilute the ownership interests of existing stockholders.
Any sales in the public market of the common stock issuable upon such conversion could adversely affect prevailing market
prices of our common stock. In addition, the existence of the Convertible Notes may encourage short selling by market
participants because the conversion of the Convertible Notes could be used to satisfy short positions. In addition, the
anticipated conversion of the Convertible Notes into shares of our common stock could depress the price of our common
stock.
Servicing our debts requires a significant amount of cash, and we may not have sufficient cash flow from our
business to pay our debts.
Our ability to make scheduled payments of the principal of, to pay interest on or to refinance our indebtedness,
including the Convertible Notes, depends on our future performance, which is subject to economic, financial, competitive
and other factors beyond our control. Our business may not continue to generate cash flow from operations in the future
sufficient to service our debts, including the Convertible Notes, and make necessary capital expenditures. If we are unable
to generate cash flow, we may be required to adopt one or more alternatives, such as selling assets, restructuring debt or
obtaining additional equity capital on terms that may be onerous or highly dilutive. Our ability to refinance our indebtedness,
including the Convertible Notes, will depend on the capital markets and our financial condition at such time. We may not be
able to engage in any of those activities or engage in these activities on desirable terms, which could result in a default on
our debt obligations, including our obligations under the Convertible Notes.
We may not have the ability to raise the funds necessary to settle conversions of the Convertible Notes or
repurchase the Convertible Note upon a fundamental change, and our future debt may contain limitations on our
ability to pay cash upon conversion or repurchase of the Convertible Notes.
Holders of our Convertible Notes will have the right to require us to repurchase their Convertible Notes upon the
occurrence of a fundamental change at a fundamental change repurchase price equal to 100% of the principal amount of
the Convertible Notes to be repurchased, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any. Fundamental change is defined in the
Convertible Notes Indenture entered into in connection with the financing and consists of events such as an acquisition of a
majority of our outstanding common stock, an acquisition of our company or substantially all of our assets, the approval by
our stockholders of a plan of liquidation or dissolution, or our common stock no longer being listed on the Nasdaq Global
Select Market or the Nasdaq Global Market. Upon conversion of the Convertible Notes, unless we elect to deliver solely
shares of our common stock to settle such conversion (other than paying cash in lieu of delivering any fractional share), we
will be required to make cash payments in respect of the Convertible Notes being converted. However, we may not have
enough available cash or be able to obtain financing at the time we are required to make such repurchase of the
Convertible Notes. In addition, our ability to repurchase the Convertible Notes or to pay cash upon conversion of the
Convertible Notes may be limited by law, by regulatory authority or by agreements governing our future indebtedness. Our
failure to repurchase notes at a time when the repurchase is required by the relevant indenture or to pay any cash payable
on future conversions of the notes as required by the relevant indenture would constitute a default under the relevant
indenture. A default under the indenture or a fundamental change itself could also lead to a default under agreements
governing our future indebtedness. If the repayment of the related indebtedness were to be accelerated after any applicable
notice or grace periods, we may not have sufficient funds to repay the indebtedness and repurchase the Convertible Notes
or make cash payments upon conversion of the Convertible Notes.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 41
Table of Contents
The convertible note hedge and warrant transactions and/or their early termination may affect the value of our
common stock.
In connection with the offering of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025, we entered into privately
negotiated convertible note hedge transactions pursuant to which we have the option to purchase approximately the same
number of shares of our common stock initially issuable upon conversion of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes
due 2025, at a price approximately the same as the initial conversion price of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and
Notes due 2025. These transactions are expected to reduce the potential dilution with respect to our common stock upon
conversion of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025. Separately, we also entered into privately
negotiated warrant transactions to acquire the same number of shares of our common stock initially issuable upon
conversion of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025 (subject to customary anti-dilution adjustments) at
an initial strike price of approximately $397.91, $397.91 and $106.94 per share for Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and
Notes due 2025, respectively. If the market value per share of our common stock, as measured under the warrants,
exceeds the strike price of the warrants, the warrants will have a dilutive effect on the ownership interests of existing
stockholders and on our earnings per share, unless we elect, subject to certain conditions, to settle the warrants in cash.
However, we may not have enough available cash or be able to obtain financing at the time of settlement.
In addition, the existence of the convertible note hedge and warrant transactions may encourage purchasing and
selling share of our common stock, or other of our securities and instruments, in open market and/or privately negotiated
transactions in order to modify hedge positions. Any of these activities could adversely affect the value of our common stock
and the value of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025.
Changes in current accounting methods, standards, or regulations applicable to the Convertible Notes due 2028,
Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025 could have a material impact on our reported financial results, future financial
results, future cash flows, and/or our stock price.
Under Accounting Standards Codification (“ASC”) 470-20, “Debt with Conversion and Other Options,” an entity must
separately account for the host contract and conversion option associated with convertible debt instruments, such as the
Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025, that may be settled entirely or partially in cash upon conversion, in a
manner that reflects the issuer’s economic interest cost. For Notes due 2028 and Notes due 2026, conversion option meets
the classification of an equity component, hence we have included the equity component in the additional paid-in capital
section of stockholders’ equity on our condensed consolidated balance sheet at the issuance date. For Notes due 2025,
conversion option met the classification of an embedded derivative liability, from March 9, 2020 to May 19, 2020, and hence
we had included embedded derivative liability in the Debt, non-current on our condensed consolidated balance sheet at the
issuance date. Effective upon the filing of an amendment to our certificate of incorporation on May 20, 2020, the conversion
option of the Notes due 2025 met the classification of an equity component, hence we reclassified the embedded derivative
liability in the Debt, non-current to additional paid-in capital section of stockholders’ equity on our condensed consolidated
balance sheet on May 20, 2020. This change in fair value of derivatives has resulted in a charge recognized of $44.3 million
for the year ended December 31, 2020. We have treated the value of the equity component and embedded derivative
liability as debt discount for the host contract at the issuance date. We are required to amortize the debt discount as non-
cash interest expense over the term of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025, which could adversely
affect our reported or future financial results or the trading price of our common stock.
In addition, we use the treasury stock method for convertible debt instruments (such as the Notes due 2028 and
Notes due 2026 since the date of issuance and Notes due 2025 since May 20, 2020) that may be settled entirely or partly in
cash, and the effect of which is that any shares issuable upon conversion of the notes are not included in the calculation of
diluted earnings per share except to the extent that the conversion value of such notes exceeds their principal amount. In
August 2020, the FASB issued Account Standard Update (“ASU”) 2020-06, “Debt - Debt with Conversion and Other Options
(subtopic 470-20),” effective January 1, 2022, which requires the Notes due 2028 and Notes due 2026 to be accounted for
as a single liability measured at its amortized cost. Interest expense associated with the Notes due 2028 and Notes due
2026 recorded in the consolidated statements of operations will be close to the coupon rate interest expense. Further, for
the diluted earnings per share calculation, treasury stock method will no longer be permitted for the Notes due 2028 and
Notes due 2026. The if-converted method will be used for the calculation of the diluted earnings per share calculation, when
accounting for the shares issuable upon conversion of the Notes due 2028 and Notes due 2026, which will adversely affect
our diluted earnings per share.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 42
Table of Contents
ASU 2016-15, “Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230): Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments,”
clarifies how certain cash receipts and payments should be classified in the statement of cash flows, including the cash
settlement for the Notes due 2025 and Notes due 2024. Upon cash settlement, repayment of the principal amount of the
Notes due 2025 and Notes due 2024 will be bifurcated between cash outflows for operating activities for the portion related
to accreted interest attributable to debt discounts arising from the difference between the coupon interest rate and the
effective interest rate, and financing activities for the remainder. This will require us to classify the debt discount totaling
$68.7 million for Notes due 2025 and $36.4 million for the Notes due 2024 of accreted interest as cash used in operating
activities in our consolidated statement of cash flows upon cash settlement, which could adversely affect our future cash
flow from operations. In our consolidated statement of cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2021, $15.7 million of
the debt discount associated with the conversion of $217.8 million and $88.1 million in aggregate principal amount of the
Notes due 2025 and Notes due 2024, respectively, was classified as cash used in operating activities.
The market price of our common stock may be volatile or may decline regardless of our operating performance.
The market price of our common stock has been and could be subject to wide fluctuations in response to, among
other things, the other risk factors described herein, and other factors beyond our control, such as quarterly variations in
operating results, announcements of technology innovations or new products by us or our competitors, changes in financial
estimates and recommendations by securities analysts, the operating and stock price performance of other companies that
investors may deem comparable to us, and new reports relating to trends in our markets or general economic conditions.
These fluctuations often have been unrelated or disproportionate to the operating performance of those companies. These
broad market and industry fluctuations, as well as general economic, political and market conditions, such as recessions,
interest rate changes or international currency fluctuations, may negatively affect the market price of our common stock,
regardless of our operating performance.
In addition, in the past, many companies that have experienced volatility in the market price of their stock have been
subject to securities class action litigation. We may become the target of this type of litigation in the future. Securities
litigation against us could result in substantial costs and divert our management’s attention from other business concerns,
which could seriously harm our business.
Our financial results may vary significantly from quarter to quarter due to a number of factors, which may lead to
volatility in our stock price.
Our quarterly revenue and results of operations have varied in the past and may continue to vary significantly from
quarter to quarter. As a result, the trading price of our common stock has been, and is likely to continue to be, volatile and
could be subject to wide fluctuations in response to various factors, some of which are beyond our control. In addition, the
trading prices of the securities of solar companies in general have been highly volatile, and the volatility in market price and
trading volume of securities is often unrelated or disproportionate to the financial performance of the companies issuing the
securities. Factors affecting the market price of our common stock, some of which are beyond our control, include:
•seasonal and other fluctuations in demand for our products;
•the timing, volume and product mix of sales of our products, which may have different average selling prices or
profit margins;
•changes in our pricing and sales policies or the pricing and sales policies of our competitors;
•the impacts and the evolving effects of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic on our business, sales and results of
operations;
•our ability to design, manufacture and deliver products to our customers in a timely and cost-effective manner and
that meet customer requirements;
•our ability to manage our relationships with our contract manufacturers, customers and suppliers;
•quality control or yield problems in our manufacturing operations;
•the anticipation, announcement or introductions of new or enhanced products by our competitors and ourselves;
•reductions in the retail price of electricity;
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 43
Table of Contents
•changes in laws, regulations and policies applicable to our business and products, particularly those relating to
government incentives for solar energy applications;
•the impact of tariffs on the solar industry in general and our products in particular;
•unanticipated increases in costs or expenses;
•the amount and timing of operating costs and capital expenditures related to the maintenance and expansion of
our business operations;
•the impact of government-sponsored programs on our customers;
•our exposure to the credit risks of our customers, particularly in light of the fact that some of our customers are
relatively new entrants to the solar market without long operating or credit histories and impacts of the COVID-19
pandemic they may experience;
•our ability to estimate future warranty obligations due to product failure rates, claim rates or replacement costs;
•our ability to forecast our customer demand and manufacturing requirements, and manage our inventory;
•fluctuations in our gross profit;
•our ability to predict our revenue and plan our expenses appropriately;
•fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates;
•announcement of acquisitions or dispositions of our assets or business operations;
•issuances of our common stock or equity-linked securities such as the Convertible Notes;
•changes in our management;
•technical factors in the public trading market for our common stock that may produce price movements that may
or may not comport to macro, industry or company-specific fundamentals, including, without limitation, the
sentiment of retail investors (including as may be expressed on financial trading and other social media sites), the
amount and status of short interest in our securities, access to margin debt, trading in options and other
derivatives on our common stock and any related hedging or other technical trading factors;
•general economic conditions and changes in such conditions specific to our target markets; and
•actions by research analysts, such as if they issue unfavorable commentary or downgrade our common stock or
cease publishing reports about us or our business.
The above factors are difficult to forecast, and these, as well as other factors, could materially and adversely affect
our quarterly and annual results of operations. Any failure to adjust spending quickly enough to compensate for a revenue
shortfall could magnify the adverse impact of this revenue shortfall on our results of operations. Moreover, our results of
operations may not meet our announced guidance or the expectations of research analysts or investors, in which case the
price of our common stock could decrease significantly. There can be no assurance that we will be able to successfully
address these risks.
If research analysts do not publish research about our business or if they issue unfavorable commentary or
downgrade our common stock, our stock price and trading volume could decline.
The trading market for our common stock depends in part on the research and reports that research analysts publish
about us and our business. The price of our common stock could decline if one or more research analysts downgrade our
stock or if those analysts issue other unfavorable commentary or cease publishing reports about us or our business. If one
or more of the research analysts ceases coverage of our company or fails to publish reports on us regularly, demand for our
common stock could decrease, which could cause our stock price or trading volume to decline.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 44
Table of Contents
We may not be able to raise additional capital to execute on our current or future business opportunities on
favorable terms, if at all, or without dilution to our stockholders.
We believe that our existing cash and cash equivalents and cash flows from our operating activities will be sufficient
to meet our anticipated cash needs for at least the next 12 months. However, we may need to raise additional capital or
debt financing to execute on our current or future business strategies, including to:
•provide additional cash reserves to support our operations;
•invest in our research and development efforts;
•expand our operations into new product markets and new geographies;
•acquire complementary businesses, products, services or technologies; or
•otherwise pursue our strategic plans and respond to competitive pressures, including adjustments to our business
to mitigate the effects of any tariffs that might apply to us or our industry.
We do not know what forms of financing, if any, will be available to us. If financing is not available on acceptable
terms, if and when needed, our ability to fund our operations, enhance our research and development and sales and
marketing functions, develop and enhance our products, respond to unanticipated events and opportunities, or otherwise
respond to competitive pressures would be significantly limited. In any such event, our business, financial condition and
results of operations could be materially harmed, and we may be unable to continue our operations. Moreover, if we raise
additional funds through the issuance of equity or convertible debt securities, the percentage ownership of our stockholders
could be significantly diluted, and these newly issued securities may have rights, preferences or privileges senior to those of
existing stockholders.
Sales of a substantial number of shares of our common stock in the public market by our existing stockholders
could cause our stock price to fall.
Sales of a substantial number of shares of our common stock in the public market or the perception that these sales
might occur, could depress the market price of our common stock and could impair our ability to raise capital through the
sale of additional equity securities. We are unable to predict the effect that sales may have on the prevailing market price of
our common stock. All of the outstanding shares of our common stock are eligible for sale in the public market, subject in
some cases to agreed limits on sale volumes and the volume limitations and manner of sale requirements of Rule 144
under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”). Sales of stock by our stockholders could have a
material adverse effect on the trading price of our common stock.
Certain holders of our securities are entitled to rights with respect to the registration of their shares under the
Securities Act. Registration of these shares under the Securities Act would result in the shares becoming freely tradable
without restriction under the Securities Act.
Manipulative techniques employed by short sellers may drive down the market price of our common stock.
Short selling is the practice of selling securities that the seller does not own, but rather has borrowed from a third
party with the intention of buying identical securities back at a later date to return to the lender. Short sellers hope to profit
from a decline in the value of the securities between the sale of the borrowed securities and the purchase of the
replacement shares, as the short seller expects to pay less in that purchase than it received in the sale. As it is in the short
seller’s best interests for the price of the stock to decline, some short sellers publish, or arrange for the publication of,
negative opinions regarding the issuer and its business prospects in order to create negative market momentum and
generate profits for themselves after selling a stock short. The use of the Internet, social media, and blogging have allowed
short sellers to publicly attack a company’s credibility, strategy and veracity by means of so-called “research reports” that
mimic the type of investment analysis performed by legitimate securities research analysts. These short attacks have in the
past led to stock price declines and significant selling activity in our common stock. Issuers with limited trading volumes or
substantial retail shareholder bases can be particularly susceptible to higher volatility levels, and can be particularly
vulnerable to such short attacks.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 45
Table of Contents
Short seller publications are not regulated by any governmental, self-regulatory organization or other official authority
in the U.S., are not subject to the certification requirements imposed by the SEC in Regulation Analyst Certification and,
accordingly, the opinions they express may be based on distortions of actual facts or, in some cases, outright fabrications.
In light of the limited risks involved in publishing such information, and the significant profits that can be made from running
successful short attacks, short sellers have issued such reports on our stock and will likely continue to issue such reports.
Such short-seller attacks may cause our stock to suffer a decline in market price.
We currently do not intend to pay dividends on our common stock and, consequently, your only opportunity to
achieve a return on your investment is if the price of our common stock appreciates.
We currently do not plan to declare dividends on shares of our common stock in the foreseeable future. In addition,
our term loan agreement restricts our ability to pay dividends. Consequently, an investor’s only opportunity to achieve a
return on its investment in our company will be if the market price of our common stock appreciates and the investor sells its
shares at a profit.
Our charter documents and Delaware law could prevent a takeover that stockholders consider favorable and could
also reduce the market price of our stock.
Our certificate of incorporation and our bylaws contain provisions that could delay or prevent a change in control of
our company. These provisions could also make it more difficult for stockholders to elect directors and take other corporate
actions, including effecting changes in our management. These provisions include:
•providing for a classified board of directors with staggered, three-year terms, which could delay the ability of
stockholders to change the membership of a majority of our board of directors;
•not providing for cumulative voting in the election of directors, which limits the ability of minority stockholders to
elect director candidates;
•authorizing our board of directors to issue, without stockholder approval, preferred stock rights senior to those of
common stock, which could be used to significantly dilute the ownership of a hostile acquiror;
•prohibiting stockholder action by written consent, which forces stockholder action to be taken at an annual or
special meeting of our stockholders;
•requiring the affirmative vote of holders of at least 66 2/3% of the voting power of all of the then outstanding
shares of voting stock, voting as a single class, to amend provisions of our certificate of incorporation relating to
the management of our business, our board of directors, stockholder action by written consent, advance
notification of stockholder nominations and proposals, forum selection and the liability of our directors, or to
amend our bylaws, which may inhibit the ability of stockholders or an acquiror to effect such amendments to
facilitate changes in management or an unsolicited takeover attempt;
•requiring special meetings of stockholders may only be called by our chairman of the board, if any, our chief
executive officer, our president or a majority of our board of directors, which could delay the ability of our
stockholders to force consideration of a proposal or to take action, including the removal of directors; and
•requiring advance notification of stockholder nominations and proposals, which may discourage or deter a
potential acquiror from conducting a solicitation of proxies to elect the acquiror’s own slate of directors or
otherwise attempting to obtain control of us.
In addition, the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporate Law may prohibit large stockholders, in
particular those owning 15% or more of our outstanding common stock, from engaging in certain business combinations,
without approval of substantially all of our stockholders, for a certain period of time.
These provisions in our certificate of incorporation, our bylaws and under Delaware law could discourage potential
takeover attempts, reduce the price that investors might be willing to pay for shares of our common stock in the future and
result in the market price being lower than it would be without these provisions.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 46
Table of Contents
General Risks Related to our Business
Natural disasters, public health events, significant disruptions of information technology systems, data security
breaches, or other catastrophic events could adversely affect our operations.
Our worldwide operations could be subject to natural disasters, public health events and other business disruptions,
which could harm our future revenue and financial condition and increase our costs and expenses. For example, our
corporate headquarters in Fremont, California is located near major earthquake fault lines and our Petaluma, California
facility is near fault lines and the sites of recent catastrophic wildfires. We rely on third-party manufacturing facilities
including for all product assembly and final testing of our products, which are performed at third-party manufacturing
facilities, in China, Mexico and India. There may be conflict or uncertainty in the countries in which we operate, including
public health issues (for example, the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic or an outbreak of other contagious diseases or health
epidemics), safety issues, natural disasters, fire, disruptions of service from utilities, nuclear power plant accidents or
general economic or political factors. Such risks could result in an increase in the cost of components, production delays,
general business interruptions, delays from difficulties in obtaining export licenses for certain technology, tariffs and other
barriers and restrictions, longer payment cycles, increased taxes, restrictions on the repatriation of funds and the burdens of
complying with a variety of foreign laws, any of which could ultimately have a material adverse effect on our business.
Further, any terrorist attacks, material disruption to our information technology systems or any data security breaches,
including due to cyber-attacks, especially any aimed at energy or communications infrastructure suppliers or our cloud-
based monitoring service, could hinder or delay the development and sale or performance of our products or otherwise
adverse affect us. Such significant disruptions of our, our third party vendors’ and/or business partners’ information
technology systems or data security breaches, including in our remote work environment as a result of COVID-19, could
adversely affect our business operations and/or result in the loss, misappropriation, and/or unauthorized access, use or
disclosure of, or the prevention of access to, confidential information (including trade secrets or other intellectual property,
proprietary business information and personal information), and could result in financial, legal, business and reputational
harm to us. Any such event that leads to unauthorized access, use or disclosure of personal information, including personal
information regarding our customers, could harm our reputation, compel us to comply with federal and/or state breach
notification laws and foreign law equivalents, subject us to mandatory corrective action, require us to verify the correctness
of database contents and otherwise subject us to liability under laws and regulations that protect the privacy and security of
personal information, which could disrupt our business, result in increased costs or loss of revenue, and/or result in legal
and financial exposure. In addition, security breaches and other inappropriate access can be difficult to detect, and any
delay in identifying them may further harm us. Moreover, the prevalent use of mobile devices to access confidential
information increases the risk of security breaches. While we have implemented security measures to protect our
information technology systems and infrastructure, there can be no assurance that such measures will prevent service
interruptions or security breaches that could adversely affect our business. In addition, failure to maintain effective internal
accounting controls related to security breaches and cybersecurity in general could impact our ability to produce timely and
accurate financial statements and subject us to regulatory scrutiny.
In the event that natural disasters, public health epidemics or technical catastrophes were to damage or destroy any
part of our facilities or those of our contract manufacturer, destroy or disrupt vital infrastructure systems or interrupt our
operations or services for any extended period of time, our business, financial condition and results of operations would be
materially and adversely affected.
The threat of global economic, capital markets and credit disruptions, including sovereign debt issues, pose risks
to our business.
The threat of global economic, capital markets and credit disruptions pose risks to our business. These risks include
slower economic activity and investment in projects that make use of our products and services. These economic
developments, particularly decreased credit availability, have in the past reduced demand for solar products. For instance,
the European sovereign debt crisis in recent years has caused and may continue to cause European governments to
reduce, eliminate or allow to expire government subsidies and economic incentives for solar energy, which could limit our
growth or cause our net sales to decline and materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of
operations. These conditions, including reduced incentives, continued decreases in credit availability, as well as continued
economic instability, have and may continue to adversely impact our business, financial condition and results of operations
as we seek to increase our sales internationally.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 47
Table of Contents
If we fail to maintain an effective system of internal controls or are unable to remediate any deficiencies in our
internal controls, we might not be able to report our financial results accurately or prevent fraud; in that case, our
stockholders could lose confidence in our financial reporting, which would harm our business and could
negatively impact the price of our stock.
Effective internal controls are necessary for us to provide reliable financial reports and prevent fraud. In addition,
Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act requires us to establish and maintain internal control over financial reporting and
disclosure controls procedures. The process of implementing our internal controls and complying with Section 404 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act has required, and will continue to require, significant attention of management. If we or our
independent registered public accounting firm discover a material weakness in our internal controls over financial reporting,
the disclosure of that fact, even if quickly remedied, could reduce the market’s confidence in our financial statements and
harm our stock price. To the extent any material weaknesses in our internal control over financial reporting are identified, we
could be required to expend significant management time and financial resources to correct such material weaknesses or to
respond to any resulting regulatory investigations or proceedings.
Our business is subject to potential tax liabilities.
We are subject to income tax, indirect tax or other tax claims by tax agencies in jurisdictions in which we conduct
business. Significant judgment is required in determining our worldwide provision for income taxes. Tax laws are dynamic
and subject to change as new laws are passed and new interpretations of the law are issued or applied. The Tax Cuts and
Jobs Act of 2017 (the “Tax Reform Act”) contained many significant changes to the U.S. federal income tax laws, the
consequences of which could have a material impact on the value of our deferred tax assets and could increase our future
U.S. income tax expense. As additional guidance is issued by the applicable taxing authorities and as new accounting
treatment is clarified, we may report additional adjustments in the period if new information becomes available. We have a
significant amount of deferred tax assets and a portion of the deferred tax assets related to net operating losses or tax
credits could be subject to limitations under the Code Sections 382 or 383, separate return limitation year rules. The
limitations could reduce our ability to utilize our net operating losses or tax credits before the expiration of the tax attributes.
Tax law changes or the limitations could be material and could materially affect our tax obligations and effective tax rate.
In the ordinary course of our business, there are many transactions and calculations where the ultimate income tax,
indirect tax, or other tax determination is uncertain. Although we believe our tax estimates are reasonable, we cannot be
certain that the final determination of our tax audits and litigation will not be materially different from that which is reflected in
historical tax provisions and accruals. Should additional taxes be assessed as a result of an audit, assessment or litigation,
there could be a material adverse effect on our cash, tax provisions and net income (loss) in the period or periods for which
that determination is made.
Our business has been and could continue to be affected by seasonal trends and construction cycles.
We have been and could continue to be subject to industry-specific seasonal fluctuations. Historically, the majority of
our revenues are from the North American and European regions which experience higher sales of our products in the
second, third and fourth quarters and have been affected by seasonal customer demand trends, including weather patterns
and construction cycles. The first quarter historically has had softer customer demand in our industry, due to these same
factors. In the U.S., customers will sometimes make purchasing decisions towards the end of the year in order to take
advantage of tax credits or for budgetary reasons. In addition, construction levels are typically slower in colder and wetter
months. In European countries with FiTs, the construction of solar PV systems may be concentrated during the second half
of the calendar year, largely due to the annual reduction of the applicable minimum FiT and the fact that the coldest winter
months are January through March. Accordingly, our business and quarterly results of operations could be affected by
seasonal fluctuations in the future.
Item 1B.    Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 48
Table of Contents
Item 2.    Properties
The table below presents details for each of our principal properties:
Facility Location HeldApproximate
Square Footage Lease end term
Corporate headquarters Fremont, U.S. Leased 40,446 Sep-2025
Customer service support Boise, U.S. Leased 24,688 Jan-2027
Administrative of fice and R&D facility Petaluma, U.S. Leased 141,231 Aug-2032
Global support of fice Bengaluru, India Leased 67,000 May-2024
Solar design services Noida, India Leased 19,382 Mar-2026
R&D facility New Zealand Leased 23,573 Oct-2025
Marketing and sales support Australia Leased 4,478 Jul-2026
Marketing and sales support Netherlands Leased 6,997 Jan-2026
Item 3.    Legal Proceedings
From time to time, we might be subject to various legal proceedings relating to claims arising out of our operations.
The outcome of litigation is inherently uncertain. If one or more legal matters were resolved against us in a reporting period
for amounts above management’s expectations, our business, results of operations, financial position and cash flows for
that reporting period could be materially adversely affected. Except as described in this Item 3, we are not currently involved
in any material legal proceedings, the ultimate disposition of which could have a material adverse effect on our operations,
financial condition, or cash flows.
Class Action Suit
In June 2020, Gregory A. Hurst (“Plaintiff”) filed a securities class action lawsuit against our company, our chief
executive officer and our chief financial officer (collectively, the "Defendants") in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of California (the “Securities Class Action”). The complaint alleged that the Defendants made false and/or
misleading statements in violation of Sections 10(b) and 20(a) of the Exchange Act of 1934 and Rule 10b-5 promulgated
thereunder. Plaintiff did not quantify any alleged damages in his complaint but, in addition to attorneys' fees and costs, he
sought to recover damages on behalf of himself and other persons who purchased or otherwise acquired our stock during
the putative class period at allegedly inflated prices and purportedly suffered financial harm as a result. Defendants filed a
motion to dismiss, which was granted with leave to amend. Following the Plaintiff’s Notice of Intent Not to File Amended
Complaint, the Court entered a judgment in favor of the Defendants on October 18, 2021.
Derivative Action Suit
From July through October 2020, Yan Shen, Benjamin Weber, Anthony R. Buch, and Frank Caggiano, each
separately filed a verified shareholder derivative lawsuit in the United States District Court for the Northern District of
California against our company (as nominal defendant) and certain officers and directors alleging breaches of fiduciary
duties, unjust enrichment, abuse of control, gross mismanagement, waste, and violations of Section 14(a) under the
Exchange Act of 1934 (collectively the “Derivative Actions”). The plaintiffs did not quantify any alleged damages in their
complaints, but in addition to attorneys’ fees and costs, sought certain corporate governance changes. Following the entry
of judgment in favor of the Defendants in the Securities Class Action lawsuit, the parties in the Derivative Actions stipulated
to voluntarily dismiss the Derivative Actions without prejudice, which was so ordered by the Court on December 6, 2021.
Books and Records Suit
In September 2020, Stanley Olochwoszcz filed a lawsuit against our company in the Court of Chancery of the State of
Delaware pursuant to Section 220 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, 8 Del. C. § 220, to compel the company to
permit Mr. Olochwoszcz to inspect certain of our books and records (the “Section 220 Litigation”). We also received similar
demands for inspection of our books and records from four other company stockholders (collectively, the “Demands”).
Following the judgment in favor of the Defendants in the Securities Class Action lawsuit, Mr. Olochwoszcz and the other
stockholders voluntarily dismissed without prejudice the Section 220 Litigation and Demands, which was so ordered by the
Court on December 1, 2021.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 49
Table of Contents
Item 4.    Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 50
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5.    Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities
Common Stock
Our common stock, $0.00001 par value per share, has been traded on The Nasdaq Global Market under the symbol
“ENPH” since March 30, 2012.
Holders
As of February 7, 2022, there were approximately 18 holders of record of our common stock, one of which was Cede
& Co., a nominee for Depository Trust Company (“DTC”). All of the shares of our common stock held by brokerage firms,
banks and other financial institutions as nominees for beneficial owners are deposited into participant accounts at DTC and
are therefore considered to be held of record by Cede & Co. as one stockholder.
Dividend Policy
We have never paid any cash dividends on our common stock. We currently anticipate that we will retain any
available funds to invest in the growth and operation of our business and we do not anticipate paying any cash dividends in
the foreseeable future.
Recent Sales of Unregistered Securities and Issuer Repurchases of Securities
Except as previously reported in our quarterly reports on Form 10-Q and current reports on Form 8-K filed with the
SEC during the year ended December 31, 2021, there were no unregistered sales of equity securities by us during the year
ended December 31, 2021.
In May 2021, our board of directors authorized the 2021 Repurchase Program pursuant to which we may repurchase
up to an aggregate of $500.0 million of our common stock. During the fourth quarter of 2021, we repurchased and
subsequently retired approximately 1.5 million shares of our common stock from the open market at an average cost of
$196.98 per share for a total of $300.0 million. As of December 31, 2021, we have approximately $200.0 million remaining
for repurchase of shares under the 2021 Repurchase Program. Purchases may be completed from time to time in the open
market or through structured repurchase agreements with third parties. The program may be discontinued or amended at
any time and expires on May 13, 2024. Such purchases are expected to continue through May 2024 unless otherwise
extended or shortened by our board of directors.
The following table provides information about our purchases of our common stock during the three months ended
December 31, 2021 (in thousands, except per share amounts):
Period Ended Total Number of Shares
PurchasedAverage Price Paid per
ShareTotal Number of Shares
Purchased as Part of
Publicly Announced
ProgramsApproximate Dollar
Value of Shares that May
Yet Be Purchased Under
the Programs
October 2021 — $ — — $ 500,000 
November 2021 — $ — — $ 500,000 
December 2021 1,523,005 $ 196.98 1,523,005 $ 200,000 
Total 1,523,005 1,523,005 
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 51
Table of Contents
Stock Performance Graph
This section is not “soliciting material” and is not deemed “filed” for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be
deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general
incorporation language in such filing.
The graph depicted below shows a comparison of cumulative total stockholder returns for our common stock, the
S&P 500 Index and the Invesco Solar ETF for the period from December 31, 2017 to December 31, 2021. An investment of
$100 is assumed to have been made in our common stock and in each index on December 31, 2017, all dividends were
reinvested, and the relative performance of the investments are tracked through December 31, 2021. The information
shown is historical and stockholder returns over the indicated period should not be considered indicative of future
stockholder returns or future performance.
December 31,
2017December 31,
2018December 31,
2019December 31,
2020December 31,
2021
Enphase Energy , Inc. $ 100 $ 196 $ 1,084 $ 7,281 $ 7,591 
S&P 500 Index $ 100 $ 94 $ 121 $ 140 $ 178 
Invesco Solar ETF $ 100 $ 74 $ 123 $ 410 $ 307 
Item 6.    [Reserved]
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 52
Table of Contents
Item 7.    Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Forward-Looking Statements
The following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations should be read together with
our consolidated financial statements and related notes appearing elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. This
discussion contains forward-looking statements reflecting our current expectations and involves risks and uncertainties. In
some cases, you can identify forward-looking statements by terminology such as “may,” “will,” “should,” “expect,” “plan,”
“anticipate,” “believe,” “estimate,” “predict,” “intend,” “potential” or “continue” or the negative of these terms or other
comparable terminology. Such statements, include but are not limited to statements regarding our expectations as to future
financial performance, expense levels, liquidity sources, the capabilities and performance of our technology and products
and planned changes, timing of new product releases, our business strategies, including anticipated trends, growth and
developments in markets in which we target, the anticipated market adoption of our current and future products,
performance in operations, including component supply management, product quality and customer service, risks related to
the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and the anticipated benefits and risks relating to our recent acquisitions. Our actual
results and the timing of events may differ materially from those discussed in our forward-looking statements as a result of
various factors, including those discussed below and those discussed in the section entitled “Risk Factors” included in Part
I, Item 1A of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Business Overview and 2021 Highlights
We are a global energy technology company. We deliver smart, easy-to-use solutions that manage solar generation,
storage and communication on one platform. We revolutionized the solar industry with our microinverter technology and we
produce a fully integrated solar-plus-storage solution. To date, we have shipped more than 42 million microinverters, and
approximately 1.9 million Enphase residential and commercial systems have been deployed in more than 130 countries.
We sell primarily to solar distributors who combine our products with others, including solar modules products and
racking systems, and resell to installers in each target region. In addition to our solar distributors, we sell directly to select
large installers, OEM and strategic partners. Our OEM customers include solar module manufacturers who integrate our
microinverters with their solar module products and resell to both distributors and installers. Strategic partners include
providers of solar financing solutions. We also sell certain products and services to homeowners primarily in support of our
warranty services and legacy product upgrade programs via our online store.
Safe Harbor Prepayments
The Renewable Energy and Job Creation Act of 2008 provided a 30% federal tax credit for residential and
commercial solar installations through December 31, 2019, which was reduced to a tax credit of 26% for any solar energy
system that began construction during 2020 through December 31, 2022, and 22% thereafter to December 31, 2023 before
being reduced to 10% for commercial installations and 0% for residential installations beginning on January 1, 2024. As a
result, several of our customers explored opportunities to purchase products in 2019 to take advantage of safe harbor
guidance from the IRS published in June 2018, allowing them to preserve the historical 30% investment tax credit for solar
equipment purchased in 2019 for solar projects that are completed after December 31, 2019. Safe harbor prepayments
from customers in the fourth quarter of 2019 resulted in $44.5 million of revenue recognized in the first quarter of 2020
when we delivered the product. There was no safe harbor revenue recognized in the years ended December 31, 2021 in
comparison.
Acquisitions
On January 25, 2021, we completed the acquisition of Sofdesk Inc. (“Sofdesk”), a privately-held company. Sofdesk
provides design tools and services software for residential solar installers and roofing companies and will enhance our
digital transformation efforts. As part of the purchase price, we (i) paid approximately $32.0 million in cash on January 25,
2021 and (ii) paid approximately $3.7 million of contingent consideration payable in the first quarter of 2022, of which we
recorded a liability of approximately $3.5 million representing the fair value of the contingent consideration on the date
acquisition. In addition to the purchase price, we paid approximately $3.7 million in the first quarter of 2022, as the
continued employment condition of key employees of Sofdesk was deemed completed.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 53
Table of Contents
On March 31, 2021, we completed the acquisition of DIN Engineering Services LLP’s (“DIN”) solar design services
business. DIN’s solar design services business provides outsourced proposal drawings and permit plan sets for residential
solar installers in North America and will enhance our digital transformation effort. As part of the purchase price, we paid
approximately $24.8 million in cash. In addition to the purchase price paid, we are obligated to pay up to (i) approximately
$5.0 million in equal monthly installments over the course of one year following the acquisition date; and (ii) approximately
$5.0 million payable in one year following the acquisition date subject to achievement of certain revenue, operational and
employment targets.
On December 13, 2021, we completed the acquisition of 365 Pronto, Inc. (“365 Pronto”), a privately-held company.
365 Pronto provides an online platform for clean technology installation and service landscape by matching asset owners
with an on-demand qualified workforce in the U.S. As part of the purchase price, we paid approximately $69.9 million in
cash on December 13, 2021. In addition to the purchase price paid, we are obligated to pay up to approximately
$11.0 million in shares of our common stock in 2023 subject to achievement of certain revenue, operational and
employment targets.
On December 31, 2021, we completed the acquisition of ClipperCreek, Inc. (“ClipperCreek”), a privately-held
company. ClipperCreek offers electric vehicle (“EV”) charging solutions for residential and commercial customers in the U.S.
As part of the purchase price, we paid approximately $113.1 million in cash on December 31, 2021. [In addition to the
purchase price paid, we are obligated to issue up to approximately $40.0 million in shares of our common stock payable in
the first quarter of 2023, subject to achievement of certain revenue, operational and employment targets
Further details on business acquisitions may be found in Note 6. “Business Combinations,” in the notes to the
consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Convertible Notes
On March 1, 2021, we issued an aggregate principal amount of $1.15 billion of convertible senior notes comprised of
$575.0 million of our 0.0% convertible senior notes due 2026 (the “Notes due 2026”) and $575.0 million of our 0.0%
convertible senior notes due 2028 (the “Notes due 2028”). In addition, on March 12, 2021, we issued $57.5 million
aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2026 in connection with the initial purchasers’ full exercise of the over-
allotment option to purchase additional Notes due 2026. The Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028 will not bear regular
interest, and the principal amount of the Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028 will not accrete. The Notes due 2026 and the
Notes due 2028 are general unsecured obligations and the Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028 are governed by relevant
indentures entered by and between us and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The Notes due 2026 will mature on
March 1, 2026 and Notes due 2028 will mature on March 1, 2028, unless earlier repurchased by us or converted at the
option of the holders. Further information relating to the Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028 may be found in Note 13.
“Debt,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
During the period ended December 31, 2021, $88.1 million in aggregate principal amount of our 1.0% convertible
senior notes due 2024 (the “Notes due 2024”) were converted or repurchased by us, and the principal amount of the
converted and repurchased Notes due 2024 was repaid in cash. Of the $88.1 million in aggregate principal amount,
$25.5 million in aggregate principal amount was repurchased pursuant to separately- and privately-negotiated exchange
agreements entered into in March 2021 with certain holders of Notes due 2024 concurrently with the offering of the Notes
due 2026 and the Notes due 2028. In connection with such conversions or repurchases, during the year ended December
31, 2021, we also issued 3.8 million shares of our common stock to the holders of the converted and repurchased Notes
due 2024 with an aggregate fair value of $669.5 million, representing the conversion value in excess of the principal amount
of the Notes due 2024, which were fully offset by shares received from the settlements of the associated note hedging
arrangements. Following the conversions and repurchases summarized above, Notes due 2024 are no longer outstanding.
During the first quarter of 2021, concurrently with the offering of the Notes due 2026 and the Notes due 2028, we
entered into separately- and privately-negotiated transactions to repurchase approximately $217.7 million in aggregate
principal amount of our 0.25% convertible senior notes due 2025 (the “Notes due 2025”). The principal amount (and for
certain holders the conversion value in excess of the principal amount) of the repurchased Notes due 2025 was repaid in
cash. We also issued approximately 1.7 million shares of our common stock to the holders of the repurchased notes with an
aggregate fair value of $302.7 million, representing the conversion value in excess of the principal amount of the Notes due
2025, which were fully offset by shares received from the settlements of the associated note hedging arrangements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 54
Table of Contents
Repurchases of Common Stock
In April 2020, our board of directors authorized the repurchase of up to $200.0 million of our common stock, exclusive
of brokerage commissions, under the 2020 Repurchase Program. During the second quarter of 2021, we repurchased and
subsequently retired approximately 1.7 million shares of common stock from the open market at an average cost of $117.47
per share for a total of $200.0 million. In May 2021, our board of directors authorized the 2021 Repurchase Program,
pursuant to which we may repurchase up to an aggregate of $500.0 million of our common stock. During the fourth quarter
of 2021, we repurchased and subsequently retired approximately 1.5 million shares of common stock from the open market
at an average cost of $196.98 per share for a total of $300.0 million. As of December 31, 2021, we have approximately
$200.0 million remaining for repurchase of shares under the 2021 Repurchase Program. Purchases may be completed from
time to time in the open market or through structured repurchase agreements with third parties. The program may be
discontinued or amended at any time and expires on May 13, 2024. Such purchases are expected to continue through May
2024 unless otherwise extended or shortened by our board of directors.
COVID-19 Update
We are actively monitoring, evaluating, and responding to developments relating to COVID-19 pandemic, which has
resulted in, and is expected to continue to result in substantial manufacturing or supply chain problems, disruptions in local
and global economies, volatility in the global financial markets, overall reductions in demand, delays in payment, restrictions
on the shipment of our products, or other ramifications. The extent of the impact of COVID-19 on our operational and
financial performance will depend on developments, including the duration and spread of the virus and its variants, impact
on our end-customers’ spending, volume of sales, impact on our partners, suppliers, and employees and actions that may
be taken by governmental authorities. The global supply chain and the semiconductor industry are experiencing challenges.
We have seen supply chain challenges and logistics constraints increase, including component shortages, which have, in
certain cases, caused delays in critical components and inventory and have resulted in increased costs. We continue to
work to minimize the effects from supply chain constraints. Given the dynamic nature of these circumstances, the full impact
of COVID-19 and other macroeconomic factors on our ongoing business, results of operations and overall financial
performance cannot be reasonably estimated at this time. Further information relating to the risks and uncertainties related
to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic may be found in Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Components of Consolidated Statements of Operations
Net Revenues
We primarily generate net revenues from sales of our microinverter solutions and related accessories, which include
our storage systems, our Envoy communications gateway, Enlighten cloud-based monitoring service, design and proposal
services, and proposal and permitting services to distributors, large installers, original equipment manufacturers (“OEMs”)
and strategic partners.
Our revenue is affected by changes in the volume and average selling prices of our solutions and related accessories,
supply and demand, sales incentives, and competitive product offerings. Our revenue growth is dependent on our ability to
compete effectively in the marketplace by remaining cost competitive, developing and introducing new products that meet
the changing technology and performance requirements of our customers, the diversification and expansion of our revenue
base, and our ability to market our products in a manner that increases awareness for microinverter technology and
differentiates us in the marketplace.
Cost of Revenues and Gross Profit
Cost of revenues is comprised primarily of product costs, warranty, manufacturing personnel and logistics costs,
freight costs, inventory write-downs, hosting services costs related to the Company’s Enlighten service offering and design
and proposal services, depreciation and amortization of manufacturing test equipment, amortization of capitalized software
development costs related to the Company’s Enlighten service offering and design and proposal services, and employee-
related expenses associated with proposal and permitting services and design and proposal service customer support. Our
product costs are impacted by technological innovations, such as advances in semiconductor integration and new product
introductions, economies of scale resulting in lower component costs, and improvements in production processes and
automation. Certain costs, primarily personnel and depreciation and amortization of test equipment, are not directly affected
by sales volume.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 55
Table of Contents
We outsource our manufacturing to third-party contract manufacturers and generally negotiate product pricing with
them on a quarterly basis. We believe our contract manufacturing partners have sufficient production capacity to meet the
anticipated demand for our products for the foreseeable future. However, shortages in the supply of certain key raw
materials could adversely affect our ability to meet customer demand for our products. We contract with third parties,
including one of our contract manufacturers, to serve as our logistics providers by warehousing and delivering our products
in the U.S., Europe and Asia.
Gross profit may vary from quarter to quarter and is primarily affected by our average selling prices, product cost,
product mix, customer mix, tariff refunds, warranty costs and sales volume fluctuations resulting from seasonality.
Operating Expenses
Operating expenses consist of research and development, sales and marketing, general and administrative and
restructuring expenses. Personnel-related costs are the most significant component of each of these expense categories
other than restructuring expense and include salaries, benefits, payroll taxes, sales commissions, incentive compensation,
post-combination expense and stock-based compensation.
Research and development expense include personnel-related expenses, third-party design and development costs,
testing and evaluation costs, depreciation expense and other indirect costs. Research and development employees are
primarily engaged in the design and development of power electronics, semiconductors, powerline communications,
networking and software functionality, and storage. We devote substantial resources to research and development
programs that focus on enhancements to, and cost efficiencies in, our existing products and timely development of new
products that utilize technological innovation to drive down product costs, improve functionality, and enhance reliability. We
intend to continue to invest appropriate resources in our research and development efforts because we believe they are
critical to maintaining our competitive position.
Sales and marketing expense include personnel-related expenses, travel, trade shows, marketing, customer support
and other indirect costs. We expect to continue to make the necessary investments to enable us to execute our strategy to
increase our market penetration geographically and enter into new markets by expanding our customer base of distributors,
large installers, OEMs and strategic partners. We currently offer solutions targeting the residential and commercial markets
in the U.S., Canada, Mexico, Europe, Australia, New Zealand, India, Brazil, South Africa, and certain other Central
American and Asian markets. We expect to continue to expand the geographic reach of our product offerings and explore
new sales channels in addressable markets in the future.
General and administrative expense include personnel-related expenses for our executive, finance, human
resources, information technology and legal organizations, facilities costs, and fees for professional services. Fees for
professional services consist primarily of outside legal, accounting and information technology consulting costs.
Restructuring charges are the net charges resulting from restructuring initiatives implemented in 2018 through 2019
(the “2018 Plan”) to improve operational performance and reduce overall operating expenses. Under the 2018 Plan, costs
included in restructuring primarily consisted of employee severance and one-time benefits, workforce reorganization
charges, non-cash charges related to impairment of property and equipment, and the establishment of lease loss reserves.
See Note 12. “Restructuring,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Other Expense, Net
Other expense, net primarily consists of interest expense, fees under our convertible notes and term loans,
changes in fair value of contingent consideration, non-cash interest expense related to the accretion of debt discount and
amortization of deferred financing costs, non-cash charges recognized for loss on partial settlement of convertible notes
and the change in fair value of our convertible notes embedded derivative and warrants. Other expense, net also includes
interest income on our cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities, amortization of discount or premium on purchase
of cash equivalents and marketable securities, accrued interest on marketable securities, tariffs previously paid and
approved for refund, and gains or losses upon conversion of foreign currency transactions into U.S. dollars.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 56
Table of Contents
Income Tax Benefit (Provision)
We are subject to income taxes in the countries where we sell our products. Historically, we have primarily been
subject to taxation in the U.S. because we have sold the majority of our products to customers in the U.S. As we have
expanded the sale of products to customers outside the U.S., we have become subject to taxation based on the foreign
statutory rates in the countries where these sales took place. As sales in foreign jurisdictions increase in the future, our
effective tax rate may fluctuate accordingly. We regularly assess the ability to realize deferred tax assets based on the
weight of all available evidence, including such factors as the history of recent earnings and expected future taxable income
on a jurisdiction by jurisdiction basis. During the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019, after considering these factors, we
determined that the positive evidence overcame any negative evidence, primarily due to cumulative income in recent years,
and the expectation of sustained profitability in future periods and concluded that it was more likely than not that the US
federal and state deferred tax assets were realizable. As a result, we released the valuation allowance against all of the
U.S. federal and state deferred tax assets during the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2019.
Summary Consolidated Statements of Operations
The following table sets forth a summary of our consolidated statements of operations for the periods presented (in
thousands):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Net revenues $ 1,382,049 $ 774,425 $ 624,333 
Cost of revenues 827,627 428,444 403,088 
Gross profit 554,422 345,981 221,245 
Operating expenses:
Research and development 105,526 55,921 40,381 
Sales and marketing 128,974 52,927 36,728 
General and administrative 104,090 50,694 38,808 
Restructuring charges — — 2,599 
Total operating expenses 338,590 159,542 118,516 
Income from operations 215,832 186,439 102,729 
Other income (expense), net
Interest income 695 2,156 2,513 
Interest expense (45,152) (21,001) (9,691)
Other (expense) income, net 6,050 (799) (5,437)
Loss on partial settlement of convertible notes (56,497) (3,037) — 
Change in fair value of derivatives — (44,348) — 
Total other expense, net (94,904) (67,029) (12,615)
Income before income taxes 120,928 119,410 90,114 
Income tax benefit 24,521 14,585 71,034 
Net income $ 145,449 $ 133,995 $ 161,148 
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 57
Table of Contents
Results of Operations
Net Revenues
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Net revenues $ 1,382,049 $ 774,425 $ 607,624 78  %
Net revenues increased by 78% or $607.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2021, as compared to the same
period in 2020, driven primarily by a 53% increase in microinverter units volume shipped and a 351% increase in Enphase
IQ Battery storage systems MWh shipped. In the year ended December 31, 2021, consumer demand improved from the
same period in 2020 as we sold approximately 10.4 million microinverter units in the year ended December 31, 2021, as
compared to approximately 6.8 million units in the year ended December 31, 2020. We also increased shipments of our
Enphase IQ Battery storage systems to customers in the U.S. and Europe from 56 MWh in 2020 to 251 MWh in 2021 with
over 1,300 installers now deploying our Enphase IQ Battery storage systems in the U.S. Business growth in the U.S. and
international regions resulted in a 74% and 100%, respectively, increase in net revenues in the year ended December 31,
2021, as compared to the same period in 2020. The increase in net revenues is also due to favorable product mix as we
sold more IQ7+™ microinverters relative to IQ7™ microinverters, and we made initial shipments of our IQ8solar
microinverters in the fourth quarter of 2021. The average selling price of our microinverter products increased in the year
ended December 31, 2021, as compared to the same period in 2020, primarily driven by customer mix and we increased
prices to partially offset the impact of higher expedited freight costs and component costs.
Cost of Revenues and Gross Margin
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Cost of revenues $ 827,627 $ 428,444 $ 399,183 93 %
Gross profit $ 554,422 $ 345,981 $ 208,441 60 %
Gross margin 40.1 % 44.7 % (4.6)%
Cost of revenues increased by 93% or $399.2 million in the year ended December 31, 2021, as compared to the
same period in 2020, primarily due to higher volume of microinverter units sold, higher shipments of our Enphase IQ Battery
storage systems, higher expedited freight costs as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic globally in combination with
semiconductor supply constraints, higher costs of certain components experiencing supply constraints, $8.5 million higher
warranty expense based on continuing analysis of field performance data and diagnostic root-cause failure analysis
primarily relating to our prior generation products as well as higher costs of certain components experiencing supply
constraints, and $38.9 million in refunds approved for tariffs previously paid on certain microinverter products and recorded
as a reduction to our cost of revenues in the year ended December 31, 2020.
Gross margin decreased by 4.6 percentage points for the year ended December 31, 2021, as compared to the same
period in 2020. The decrease in gross margin was primarily attributable to the $38.9 million in refunds approved for tariffs in
the year ended December 31, 2020 mentioned above, higher expedited freight costs and increased component costs due to
global supply constraints in the year ended December 31, 2021, partially offset by the increase in average selling price due
to changes in product, customer mix and price increases, as well as cost management efforts, including the transition of our
contract manufacturing from China to Mexico and India to mitigate tariffs.TM 
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 58
Table of Contents
Research and Development
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Research and development $ 105,526 $ 55,921 $ 49,605 89 %
Percentage of net revenues 8 % 7 %
Research and development expense increased by 89% or $49.6 million in the year ended December 31, 2021, as
compared to the same period in 2020. The increase was due to $41.9 million of higher personnel-related expenses and
$7.7 million of outside consulting services and equipment expense associated with our investment in the development,
introduction and qualification of new product innovation. The increase in personnel-related expenses was primarily due to
hiring and retention programs for employees in New Zealand, India and the U.S. as well as onboarded employees through
our recent acquisitions, increasing total compensation costs, including stock-based compensation. The amount of research
and development expenses may fluctuate from period to period due to the differing levels and stages of development
activity.
Sales and Marketing
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Sales and marketing $ 128,974 $ 52,927 $ 76,047 144 %
Percentage of net revenues 9 % 7 %
Sales and marketing expense increased by 144% or $76.0 million in the year ended December 31, 2021, as
compared to the same period in 2020. The increase was primarily due to $52.0 million of higher personnel-related expenses
primarily due to hiring employees as a result of our efforts to improve customer experience, to provide 24/7 support along
with field service desk for installers, and Enphase system owners globally, and to support our business growth in the U.S.
and international expansion in Europe as well as retention programs for employees increasing total compensation costs,
including stock-based compensation. The increase in sales and marketing expense in the year ended December 31, 2021,
as compared to the year ended December 31, 2020 is also attributable to $24.0 million for a combination of higher
advertising costs, marketing expenses, professional services associated with our product launch and facility costs to enable
business growth.
General and Administrative
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
General and administrative $ 104,090 $ 50,694 $ 53,396 105 %
Percentage of net revenues 8 % 7 %
General and administrative expense increased by 105% or $53.4 million in the year ended December 31, 2021, as
compared to the same period in 2020. The increase was primarily due to $35.5 million of higher personnel-related expenses
primarily due to hiring and retention programs for employees increasing total compensation costs, including stock-based
compensation and post business combination employment-related expense, $4.9 million of acquisition related costs, $7.8
million of investments in technological infrastructure and other operational and facilities costs to support scalability of our
business growth and $5.2 million of higher legal and professional services.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 59
Table of Contents
Other Income (Expense), Net
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Interest income $ 695 $ 2,156 $ (1,461) (68)%
Interest expense (45,152) (21,001) (24,151) 115 %
Other (expense) income, net 6,050 (799) 6,849 (857) %
Loss on partial settlement of convertible notes (56,497) (3,037) (53,460) 1,760 %
Change in fair value of derivatives — (44,348) 44,348 (100) %
Total other expense, net $ (94,904) $ (67,029) $ (27,875) 42 %
Interest income of $0.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2021 decreased, as compared to $2.2 million for the
year ended December 31, 2020, primarily due to significant decline in interest rates earned on cash, cash equivalents and
marketable securities, and approximately $0.6 million accrued interest on refunds for tariffs previously paid from September
24, 2018 to March 31, 2020 for certain microinverters that qualify for the Tariff Exclusion that was recognized in 2020,
partially offset by a higher average cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities earning interest in the year ended
December 31, 2021, compared to the same period in 2020.
Cash interest expense
Cash interest expense for the year ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 totaled $0.7 million and $2.2 million,
respectively. Cash interest expense in the year ended December 31, 2021 primarily includes $0.5 million coupon interest
incurred with the Notes due 2025, the Notes due 2024 and Notes due 2023 and $0.2 million accretion of interest expense
on contingent consideration for an acquisition. Cash interest expense in the year ended December 31, 2020 primarily
includes $2.1 million coupon interest incurred with the Notes due 2025, Notes due 2024 and Notes due 2023.
Non-cash interest expense
Non-cash interest expense of $44.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2021 primarily relates to $44.3 million
for the debt discount and amortization of debt issuance costs with our Notes due 2024, Notes due 2025, Notes due 2026
and Notes due 2028 and less than $0.1 million relates to the amortization of debt issuance costs associated with Notes due
2023.
Non-cash interest expense of $18.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2020 primarily includes $18.3 million
related to the accretion of the debt discount and amortization of debt issuance cost incurred associated with the Notes due
2025 and Notes due 2024, and less than $0.1 million related to the amortization of debt issuance costs associated with
Notes due 2023, and $0.5 million related to long-term financing receivable recorded as debt.
Other (expense) income, net of $6.1 million income for the year ended December 31, 2021 relates to a $6.6 million
cash gain related to a settlement of debt securities and $3.0 million non-cash gain related to change in the fair value of debt
securities, partially offset by a $3.5 million net loss related to foreign currency exchange and remeasurement. Other
(expense) income, net of $0.8 million expense for the year ended December 31, 2020, relates to the net loss from foreign
currency exchange and remeasurement.
Loss on partial settlement of convertible notes recorded in the year ended December 31, 2021 primarily relates to the
$9.6 million non-cash loss on partial settlement of $88.1 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024,
$9.5 million non-cash loss on partial settlement of $217.8 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025 and
$37.5 million non-cash inducement loss incurred on repurchase of Notes due 2025. See Note 13. “Debt,” of the notes to
consolidated financial statements included in Part I, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Change in fair value of derivatives associated with issuance of Notes due 2025 of $44.3 million for the year ended
December 31, 2020 primarily includes the charge recognized for the change in fair value of our convertible notes embedded
derivative and warrants of $47.6 million and $24.7 million, respectively. This charge is partially offset by a gain recognized
for the change in fair value of our convertible notes hedge of $28.0 million. We did not have any derivatives transactions
during the year ended December 31, 2021.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 60
Table of Contents
Income Tax Benefit
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Income tax benefit $ 24,521 $ 14,585 $ 9,936 68 %
The income tax benefit of $24.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2021 increased, compared to the income
tax benefit of $14.6 million for the same period in 2020, both calculated using the annualized effective tax rate method,
primarily due to higher tax deduction from employee stock-based compensation, partially offset by higher projected tax
expense in U.S. and foreign jurisdictions that are more profitable in 2021 compared to 2020.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Sources of Liquidity
As of December 31, 2021, we had $1.0 billion in working capital, including cash, cash equivalents and marketable
securities of $1.0 billion, of which approximately $1.0 billion were held in the U.S. Our cash, cash equivalents and
marketable securities primarily consist of U.S. government money market mutual funds, U.S. Treasuries, Corporate notes
and bonds and both interest-bearing and non-interest-bearing deposits, with the remainder held in various foreign
subsidiaries. We consider amounts held outside the U.S. to be accessible and have provided for the estimated U.S. income
tax liability associated with our foreign earnings.
Years Ended December 31, Change in
2021 2020 $ %
(In thousands, except percentages)
Cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities $ 1,016,651 $ 679,379 $ 337,272 50 %
Total Debt 1,037,646 330,865 706,781 214 %
We believe we have sufficient sources of funding to meet our business requirements for the next 12 months and in
the longer term. Our cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities increased by $337.3 million in the year ended
December 31, 2021 primarily due to cash generated from operations and issuance of Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028,
partially offset by acquisitions, the repurchase of common stocks, purchases of property and equipment, repayment of
Notes due 2024 and partial repayment of Notes due 2025.
Total carrying amount of debt increased by $706.8 million, primarily due to issuance of an aggregate principal amount
of $632.5 million of Notes due 2026 and aggregate principal amount of $575.0 million of Notes due 2028 during the year
ended December 31, 2021, partially offset by $217.7 million in aggregate principal amount of Notes due 2025 repurchased
and repaid in cash, and settlement of remaining $88.1 million in aggregate principal amount of Notes due 2024.
We expect that our principal short-term (over the next 12 months) and long-term needs for cash relating to our
operations will be to fund operating activities and working capital, acquisitions, and purchase of property and equipment,
such as production lines at our contract manufacturing partners.
We plan to fund such cash requirements from our existing cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities on hand,
and cash generated from operations. We anticipate that our future capital needs from the debt market will be more limited
compared to prior years. Our ability to obtain this or any additional financing that we may choose to, or need to, obtain will
depend on, among other things, our development efforts, business plans, operating performance and the condition of the
capital markets at the time we seek financing.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 61
Table of Contents
Repurchase of Common Stock. During the second quarter of 2021, we repurchased and subsequently retired
1.7 million shares of our common stock for an aggregate amount of $200.0 million. In May 2021, our board of directors
authorized the repurchase of up to an additional $500.0 million of our common stock. During the fourth quarter of 2021, we
repurchased and subsequently retired approximately 1.5 million shares of common stock from the open market at an
average cost of $196.98 per share for a total of $300.0 million. As of December 31, 2021, we have approximately
$200.0 million remaining for repurchase of shares under the 2021 Repurchase Program. The repurchases may be executed
from time to time, subject to general business and market conditions and other investment opportunities, through open
market purchases or privately negotiated transactions, including through Rule 10b5-1 plans. Such purchases are expected
to continue through May 2024 unless otherwise extended or shortened by our board of directors. See Note 15.
“Stockholders’ Equity,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for additional information.
Contractual Obligations
The following table summarizes material cash requirements from known outstanding contractual obligations as of
December 31, 2021:
Payments Due by Period
Total Next 12 MonthsBeyond 12
Months
(In thousands)
Operating leases $ 18,626 $ 4,771 $ 13,855 
Notes due 2023 principal and interest 5,400 200 5,200 
Notes due 2025 principal and interest 103,071 256 102,815 
Notes due 2026 principal and interest 632,500 — 632,500 
Notes due 2028 principal and interest 575,000 — 575,000 
Purchase obligations 424,629 424,629 — 
Total $ 1,759,226 $ 429,856 $ 1,329,370 
(1)See Note 14. “Commitment and Contingencies” of the notes to consolidated financial statement for further details
regarding leases. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has additional operating lease for real estate that have not
yet commenced of $5.6 million which have not been included above.
(2)See Note 13. “Debt,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements for further details regarding debt.
(3)Purchase obligations include amounts related to component inventory that our primary contract manufacturers procure
on our behalf in accordance with our production forecast as well as other inventory related purchase commitments. The
timing of purchases in future periods could differ materially from estimates presented above due to fluctuations in
demand requirements related to varying sales levels as well as changes in economic conditions.
Cash from operations could be affected by various risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to, the effects of
COVID-19 and other risk factors discussed in the section entitled “Risk Factors” included in this Annual Report on Form 10-
K. We believe that our cash flow from operations with existing cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities will be
sufficient to meet our anticipated cash needs for at least the next 12 months and thereafter for the foreseeable future. Our
future capital requirements will depend on many factors including our growth rate, the timing and extent of spending to
support development efforts, the expansion of sales and marketing activities, the introduction of new and enhanced
products, the costs to acquire or invest in complementary businesses and technologies, the costs to ensure access to
adequate manufacturing capacity, the continuing market acceptance of our products and macroeconomic events such as
the impacts from COVID-19. We may also choose to seek additional equity or debt financing. In the event that additional
financing is required from outside sources, we may not be able to raise it on terms acceptable to us or at all. If we are
unable to raise additional capital when desired, our business, operating results, and financial condition may be adversely
affected.(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(3)
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 62
Table of Contents
Cash Flows. The following table summarizes our cash flows for the periods presented:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 352,028 $ 216,334 $ 139,067 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,219,547) (25,568) (14,788)
Net cash provided by financing activities 309,411 191,678 65,850 
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash (1,955) 826 (257)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents $ (560,063) $ 383,270 $ 189,872 
Cash Flows from Operating Activities
Cash flows from operating activities consist of our net income adjusted for certain non-cash reconciling items, such as
stock-based compensation expense, change in the fair value of investments, deferred income taxes, loss on conversion of
Notes due 2024 and Notes due 2025, depreciation and amortization, adjustment to reclass cash gain on settlement of debt
securities to investing activities and changes in our operating assets and liabilities. Net cash provided by operating activities
increased by approximately $135.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2021 compared to the same period in 2020,
primarily due to an increase in our gross profit as a result of increased revenue, partially offset by higher operating
expenses as we continue to invest in the long-term growth of our business and also by $15.7 million deemed cash
repayment attributable to accreted debt discount as an amount paid for settlement of approximately $88.1 million and
approximately $217.8 million in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024 and Notes due 2025, respectively.
Cash Flows from Investing Activities
For the year ended December 31, 2021, net cash used in investing activities was primarily from approximately $935.0
million used in purchases of marketable securities, $235.7 million, net of cash acquired from the acquisition of
ClipperCreek, 365 Pronto, Sofdesk and DIN’s solar design services business, $58.0 million from investment in debt
securities of private companies, and $52.3 million used in purchases of test and assembly equipment to expand our supply
capacity, related facility improvements and information technology enhancements and capitalized costs related to internal-
use software. Net cash used in investing activities during the year ended December 31, 2021 was partially offset by $35.0
million maturities of marketable securities and $26.6 million settlement of our investment in a private company.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, net cash used in investing activities was approximately $20.6 million,
primarily from purchases of test and assembly equipment to expand our supply capacity, related facility improvements and
information technology enhancements and capitalized costs related to internal-use software and $5.0 million payment
related to the equity investment in a private company.
Cash Flows from Financing Activities
For the year ended December 31, 2021, net cash provided by financing activities of approximately $309.4 million was
primarily from approximately $1,188.4 million net proceeds from the issuance of our Notes due 2028 and Notes due 2026,
$220.8 million from sale of warrants related to the Notes due 2028 and Notes due 2026, and $7.5 million net proceeds from
employee stock option exercises, partially offset by $286.2 million purchase of convertible note hedge related to the Notes
due 2028 and Notes due 2026, $290.2 million cash paid to settle both approximately $88.1 million in aggregate principal
amount of the Notes due 2024 and approximately $217.8 million in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025,
$500.0 million paid to repurchase our common stock under repurchase programs approved by our board of directors,
$29.1 million payment of employee withholding taxes related to net share settlement of equity awards, and $1.7 million of
repayment on sale of long-term financing receivables.
For the year ended December 31, 2020 net cash provided by financing activities of approximately $191.7 million was
primarily from approximately $312.4 million net proceeds from the issuance of our Notes due 2025, $71.6 million from sale
of warrants related to our Notes due 2025, $8.4 million net proceeds from employee stock option exercises and issuance of
common stock under our employee stock incentive program, partially offset by $89.1 million purchase of convertible note
bond hedge related to our Notes due 2025, $68.3 million payment of employee withholding taxes related to net share
settlement of equity awards, $40.7 million settlement of $43.9 million in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024
and $2.6 million of repayment on sale of long-term financing receivables.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 63
Table of Contents
Critical Accounting Estimates
The preparation of our consolidated financial statements and related notes requires us to make judgments, estimates
and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenue and expenses, fair value of acquired
intangible assets and goodwill, useful lives of acquired intangible assets and related disclosure of contingent assets and
liabilities. The Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") has defined a company’s critical accounting policies as the
ones that are most important to the portrayal of a company’s financial condition and results of operations, and which require
a company to make its most difficult and subjective judgments. Based on this definition, we have identified the critical
accounting policies and judgments addressed below.
We have based our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that are believed to be
reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of
assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources. Actual results may differ from these estimates due to
risks and uncertainties, including uncertainty in the current economic environment due to the global impact of COVID-19. As
of the date of issuance of these financial statements, we are not aware of any specific event or circumstance that would
require us to update our estimates, judgments or revise the carrying value of our assets or liabilities. For a description of our
significant accounting policies, see Note 2. “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies,” of the notes to consolidated
financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. An accounting policy is considered to be
critical if it requires an accounting estimate to be made based on assumptions about matters that are highly uncertain at the
time the estimate is made, and if different estimates that reasonably could have been used, or changes in the accounting
estimates that are reasonably likely to occur periodically, could materially impact the consolidated financial statements. We
believe the following critical accounting policies reflect the more significant estimates and assumptions used in the
preparation of our consolidated financial statements.
Revenue Recognition
We generate revenue from sales of our solutions, which include microinverter units and related accessories, an
Envoy communications gateway, the cloud-based Enlighten monitoring service, storage solutions, Electric Vehicle (“EV”)
charging solutions beginning in the first quarter of 2022, design, proposal and permitting services, as well as a platform
matching cleantech asset owners to a local and on-demand workforce of service providers, to distributors, large installers,
OEMs and strategic partners.
Revenues are recognized when control of the promised goods or services are transferred to our customers in an
amount that reflects the consideration that is expected to be received in exchange for those goods or services. We generate
all of our revenues from contracts with our customers. A description of principal activities from which we generate revenues
are follows.
•Products Delivered at a Point in Time. We sell our products and professional services to customers in accordance
with the terms of the related customer contracts. We generate revenues from sales of our solutions, which include
microinverter units and related accessories, an Envoy communications gateway and Enlighten service,
communications accessories, storage solutions, EV charging solutions beginning in the first quarter of 2022,
design, proposal and permitting services, as well as a platform matching cleantech asset owners to a local and
on-demand workforce of service providers to distributors, large installers, OEMs and strategic partners.
Microinverter units, microinverter accessories, storage and EV solutions, design proposal and permitting services,
as well as completed work orders on our platform matching cleantech asset owners to a local and on-demand
workforce of service providers, are delivered to customers at a point in time, and we recognize revenue for these
products or professional services when we transfer control of the product or professional services to the
customer, which is generally upon product shipment or service delivery, respectively.
•Products Delivered Over Time. The sale of an Envoy communications gateway includes our Enlighten cloud-
based monitoring service. The full consideration for these products represents a single performance obligation
and is deferred at the sale date and recognized over the estimated service period of 6 years. We also sell certain
communication accessories that contain a service performance obligation to be delivered over time. The revenue
from these products is recognized over the related service period, which is typically 5 or 12 years. The
subscription services revenue generated from each customer’s subscription to our design and proposal service is
recognized on a ratable basis over the contract term beginning on the date that our service is made available to
the customer. The subscription contracts are generally three to twelve months in length and billed in advance.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 64
Table of Contents
When we sell a product with more than one performance obligation, such as our IQ Combiner which includes both
hardware and Envoy, the total consideration is allocated to these performance obligations based on their relative
standalone selling prices.
We record certain contra revenue promotions as variable consideration and recognizes these promotions at the time
the related revenue is recorded.
We record upfront contract acquisition costs, such as sales commissions, to be capitalized and amortized over the
estimated life of the asset. For contracts that have a duration of less than one year, we follow the Topic 606 practical
expedient and expense these costs when incurred. Commissions related to our sale of monitoring hardware and service are
capitalized and amortized over the period of the associated revenue.
See Note 3. “Revenue Recognition,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information related to revenue recognition.
Inventory
Inventory is valued at the lower of cost or market. Market is current replacement cost (by purchase or by
reproduction, dependent on the type of inventory). In cases where market exceeds net realizable value (i.e., estimated
selling price less reasonably predictable costs of completion and disposal), inventories are stated at net realizable value.
Market is not considered to be less than net realizable value reduced by an allowance for an approximately normal profit
margin. We determine cost on a first-in first-out basis. Certain factors could affect the realizable value of its inventory,
including customer demand and market conditions. Management assesses the valuation on a quarterly basis and writes
down the value for any excess and obsolete inventory based upon expected demand, anticipated sales price, effect of new
product introductions, product obsolescence, customer concentrations, product merchantability and other factors. Inventory
write-downs are equal to the difference between the cost of inventories and market.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments 
The fair value of a financial instrument is the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability
in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. The carrying amounts of our cash, cash
equivalents and restricted cash, accounts receivable, accounts payable and accrued liabilities approximate fair value
because of the short maturity of those instruments. Equity investments with readily determinable fair value are carried at fair
value based on quoted market prices or estimated based on market conditions and risks existing at each balance sheet
date. Equity investments without readily determinable fair value are measured at cost less impairment, and are adjusted for
observable price changes in orderly transactions for an identical or similar investment of the same issuer.
Convertible Note Derivatives
In March 2020, we issued $320.0 million aggregate principal amount of Notes due 2025. Concurrently with the
issuance of Notes due 2025, we entered into privately-negotiated convertible note hedge and warrant transactions which in
combination are intended to reduce the potential dilution from the conversion of the Notes due 2025. We could not elect to
issue the shares of common stock upon settlement of Notes due 2025 or convertible note hedge or warrant transactions
due to insufficient authorized share capital. As a result, the embedded conversion option and warrants were accounted for
as a derivative liabilities and convertible notes hedge as derivative asset and a gain (or loss) was reported in other expense,
net in our consolidated statement of operations to the extent the valuation changed from the date of issuance of Notes due
2025. On May 20, 2020, at our annual meeting of stockholders, the stockholders approved an amendment to its certificate
of incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of our common stock. As a result, we are now be able to settle
the Notes due 2025, convertible notes hedge and warrants through payment or delivery, as the case may be, of cash,
shares of its common stock or a combination thereof, at our election. Accordingly, on May 20, 2020, the embedded
derivative liability, convertible notes hedge and warrants liability were remeasured at a fair value and were then reclassified
to additional paid-in-capital in our condensed consolidated balance sheet in the second quarter of 2020 and are no longer
remeasured as long as they continue to meet the conditions for equity classification. As of December 31, 2020, we do not
have any convertible note derivatives. See Note 13. “Debt,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in
Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 65
Table of Contents
Warranty Obligations
Microinverters and Other Products Sold Through December 31, 2013
Our warranty accrual provides for the replacement of microinverter units or other products that fail during the
product’s warranty term (15 years for first and second generation microinverters and up to 25 years for subsequent
generation microinverters). On a quarterly basis, we employ a consistent, systematic and rational methodology to assess
the adequacy of our warranty liability. This assessment includes updating all key estimates and assumptions for each
generation of product, based on historical results, trends and the most current data available as of the filing date. The key
estimates and assumptions used in the warranty liability are thoroughly reviewed by management on a quarterly basis. The
key estimates used by us to estimate our warranty liability are: (1) the number of units expected to fail over time (i.e., failure
rate); (2) the number of failed units expected to result in warranty claims over time (i.e., claim rate); and (3) the per unit cost
of replacement units, including outbound shipping and limited labor costs, expected to be incurred to replace failed units
over time (i.e., replacement cost).
Estimated Failure Rates — Our Quality and Reliability department has primary responsibility to determine the
estimated failure rates for each generation of microinverter. To establish initial failure rate estimates for each generation of
microinverter, our quality engineers use a combination of industry standard Mean Time Between Failure (“MTBF”) estimates
for individual components contained in that generation of microinverters, third party data collected on similar equipment
deployed in outdoor environments similar to those in which our microinverters are installed, and rigorous long term reliability
and accelerated life cycle testing which simulates the service life of the microinverter in a short period of time. As units are
deployed into operating environments, we continue to monitor product performance through our Enlighten monitoring
platform. It typically takes three to nine months between the date of sale and date of end-user installation. Consequently,
our ability to monitor actual failures of units sold similarly lags by three to nine months. When a microinverter fails and is
returned, we perform diagnostic root cause failure analysis to understand and isolate the underlying mechanism(s) causing
the failure. We then use the results of this analysis (combined with the actual, cumulative performance data collected on
those units prior to failure through Enlighten) to draw conclusions with respect to how or if the identified failure
mechanism(s) will impact the remaining units deployed in the installed base.
Estimated Claim Rates — Warranty claim rate estimates are based upon observed historical trends and
assumptions with respect to expected customer behavior over the warranty period. As the vast majority of our
microinverters have been sold to end users for residential applications, we believe that warranty claim rates will be affected
by changes over time in residential home ownership because we expect that subsequent homeowners are less likely to file
claims than the homeowners who originally purchase the microinverters.
Estimated Replacement Costs — Three factors are considered in our analysis of estimated replacement cost:
(1) the estimated cost of replacement microinverters; (2) the estimated cost to ship replacement microinverters to end
users; and (3) the estimated labor reimbursement expected to be paid to third party installers performing replacement
services for the end user. Because our warranty provides for the replacement of defective microinverters over long periods
of time (typically between 15 and 25 years, depending on the generation of product purchased), the estimated per unit cost
of current and future product generations is considered in the estimated replacement cost. Estimated costs to ship
replacement units are based on observable, market-based shipping costs paid by us to third party freight carriers. We have
a separate program that allows third-party installers to claim fixed-dollar reimbursements for labor costs they incur to
replace failed microinverter units for a limited time from the date of original installation. Included in our estimated
replacement cost is an analysis of the number of fixed-dollar labor reimbursements expected to be claimed by third party
installers over the limited offering period.
In addition to the key estimates noted above, we also compare actual warranty results to expected results and
evaluate any significant differences. We may make additional adjustments to the warranty provision based on performance
trends or other qualitative factors. If actual failure rates, claim rates, or replacement costs differ from our estimates in future
periods, changes to these estimates may be required, resulting in increases or decreases in our warranty obligations. Such
increases or decreases could be material.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 66
Table of Contents
Fair Value Option for Microinverters and Other Products Sold Since January 1, 2014
Our warranty obligations related to microinverters sold since January 1, 2014 provide us the right, but not the
requirement, to assign our warranty obligations to a third-party. Under Accounting Standards Codification (“ASC 825”),
“Financial Instruments” (also referred to as the “fair value option”), an entity may choose to elect the fair value option for
such warranties at the time it first recognizes the eligible item. We made an irrevocable election to account for all eligible
warranty obligations associated with microinverters sold since January 1, 2014 at fair value. This election was made to
reflect the underlying economics of the time value of money for an obligation that will be settled over an extended period of
up to 25 years.
We estimate the fair value of warranty obligations by calculating the warranty obligations in the same manner as for
sales prior to January 1, 2014 and applying an expected present value technique to that result. The expected present value
technique, an income approach, converts future amounts into a single current discounted amount. In addition to the key
estimates of failure rates, claim rates and replacement costs, we used certain inputs that are unobservable and significant
to the overall fair value measurement. Such additional assumptions included compensation comprised of a profit element
and risk premium required of a market participant to assume the obligation and a discount rate based on our credit-adjusted
risk-free rate. See Note 11. “Fair Value Measurements,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Commitments and Contingencies
In the normal course of business, we are subject to loss contingencies and loss recoveries, such as legal proceedings
and claims arising out of our business as well as tariff refunds. An accrual for a loss contingency or loss recovery is
recognized when it is probable and the amount of loss or recovery can be reasonably estimated. See Note 14.
“Commitments and Contingencies,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Business Combinations
Assets acquired and liabilities assumed as part of a business acquisition are generally recorded at their fair value at
the date of acquisition. The excess of purchase price over the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed is
recorded as goodwill. Determining fair value of identifiable assets, particularly intangibles, and liabilities acquired also
requires the Company to make estimates, which are based on all available information and in some cases assumptions with
respect to the timing and amount of future revenues and expenses associated with an asset. Accounting for business
acquisitions requires the Company to make judgments as to whether a purchase transaction is a multiple element contract,
meaning that it includes other transaction components. This judgment and determination affect the amount of consideration
paid that is allocable to assets and liabilities acquired in the business purchase transaction.
Intangible Assets
Intangible assets include patents and other purchased intangible assets. Intangible assets with finite lives are
amortized on a straight-line basis, with estimated useful lives ranging from 5 to 9 years. Indefinite-lived intangible assets are
tested for impairment annually and are also tested for impairment between annual tests if an event occurs or circumstances
change that would indicate that the carrying amount may be impaired. Intangible assets with finite lives are tested for
impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset (asset group) may not be
recoverable. An impairment loss is recognized when the carrying amount of an asset exceeds the estimated undiscounted
cash flows used in determining the fair value of the asset. The amount of the impairment loss to be recorded is calculated
by the excess of the asset’s carrying value over its fair value. Fair value is generally determined using a discounted cash
flow analysis. There was no impairment of intangible assets in any of the years presented.
Income Taxes
We record income taxes using the asset and liability method, which requires the recognition of deferred tax assets
and liabilities for the expected tax consequences of temporary differences between the tax bases of assets and liabilities for
financial reporting purposes and amounts recognized for income tax purposes. In estimating future tax consequences,
generally all expected future events other than enactments or changes in the tax law or rates are considered. Valuation
allowances are provided when necessary to reduce deferred tax assets to the amount expected to be realized.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 67
Table of Contents
We assess the realizability of the deferred tax assets to determine release of valuation allowance as necessary. In the
event we determine that it is more likely than not that we would be able to realize deferred tax assets in the future in excess
of our net recorded amount, an adjustment to the valuation allowance for the deferred tax asset would increase income in
the period such determination was made. Likewise, should it be determined that additional amounts of the net deferred tax
asset will not be realized in the future, an adjustment to increase the deferred tax asset valuation allowance will be charged
to income in the period such determination is made.
We operate in various tax jurisdictions and is subject to audit by various tax authorities. We follow accounting for
uncertainty in income taxes which requires that the tax effects of a position be recognized only if it is “more likely than not”
to be sustained based solely on its technical merits as of the reporting date. We consider many factors when evaluating and
estimating its tax positions and tax benefits, which may require periodic adjustments and which may not accurately
anticipate actual outcomes.
Item 7A.    Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
Market Risk
On March 9, 2020, we issued $320.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025, and entered into
privately-negotiated convertible note hedge and warrant transactions, which in combination are intended to reduce the
potential dilution from the conversion of the Notes due 2025 and to effectively increase the overall conversion price from
$81.54 to $106.94 per share. For the period from March 9, 2020 through May 19, 2020, the Notes due 2025, convertible
note hedge and warrant transactions could only be settled in cash because the number of authorized and unissued shares
of our common stock that was not reserved for other purposes was less than the maximum number of underlying shares
that would be required to settle the Notes due 2025, convertible note hedge and warrants transactions. As such, the
embedded conversion option associated with the Notes due 2025, convertible notes hedge and warrants liability met the
criteria for derivative accounting, and as a result, derivative financial instruments were marked-to-market at each reporting
period. The volatile market conditions arising from the COVID-19 pandemic resulted in significant changes in the price of
our common stock in the first half of 2020, causing variability in the fair value of these derivative financial instruments, and
materially affecting our consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2021. Change in fair value of
derivatives of $44.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2020 includes the charge recognized for the change in fair
value of our convertible notes embedded derivative and warrants of $47.6 million and $24.7 million, respectively, partially
offset by a gain recognized for the change in fair value of our convertible notes hedge of $28.0 million.
On May 20, 2020, we received approval at our annual meeting of stockholders to increase the authorized shares of
our common stock, par value $0.00001 per share, from 150,000,000 shares to 200,000,000 shares. As discussed further in
Note 13. “Debt,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form
10-K, we reclassified the remeasured fair value of embedded derivative, warrants and convertible notes hedge to additional
paid-in-capital in the consolidated balance sheet in the second quarter of 2020. As a result of this reclassification,
embedded derivative, warrants and convertible notes hedge are no longer marked to fair value at each reporting period.
Foreign Currency Exchange Risk
We operate and conduct business in foreign countries where our foreign entities use the local currency as their
respective functional currency and, as a result, are exposed to movements in foreign currency exchange rates. More
specifically, we face foreign currency exposure primarily from the effect of fluctuating exchange rates on payables and
receivables relating to transactions that are denominated in Euros, Indian Rupee and Australian, Canadian and New
Zealand Dollars. These payables and receivables primarily arise from sales to customers and intercompany transactions.
We also face currency exposure that arises from translating the results of our European, Indian, Australian, Canadian and
New Zealand operations, including sales and marketing and research and development expenses, to the U.S. dollar at
exchange rates that have fluctuated from the beginning of a reporting period.
The effect of a hypothetical 10% adverse change in foreign exchange rates on monetary assets and liabilities at
December 31, 2021 would not be material to our financial condition or results of operations. To date, foreign currency
transaction gains and losses and exchange rate fluctuations have not been material to our financial statements, and we
have not engaged in any foreign currency hedging transactions.
We do not enter into derivative financial instruments for trading or speculative purposes. We did not enter into any
foreign currency forward contracts during 2021 and 2020. Any foreign currency forward contracts entered in the
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 68
Table of Contents
future are accounted for as derivatives whereby the fair value of the contracts is reported as other current assets or current
liabilities, and gains and losses resulting from changes in the fair value are reported in other income (expense), net, in the
accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
Credit Risk
Financial instruments that subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist primarily of cash, cash equivalents,
marketable securities, accounts receivable, and derivative financial instruments. We maintain a substantial portion of our
cash balances in non-interest-bearing and interest-bearing marketable securities and money market accounts. The
derivative financial instruments expose us to credit risk to the extent that the counterparties may be unable to meet the
terms of the arrangement. We mitigate this credit risk by transacting with major financial institutions with high credit ratings.
We are not required to pledge, and are not entitled to receive, cash collateral related to these derivative instruments. We do
not enter into derivative contracts for trading or speculative purposes. Our net revenues are primarily concentrated among a
limited number of customers. We monitor the financial condition of our customers and perform credit evaluations whenever
considered necessary and maintain an allowance for doubtful accounts for estimated potential credit losses.
Interest Rate Risk
We had cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities of $1,016.7 million and $679.4 million as of December 31,
2021 and 2020, respectively, consisting of both non-interest bearing and interest-bearing marketable securities, and money
market accounts. Such interest-earning instruments carry a degree of interest rate risk, but the risk is limited due to the
duration of our short term investments. To date, fluctuations in interest income have not been significant. We do not enter
into investments for trading or speculative purposes and have not used any derivative financial instruments to manage our
interest rate risk exposure. We have not been exposed to, nor do we anticipate being exposed to, material risks due to
changes in interest rates.
Our cash flow exposure due to changes in interest rates related to our debt is limited as the Notes due 2025 and
Notes due 2023 have fixed interest rates of 0.25% and 4.0%, respectively. The fair value of the Convertible Notes may
increase or decrease for various reasons, including fluctuations in the market price of our common stock, fluctuations in
market interest rates and fluctuations in general economic conditions. In the year ended December 31, 2021, we
recognized a $56.5 million non-cash loss on settlement of approximately $88.1 million and $217.7 million in aggregate
principal amount of the Notes due 2024 and Notes due 2025 respectively, as a result of the change in fair value. Based
upon the quoted market price as of December 31, 2021, the fair value of our Notes due 2025 was
approximately $240.0 million. Notes due 2023 are not actively traded and Notes due 2024 are no longer outstanding.
A hypothetical 10% change in interest rates during any of the periods presented would not have had a material impact
on our financial statements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 69
Table of Contents
Item 8.    Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
AS OF DECEMBER 31, 2021 AND 2020,
AND FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2021, 2020 AND 2019
Page
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID No. 34). 71
Consolidated Balance Sheets 75
Consolidated Statements of Operations 76
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 77
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’  Equity 78
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 80
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 82
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 70
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Enphase Energy, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Enphase Energy, Inc., and subsidiaries (the
"Company") as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive
income, stockholders' equity, and cash flows, for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the
related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in
all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria
established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission and our report dated February 11, 2022, expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company's
internal control over financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on the Company's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the
PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities
laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the
financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts
or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate
opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Warranty Obligations – Microinverters - Refer to Notes 2, 10 and 11 to the consolidated financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company’s warranty obligation provides for the replacement of microinverter units that fail during the product’s
warranty term of 15 to 25 years. The estimated warranty liability is developed for each generation of product and requires
management to estimate, among other factors, (1) the number of units expected to fail over time (i.e., failure rate); (2) the
number of failed units expected to result in warranty claims over time (i.e., claim rate); and (3) the per unit cost of
replacement units (i.e., replacement cost), all of which consider historical results, trends and the most current data available
when the financial statements are available to be issued. The Company’s warranty liability for all microinverter units sold
after January 1, 2014 is measured at fair value by applying both of the following to the liability that results from the 3 factors
discussed above: (1) compensation comprised of a profit element and risk premium required for a market participant to
assume the obligation and (2) a discount rate based on the Company’s credit adjusted risk free rate.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 71
Table of Contents
Given the subjectivity of estimating the projected failure rates and warranty claims, performing audit procedures to
evaluate whether the expected failure rates were appropriately determined as of December 31, 2021, required a high
degree of auditor judgment and an increased extent of effort.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the estimated failure rates used in determining the warranty obligation included the
following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of controls utilized in the review of the warranty obligation calculation, including controls
over the determination of estimated failure rates
•We evaluated the methods and assumptions used by management to estimate the failure rates used as part of the
calculation of the warranty obligation by:
–Testing the underlying data that served as the basis for the Company’s failure rate analysis, which include
historical claims and historical product sales, to evaluate the various assumptions and historical data
consisting of failure of individual components contained in its microinverters.
–Reviewing third party data compiled on similar products in order to challenge management’s assumptions
and identify supporting or contradictory evidence.
–Comparing management’s prior-year assumptions of expected failures to actual warranty claims received
during the current year to identify potential bias in the determination of the failure rate estimates used in the
warranty obligation recorded.
–Developing independent estimates of the future failure rates for product families by utilizing data analytics
and compared them to management assumptions.
Valuation of Intangibles related to Business Acquisitions – Refer Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company completed in December 2021 two acquisitions (“December acquisitions”) with a net purchase
consideration of $183.1 million. These transactions were accounted for as business combinations.
Auditing the accounting for the December acquisitions was complex due to the estimation uncertainty in the
Company’s determination of the fair value of the intangibles acquired, which primarily included trade names and developed
technology. The estimation uncertainty was primarily due to the sensitivity of the respective fair values to the underlying
significant assumptions. The fair value estimates of the trade names and developed technology intangible assets included
significant assumptions in the prospective financial information, including estimated weighted average cost of capital,
royalty rates and estimated revenue growth rates. These significant assumptions are forward looking and could be affected
by expectations about future economic and market conditions.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the valuation of intangible assets related to the December acquisitions included the
following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of controls over the estimation process supporting the fair value estimates of the trade
names and developed technology intangible assets, including management’s review of the significant assumptions.
•We evaluated the methods and assumptions used by management to estimate the valuation of intangible assets
by:
–Evaluating the Company's selection of the valuation methodologies, testing the significant assumptions and
the completeness and accuracy of the underlying data.
–Comparing significant assumptions in the prospective financial information to current industry trends, as
well as to the historical performance of the acquired business and a similar business segment of the
Company.
–Performing benchmarking approach for similar technology and performed inquiries with management to
corroborate assumptions around useful life of intangibles.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 72
Table of Contents
–Performing sensitivity analyses to evaluate the changes in the fair value of the intangible assets that would
result from the changes in significant assumptions.
–Engaging internal valuation specialists to assist with our evaluation of the methodologies used by the
Company and the evaluation of the discount rates by comparing them against discount rate ranges that
were independently developed using publicly available market data for comparable entities.
/s/ DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
San Francisco, California
February 11, 2022
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2010.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 73
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Enphase Energy, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Enphase Energy, Inc. and subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the Company
maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on
criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2021, of the Company
and our report dated February 11, 2022 expressed as an unqualified opinion on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for
its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management’s
Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal
control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are
required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting,
assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal
control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the
circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection
of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial
statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
/s/ DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
San Francisco, California
February 11, 2022
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 74
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except par value)
As of
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
ASSETS
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 119,316  $ 679,379  
Marketable securities 897,335  — 
Accounts receivable, net of allowances of $ 1,590  and $ 462 at December 31, 2021 and
December 31, 2020, respectively 333,626  182,165  
Inventory 74,400  41,764  
Prepaid expenses and other assets 37,784  29,756  
Total current assets 1,462,461  933,064  
Property and equipment, net 82,167  42,985  
Operating lease, right of use asset, net 14,420  17,683  
Intangible assets, net 97,758  28,808  
Goodwill 181,254  24,783  
Other assets 118,726  59,875  
Deferred tax assets, net 122,470  92,904  
Total assets $ 2,079,256  $ 1,200,102  
LIABILITIES AND ST OCKHOLDERS’  EQUITY
Current liabilities:
Accounts payable $ 113,767  $ 72,609  
Accrued liabilities 157,912  76,542  
Deferred revenues, current 62,670  47,665  
Warranty obligations, current (includes $ 14,612  and $ 8,267  measured at fair value at
December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, respectively) 19,395  11,260  
Debt, current 86,052  325,967  
Total current liabilities 439,796  534,043  
Long-term liabilities:
Deferred revenues, non-current 187,186  125,473  
Warranty obligations, non-current (includes $ 36,395  and $ 20,469  measured at fair value at
December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, respectively) 53,982  34,653  
Other liabilities 16,530  17,042  
Debt, non-current 951,594  4,898  
Total liabilities 1,649,088  716,109  
Commitments and contingencies (Note 14)
Stockholders’  equity:
Common stock, $ 0.00001  par value, 300,000  shares and 200,000  shares authorized; and
133,894  shares and 128,962  shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2021 and
December 31, 2020, respectively 1 1 
Additional paid-in capital 837,924  534,744  
Accumulated deficit (405,737 ) (51,186 )
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (2,020 ) 434 
Total stockholders’  equity 430,168  483,993  
Total liabilities and stockholders’  equity $ 2,079,256  $ 1,200,102  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 75
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In thousands, except per share data)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Net revenues $ 1,382,049  $ 774,425  $ 624,333  
Cost of revenues 827,627  428,444  403,088  
Gross profit 554,422  345,981  221,245  
Operating expenses:
Research and development 105,526  55,921  40,381  
Sales and marketing 128,974  52,927  36,728  
General and administrative 104,090  50,694  38,808  
Restructuring charges — — 2,599  
Total operating expenses 338,590  159,542  118,516  
Income from operations 215,832  186,439  102,729  
Other income (expense), net
Interest income 695 2,156  2,513  
Interest expense (45,152 ) (21,001 ) (9,691 )
Other (expense) income, net 6,050  (799) (5,437 )
Loss on partial settlement of convertible notes (56,497 ) (3,037) — 
Change in fair value of derivatives — (44,348 ) — 
Total other expense, net (94,904 ) (67,029 ) (12,615 )
Income before income taxes 120,928  119,410  90,114  
Income tax benefit 24,521  14,585  71,034  
Net income $ 145,449  $ 133,995  $ 161,148  
Net income per share:
Basic $ 1.09 $ 1.07 $ 1.38 
Diluted $ 1.02 $ 0.95 $ 1.23 
Shares used in per share calculation:
Basic 134,025  125,561  116,713  
Diluted 142,878  141,918  131,644  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 76
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Net income $ 145,449  $ 133,995  $ 161,148  
Other comprehensive income (loss):
Foreign currency translation adjustments (334) 1,357  (1,665 )
Marketable securities
Change in net unrealized loss (2,120 ) — — 
Less: reclassification adjustment for net losses included in net income — — — 
Net change, net of income tax benefit of $ 745 (2,120 ) — — 
Comprehensive income $ 142,995  $ 135,352  $ 159,483  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 77
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
(In thousands)
Common StockAdditional
Paid-In
CapitalAccumulated
DeficitAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Total
Stockholders’
Equity Shares Amount
Balance at December 31, 2018 107,035  $ 1 $ 353,335  $ (346,302 )$ 742 $ 7,776  
Cumulative-ef fect adjustment to
accumulated deficit related to the
adoption of ASU 2018-07 — — 27 (27) — — 
Issuance of common stock from
exercise of equity awards and
employee stock purchase plan 5,273  — 4,985  — — 4,985  
Payment of withholding taxes related
to net share settlement of equity
awards — — (8,198 ) — — (8,198 )
Settlement of convertible senior notes 10,801  — 58,857  — — 58,857  
Equity component of convertible senior
notes, net — — 35,387  — — 35,387  
Cost of convertible notes hedge
related to the convertible senior
notes, net — — (36,313 ) — — (36,313 )
Sale of warrants related to the
convertible senior notes — — 29,818  — — 29,818  
Stock-based compensation — — 20,417  — — 20,417  
Net income — — — 161,148  — 161,148  
Foreign currency translation
adjustments — — — — (1,665 ) (1,665 )
Balance at December 31, 2019 123,109  $ 1 $ 458,315  $ (185,181 )$ (923)$ 272,212  
Issuance of common stock from
exercise of equity awards and
employee stock purchase plan 4,002  — 8,395  — — 8,395  
Payment of withholding taxes related to
net share settlement of equity awards — — (68,330 ) — — (68,330 )
Equity component of convertible senior
notes, net — — 116,502  — — 116,502  
Cost of convertible notes hedge related
to the convertible senior notes, net — — (117,108 ) — — (117,108 )
Sale of warrants related to the
convertible senior notes — — 96,351  — — 96,351  
Equity component of settlement of
convertible senior notes, net — — (306,220 ) — — (306,220 )
Settlement of convertible senior notes 1,851  — 301,015  — — 301,015  
Exercise of convertible notes hedge
related to the convertible senior notes (1,851 ) — — — — — 
Exercise of warrants related to the
convertible senior notes 1,851  — — — — — 
Change in fair value of common stock
related to acquisition — — 3,321  — — 3,321  
Stock-based compensation — — 42,503  — — 42,503  
Net income — — — 133,995  — 133,995  
Foreign currency translation
adjustments — — — — 1,357  1,357  
Balance at December 31, 2020 128,962  $ 1 $ 534,744  $ (51,186 )$ 434 $ 483,993  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 78
Table of Contents
Common StockAdditional
Paid-In
CapitalAccumulated
DeficitAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Total
Stockholders’
Equity Shares Amount
Issuance of common stock from
exercise of equity awards and
employee stock purchase plan 2,808  — 7,484  — — 7,484  
Payment of withholding taxes related to
net share settlement of equity awards — — (29,136 ) — — (29,136 )
Equity component of convertible senior
notes, net — — 207,970  — — 207,970  
Cost of convertible notes hedge related
to the convertible senior notes, net — — (213,322 ) — — (213,322 )
Sale of warrants related to the
convertible senior notes — — 220,800  — — 220,800  
Equity component of settlement of
convertible senior notes, net — — (976,714 ) — — (976,714 )
Settlement of convertible senior notes 5,489  — 972,273  — — 972,273  
Exercise of convertible notes hedge
related to the convertible senior notes (5,721 ) — — — — — 
Exercise of warrants related to the
convertible senior notes 5,582  — — — — — 
Stock-based compensation — — 113,825  — — 113,825  
Net income — — — 145,449  — 145,449  
Repurchase of common stock (3,226 ) — — (500,000 ) — (500,000 )
Foreign currency translation
adjustments — — — — (334) (334)
Change in net unrealized loss on
marketable securities, net of tax — — — — (2,120 ) (2,120 )
Balance at December 31, 2021 133,894  $ 1 $ 837,924  $ (405,737 )$ (2,020 )$ 430,168  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 79
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Cash flows from operating activities:
Net income $ 145,449  $ 133,995  161,148  
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating
activities:
Depreciation and amortization 32,439  18,103  14,119  
Provision for doubtful accounts 477 425 217 
Asset impairment — — 1,124  
Non-cash interest expense 44,387  18,825  6,081  
Financing fees on extinguishment of debt — — 2,152  
Fees paid for repurchase and exchange of convertible notes due 2023 — — 6,000  
Loss on partial settlement of convertibles notes 56,497  3,037  — 
Deemed repayment of convertible notes attributable to accreted debt discount (15,718 ) (3,132 ) — 
Gain on settlement of debt securities (6,569 ) — — 
Change in fair value of debt securities (3,042 ) — — 
Stock-based compensation 114,286  42,503  20,176  
Change in fair value of derivatives — 44,348  — 
Deferred income taxes (31,241 ) (17,117 ) (73,375 )
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Accounts receivable (151,160 ) (34,321 ) (68,745 )
Inventory (29,258 ) (9,708 ) (15,789 )
Prepaid expenses and other assets (26,885 ) (14,636 ) (14,293 )
Accounts payable, accrued and other liabilities 117,183  35,695  22,200  
Warranty obligations 27,016  8,815  5,804  
Deferred revenues 78,167  (10,498 ) 72,248  
Net cash provided by operating activities 352,028  216,334  139,067  
Cash flows from investing activities:
Purchases of property and equipment (52,258 ) (20,558 ) (14,788 )
Purchase of intangible asset (250) — — 
Investments in private companies (58,000 ) (5,010 ) — 
Redemption of investment in private companies 26,569  — — 
Business acquisitions, net of cash acquired (235,652 ) — — 
Purchases of marketable securities (934,956 ) — — 
Maturities of marketable securities 35,000  — — 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,219,547 ) (25,568 ) (14,788 )
Cash flows from financing activities:
Issuance of convertible notes, net of issuance costs 1,188,439  312,420  127,413  
Purchase of convertible note hedges (286,235 ) (89,056 ) (36,313 )
Sale of warrants 220,800  71,552  29,818  
Fees paid for repurchase and exchange of convertible notes due 2023 — — (6,000 )
Principal payments and financing fees on debt (1,694 ) (2,575 ) (45,855 )
Partial repurchase of convertible notes (290,247 ) (40,728 ) — 
Proceeds from exercise of equity awards and employee stock purchase plan 7,484  8,395  4,985  
Repurchase of common stock (500,000 ) — — 
Payment of withholding taxes related to net share settlement of equity awards (29,136 ) (68,330 ) (8,198 )
Net cash provided by financing activities 309,411  191,678  65,850  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 80
Table of Contents
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents (1,955 ) 826 (257)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (560,063 ) 383,270  189,872  
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash—Beginning of period 679,379  296,109  106,237  
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash—End of period $ 119,316  $ 679,379  $ 296,109  
Reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash to the
consolidated balance sheets
Cash and cash equivalents 119,316  679,379  251,409  
Restricted cash — — 44,700  
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 119,316  $ 679,379  $ 296,109  
Supplemental cash flow disclosure:
Cash paid for interest $ 733 $ 1,875  $ 2,689  
Cash paid for income taxes $ 4,823  $ 3,452  $ 1,755  
Supplemental disclosures of non-cash investing and financing activities:
Purchases of fixed assets included in accounts payable $ 7,498  $ 3,630  $ 672 
Contingent consideration in connection with the acquisition $ 3,500  $ — $ — 
Accrued interest payable unpaid upon exchange of convertible notes due 2023 $ — $ — $ 833 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 81
Table of Contents
1.    DESCRIPTION OF BUSINESS AND BASIS OF PRESENTATION
Description of Business
Enphase Energy, Inc. (the “Company”) is a global energy technology company. The Company delivers smart, easy-to-
use solutions that manage solar generation, storage and communication on one platform. The Company revolutionized the
solar industry with its microinverter technology and produces a fully integrated solar-plus-storage solution.
Basis of Presentation and Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements are presented in accordance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States (“U.S.”), or GAAP. The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the
Company and its wholly-owned subsidiaries. All intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in
consolidation.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the
date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of income and expenses during the reporting period. Significant
estimates and assumptions reflected in the financial statements include revenue recognition, allowance for doubtful
accounts, stock-based compensation, deferred compensation arrangements, inventory valuation, accrued warranty
obligations, fair value of investments, debt derivatives, convertible notes and contingent consideration, fair value of acquired
intangible assets and goodwill, useful lives of acquired intangible assets and property and equipment, incremental
borrowing rate for right-of-use assets and lease liability, legal contingencies, and tax valuation allowance. These estimates
are based on information available as of the date of the financial statements; therefore, actual results could differ materially
from those estimates due to risks and uncertainties, including uncertainty in the ongoing semiconductor supply and logistics
constraints, and the evolving COVID-19 pandemic.
2.    SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Revenue Recognition
The Company generates revenue from sales of its solutions, which include microinverter units and related
accessories, an Envoy communications gateway, the cloud-based Enlighten monitoring service, storage solutions, Electric
Vehicle (“EV”) charging solutions beginning in the first quarter of 2022, design, proposal and permitting services, as well as
a platform matching cleantech asset owners to a local and on-demand workforce of service providers, to distributors, large
installers, OEMs and strategic partners.
Revenues are recognized when control of the promised goods or services are transferred to the Company’s
customers in an amount that reflects the consideration that is expected to be received in exchange for those goods or
services. The Company generates all of its revenues from contracts with its customers. A description of principal activities
from which the Company generates revenues follows.
•Products Delivered at a Point in Time. The Company sells its products and professional services to customers in
accordance with the terms of the related customer contracts. The Company generates revenues from sales of its
solutions, which include microinverter units and related accessories, an Envoy communications gateway and
Enlighten service, communications accessories, storage solutions, EV charging solutions beginning in the first
quarter of 2022, design, proposal and permitting services, as well as a platform matching cleantech asset owners
to a local and on-demand workforce of service providers to distributors, large installers, OEMs and strategic
partners. Microinverter units, microinverter accessories, storage and EV solutions, design, proposal and
permitting services, as well as completed work orders on its platform matching cleantech asset owners to a local
and on-demand workforce of service providers, are delivered to customers at a point in time, and the Company
recognizes revenue for these products or professional services when the Company transfers control of the
product or
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 82
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
professional services to the customer, which is generally upon product shipment or service delivery, respectively.
•Products Delivered Over Time. The sale of an Envoy communications gateway includes the Company’s Enlighten
cloud-based monitoring service. The full consideration for these products represents a single performance
obligation and is deferred at the sale date and recognized over the estimated service period of 6 years. The
Company also sells certain communication accessories that contain a service performance obligation to be
delivered over time. The revenue from these products is recognized over the related service period, which is
typically 5 or 12 years. The subscription services revenue generated from each customer’s subscription to the
Company’s design and proposal software is recognized on a ratable basis over the contract term beginning on
the date that the Company’s service is made available to the customer. The subscription contracts are generally
three to twelve months in length and billed in advance.
When the Company sells a product with more than one performance obligation, such as the IQ Combiner which
includes both hardware and Envoy, the total consideration is allocated to these performance obligations based on their
relative standalone selling prices.
The Company records certain contra revenue promotions as variable consideration and recognizes these promotions
at the time the related revenue is recorded.
The Company records upfront contract acquisition costs, such as sales commissions, to be capitalized and amortized
over the estimated life of the asset. For contracts that have a duration of less than one year, the Company follows the Topic
606 practical expedient and expenses these costs when incurred. Commissions related to the Company’s sale of
monitoring hardware and service are capitalized and amortized over the period of the associated revenue, which is 6 years.
See Note 3. “Revenue Recognition,” for additional information related to revenue recognition.
Cost of Revenues
The Company includes the following in cost of revenues: product costs, warranty, manufacturing personnel and
logistics costs, freight costs, inventory write-downs, hosting services costs related to the Company’s Enlighten service
offering and design and proposal services, depreciation and amortization of manufacturing test equipment and amortization
of capitalized software development costs related to the Company’s Enlighten service offering, design and proposal
services, and employee-related expenses associated with proposal and permitting services and design and proposal
service customer support. A description of principal activities from which the Company recognizes cost of revenue is as
follows.
•Products Delivered at a Point in Time. Cost of revenue from these products is recognized when the Company
transfers control of the product to the customer, which is generally upon shipment.
•Products Delivered Over Time. Cost of revenue from these products is recognized over the related service
period.
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Marketable Securities
The Company classifies investments in marketable securities as available-for-sale investments and records these
marketable securities at fair value. The Company determines the appropriate classification of marketable securities at the
time of purchase and reevaluates such designation at each balance sheet date. All highly liquid investments with original
maturities of 90 days or less from the date of purchase are classified as cash equivalents, while all others are presented
within current assets since these investments represent funds available for current operations and the Company has the
ability and intent, if necessary, to liquidate any of these investments within one year in order to meet liquidity needs or to
grow the business, including for potential business acquisitions or other strategic transactions.
Marketable securities are recorded at fair value, with the unrealized gains or losses unrelated to credit loss factors
included in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax. Realized gains and losses and declines in value
determined to be other than temporary based on the specific identification method are reported in other income (expense),
net in the consolidated statements of operations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 83
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The Company periodically reviews whether the securities may be other-than-temporarily impaired, including whether
or not (i) the Company has the intent to sell the security or (ii) it is more likely than not that the Company will be required to
sell the security before its anticipated recovery. If one of these factors is met, the Company records an impairment loss
associated with the impaired investment. The impairment loss will be recorded as a write-down of investments in the
consolidated balance sheets and a realized loss within other income (expense), net in the consolidated statements of
operations. There were no credit-related impairments recognized on the Company’s investments in marketable securities
during the periods presented.
For purposes of identifying and measuring impairment, the policy election was made to exclude the applicable
accrued interest from both the fair value and amortized cost basis. Applicable accrued interest of $2.1 million, net of the
allowance for credit losses, if any, is recorded in prepaid expenses and other current assets on the consolidated balance
sheets as of December 31, 2021.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments 
The fair value of a financial instrument is the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability
in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. The carrying amounts of the Company’s
cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable, accounts payable and accrued liabilities approximate fair value because of
the short maturity of those instruments. Equity investments with readily determinable fair value are carried at fair value
based on quoted market prices or estimated based on market conditions and risks existing at each balance sheet date.
Equity investments without readily determinable fair value are measured at cost less impairment, and are adjusted for
observable price changes in orderly transactions for an identical or similar investment of the same issuer.
Convertible Note Derivatives
In March 2020, the Company issued $320.0 million aggregate principal amount of its 0.25% convertible senior notes
due 2025 (the “Notes due 2025”). Concurrently with the issuance of Notes due 2025, the Company entered into privately-
negotiated convertible note hedge and warrant transactions which in combination are intended to reduce the potential
dilution from the conversion of the Notes due 2025. The Company could not elect to issue the shares of common stock
upon settlement of Notes due 2025 or convertible note hedge or warrant transactions due to insufficient authorized share
capital. As a result, the embedded conversion option and warrants were accounted for as derivative liabilities and
convertible notes hedge as a derivative asset and a gain (or loss) was reported in other expense, net in the consolidated
statement of operations to the extent the valuation changed from the date of issuance of Notes due 2025. On May 20, 2020,
at the Company’s annual meeting of stockholders, the stockholders approved an amendment to its certificate of
incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of the Company’s common stock. As a result, the Company is
now able to settle the Notes due 2025, convertible notes hedge and warrants through payment or delivery, as the case may
be, of cash, shares of its common stock or a combination thereof, at the Company’s election. Accordingly, on May 20, 2020,
the embedded derivative liability, convertible notes hedge and warrants liability were remeasured at a fair value and were
then reclassified to additional paid-in-capital in the consolidated balance sheet in the second quarter of 2020 and are no
longer remeasured as long as they continue to meet the conditions for equity classification. As of both December 31, 2021
and 2020, the Company does not have any convertible note derivatives. See Note 13. “Debt,” for additional information
related to these transactions.
Accounts Receivables and Contract Assets
The Company receives payments from customers based upon contractual billing schedules. Accounts receivable are
recorded when the right to consideration becomes unconditional. Contract assets include deferred product costs and
commissions associated with the deferred revenue and will be amortized along with the associated revenue.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 84
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts
The Company maintains allowances for doubtful accounts for uncollectible accounts receivable. Management
estimates anticipated credit losses from doubtful accounts based on days past due, customer specific experience, collection
history, the financial health of customers including from the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, among other factors.
Accounts receivable are recorded net of allowance for doubtful accounts. The following table sets forth activities in the
allowance for doubtful accounts for the periods indicated.
December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Balance, at beginning of year $ 462 $ 564 $ 2,138  
Net charges to expense or reduction in revenue 1,140  425 217 
Write-of fs, net of recoveries (12) (527) (1,791 )
Balance, at end of year $ 1,590  $ 462 $ 564 
Inventory
Inventory is valued at the lower of cost or market. Market is current replacement cost (by purchase or by
reproduction, dependent on the type of inventory). In cases where market exceeds net realizable value (i.e., estimated
selling price less reasonably predictable costs of completion and disposal), inventories are stated at net realizable value.
Market is not considered to be less than net realizable value reduced by an allowance for an approximately normal profit
margin. The Company determines cost on a first-in first-out basis. Management assesses the valuation on a quarterly basis
and writes down the value for any excess and obsolete inventory based upon expected demand, anticipated sales price,
effect of new product introductions, product obsolescence, customer concentrations, product merchantability and other
factors. Inventory write-downs are equal to the difference between the cost of inventories and market.
Long-Lived Assets
Property and equipment are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Cost includes amounts paid to acquire or
construct the asset as well as any expenditure that substantially adds to the value of or significantly extends the useful life
of an existing asset. Repair and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. Depreciation and amortization are computed
using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets, which range from 3 to 10 years. Leasehold
improvements are amortized over the shorter of the lease term or expected useful life of the improvements.
Internal-use software, whether purchased or developed, is capitalized at cost and amortized on a straight-line basis
over its estimated useful life. Costs associated with internally developed software are expensed until the point at which the
project has reached the development stage. Subsequent additions, modifications or upgrades to internal-use software are
capitalized only to the extent that they provide additional functionality. Software maintenance and training costs are
expensed in the period in which they are incurred. The capitalization of internal-use software requires judgment in
determining when a project has reached the development stage and the period over which the Company expects to benefit
from the use of that software.
The Company capitalizes implementation costs related to cloud computing (i.e. hosting) arrangements that are
accounted for as a service contract that meets the accounting requirement for capitalization as such implementation costs
were incurred to develop or utilize internal-use software hosted by a third party vendor. The capitalized implementation
costs are recorded as part of “Other assets” on the consolidated balance sheet and is amortized over the length of the
service contract.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 85
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Property, plant and equipment, including internal-use software, and capitalized implementation costs related to cloud
computing arrangements, are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amount of an asset (asset group) may not be recoverable. An impairment loss would be recognized when the
carrying amount of an asset exceeds the estimated undiscounted future cash flows expected to result from the use of the
asset and its eventual disposition. The amount of the impairment loss to be recorded is calculated by the excess of the
asset’s carrying value over its fair value. Fair value is generally determined using a discounted cash flow analysis. The
Company recorded asset impairment charges for specific assets that were no longer in use of approximately zero, zero and
$1.1 million for the years ended 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively. There were no events or changes in circumstances that
may indicate the carrying amount of remaining assets is not recoverable.
Business Combinations
Assets acquired and liabilities assumed as part of a business acquisition are generally recorded at their fair value at
the date of acquisition. The excess of purchase price over the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed is
recorded as goodwill. Determining fair value of identifiable assets, particularly intangibles, and liabilities acquired also
requires the Company to make estimates, which are based on all available information and in some cases assumptions with
respect to the timing and amount of future revenues and expenses associated with an asset. Accounting for business
acquisitions requires the Company to make judgments as to whether a purchase transaction is a multiple element contract,
meaning that it includes other transaction components. This judgment and determination affect the amount of consideration
paid that is allocable to assets and liabilities acquired in the business purchase transaction. Additional information existing
as of the acquisition date but unknown to the Company may become known during the remainder of the measurement
period, not to exceed 12 months from the acquisition date, which may result in changes to the amounts and allocations
recorded.
Goodwill
Goodwill results from the purchase consideration paid in excess of the fair value of the net assets recorded in
connection with business acquisitions. Goodwill is not amortized but is assessed for potential impairment at least annually
during the fourth quarter of each fiscal year or between annual tests if an event occurs or circumstances change that would
indicate the carrying amount may be impaired. Goodwill is tested at the reporting unit level, which the Company has
determined to be the same as the entity as a whole (entity level). The Company first performs qualitative assessment to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of our reporting unit is less than its carrying value. If, after
assessing the qualitative factors, we determine that it is more likely than not that the fair value of our reporting unit is less
than its carrying value, an impairment analysis will be performed.
Qualitative factors include industry and market consideration, overall financial performance, share price trends and
market capitalization and Company-specific events. The Company determined, after performing a qualitative review of its
reporting unit, that it is more likely than not that the fair value of our reporting unit exceeds its carrying value. Accordingly,
there was no indication of impairment in the years ended 2021, 2020 and 2019 and no quantitative goodwill impairment test
was performed.
Intangible Assets
Intangible assets include patents and other purchased intangible assets. Intangible assets with finite lives are
amortized on a straight-line basis, with estimated useful lives ranging from 5 to 9 years. Indefinite-lived intangible assets are
tested for impairment annually and are also tested for impairment between annual tests if an event occurs or circumstances
change that would indicate that the carrying amount may be impaired. Intangible assets with finite lives are tested for
impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset (asset group) may not be
recoverable. An impairment loss is recognized when the carrying amount of an asset exceeds the estimated undiscounted
cash flows used in determining the fair value of the asset. The amount of the impairment loss to be recorded is calculated
by the excess of the asset’s carrying value over its fair value. Fair value is generally determined using a discounted cash
flow analysis. There was no impairment of intangible assets in any of the years presented.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 86
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Contract Liabilities
Contract liabilities are recorded as deferred revenue on the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and include
payments received in advance of performance obligations under the contract and are realized when the associated revenue
is recognized under the contract.
Warranty Obligations
Microinverters and Other Products Sold Through December 31, 2013
The Company’s warranty accrual provides for the replacement of microinverter units or other products that fail during
the product’s warranty term (typically 15 years for first and second generation microinverters and up to 25 years for
subsequent generation microinverters). On a quarterly basis, the Company employs a consistent, systematic and rational
methodology to assess the adequacy of its warranty liability. This assessment includes updating all key estimates and
assumptions for each generation of product, based on historical results, trends and the most current data available as of the
filing date. The key estimates and assumptions used in the warranty liability are thoroughly reviewed by management on a
quarterly basis. The key estimates used by the Company to estimate its warranty liability are: (1) the number of units
expected to fail over time (i.e., failure rate); (2) the number of failed units expected to result in warranty claims over time
(i.e., claim rate); and (3) the per unit cost of replacement units, including outbound shipping and limited labor costs,
expected to be incurred to replace failed units over time (i.e., replacement cost).
Estimated Failure Rates — The Company’s Quality and Reliability department has primary responsibility to
determine the estimated failure rates for each generation of microinverter. To establish initial failure rate estimates for each
generation of microinverter, the Company’s quality engineers use a combination of industry standard Mean Time Between
Failure (“MTBF”) estimates for individual components contained in its microinverters, third party data collected on similar
equipment deployed in outdoor environments similar to those in which the Company’s microinverters are installed, and
rigorous long term reliability and accelerated life cycle testing which simulates the service life of the microinverter in a short
period of time. As units are deployed into operating environments, the Company continues to monitor product performance
through its Enlighten monitoring platform. It typically takes three to nine months between the date of sale and date of end-
user installation. Consequently, the Company’s ability to monitor actual failures of units sold similarly lags by three to nine
months. When a microinverter fails and is returned, the Company performs diagnostic root cause failure analysis to
understand and isolate the underlying mechanism(s) causing the failure. The Company then uses the results of this
analysis (combined with the actual, cumulative performance data collected on those units prior to failure through Enlighten)
to draw conclusions with respect to how or if the identified failure mechanism(s) will impact the remaining units deployed in
the installed base.
Estimated Claim Rates — Warranty claim rate estimates are based upon observed historical trends and
assumptions with respect to expected customer behavior over the warranty period. As the vast majority of the Company’s
microinverters have been sold to end users for residential applications, the Company believes that warranty claim rates will
be affected by changes over time in residential home ownership because the Company expects that subsequent
homeowners are less likely to file claims than the homeowners who originally purchase the microinverters.
Estimated Replacement Costs — Three factors are considered in the Company’s analysis of estimated replacement
cost: (1) the estimated cost of replacement microinverters; (2) the estimated cost to ship replacement microinverters to end
users; and (3) the estimated labor reimbursement expected to be paid to third party installers performing replacement
services for the end user. Because the Company’s warranty provides for the replacement of defective microinverters over
long periods of time (between 15 and 25 years, depending on the generation of product purchased), the estimated per unit
cost of current and future product generations is considered in the estimated replacement cost. Estimated costs to ship
replacement units are based on observable, market-based shipping costs paid by the Company to third party freight
carriers. The Company has a separate program that allows third-party installers to claim fixed-dollar reimbursements for
labor costs they incur to replace failed microinverter units for a limited time from the date of original installation. Included in
the Company’s estimated replacement cost is an analysis of the number of fixed-dollar labor reimbursements expected to
be claimed by third party installers over the limited offering period.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 87
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
In addition to the key estimates noted above, the Company also compares actual warranty results to expected results
and evaluates any significant differences. Management may make additional adjustments to the warranty provision based
on performance trends or other qualitative factors. If actual failure rates, claim rates, or replacement costs differ from the
Company’s estimates in future periods, changes to these estimates may be required, resulting in increases or decreases in
the Company’s warranty obligations. Such increases or decreases could be material.
Fair Value Option for Microinverters and Other Products Sold Since January 1, 2014
The Company’s warranty obligations related to microinverters sold since January 1, 2014 provide the Company the
right, but not the requirement, to assign its warranty obligations to a third-party. Under Accounting Standards Codification
(“ASC”) 825, “Financial Instruments” (also referred to as “fair value option”), an entity may choose to elect the fair value
option for such warranties at the time it first recognizes the eligible item. The Company made an irrevocable election to
account for all eligible warranty obligations associated with microinverters sold since January 1, 2014 at fair value. This
election was made to reflect the underlying economics of the time value of money for an obligation that will be settled over
an extended period of up to 25 years.
The Company estimates the fair value of warranty obligations by calculating the warranty obligations in the same
manner as for sales prior to January 1, 2014 and applying an expected present value technique to that result. The expected
present value technique, an income approach, converts future amounts into a single current discounted amount. In addition
to the key estimates of failure rates, claim rates and replacement costs, the Company used certain inputs that are
unobservable and significant to the overall fair value measurement. Such additional assumptions included compensation
comprised of a profit element and risk premium required of a market participant to assume the obligation and a discount
rate based on the Company’s credit-adjusted risk-free rate. See Note 11. “Fair Value Measurements,” for additional
information.
Warranty obligations initially recorded at fair value at the time of sale will be subsequently re-measured to fair value at
each reporting date. In addition, the fair value of the liability will be accreted over the corresponding term of the warranty of
up to 25 years using the interest method.
Warranty for Other Products
The Company offers a 5‑year warranty for its Envoy communications gateway and a 10‑year warranty on its AC
Battery storage solution. The warranties provide the Company with the right, but not the obligation, to assign its warranty
obligations to a third-party. As such, warranties for Envoy and AC Battery storage solution products are accounted for under
the fair value method of accounting.
Commitments and Contingencies
In the normal course of business, the Company is subject to loss contingencies and loss recoveries, such as legal
proceedings and claims arising out of its business as well as tariff refunds. An accrual for a loss contingency or loss
recovery is recognized when it is probable and the amount of loss or recovery can be reasonably estimated.
Advertising Costs
Advertising costs, which are expensed and included in sales and marketing expense when incurred, were
$16.2 million, $0.8 million and $0.6 million during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Research and Development Costs
The Company expenses research and development costs as incurred. Research and development expense consists
primarily of product development personnel costs, including salaries and benefits, stock-based compensation, other
professional costs and allocated facilities costs.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 88
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Stock-Based Compensation
Share-based payments are required to be recognized in the Company’s consolidated statements of operations based
on their fair values and the estimated number of shares expected to vest. The Company measures stock-based
compensation expense for all share-based payment awards, including stock options made to employees and directors,
based on the estimated fair values on the date of the grant. The fair value of stock options granted is estimated using the
Black-Scholes option valuation model. The fair value of restricted stock units granted is determined based on the price of
the Company’s common stock on the date of grant. The fair value of non-market‑based performance stock units granted is
determined based on the date of grant or when achievement of performance is probable. The fair value of market‑based
performance stock units granted is determined using a Monte‑Carlo model based on the date of grant or when achievement
of performance is probable.
Stock-based compensation for stock options and restricted stock units (“RSUs”) is recognized on a straight-line basis
over the requisite service period. Stock-based compensation for performance stock units (“PSUs”) without market
conditions is recognized when the performance condition is probable of being achieved, and then on a graded basis over
the requisite service period. Stock-based compensation for PSUs with market conditions is recognized on a straight-line
basis over the requisite service period. Additionally, the Company estimates its forfeiture rate annually based on historical
experience and revise the estimates of forfeiture in subsequent periods if actual forfeitures differ from those estimates.
Common Stock Repurchase
The Company accounts for repurchase of common stock under ASC 505 and charges the entire cost of repurchase to
the accumulated deficit.
Leases
The Company determines if an arrangement is or contains a lease at inception. Operating lease assets represent the
Company’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent the Company’s obligation to
make lease payments over the lease term.
Operating lease assets and liabilities are recognized based on the present value of the remaining lease payments
discounted using the Company’s incremental borrowing rate. Operating lease assets also include initial direct costs incurred
and prepaid lease payments, minus any lease incentives. The Company’s lease terms include options to extend or
terminate the lease when it is reasonably certain that the Company will exercise that option. Lease expense is recognized
on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
The Company combines the lease and non-lease components in determining the operating lease assets and
liabilities.
Foreign Currency Translation
The Company and most of its subsidiaries use their respective local currency as their functional currency. Accordingly,
foreign currency assets and liabilities are translated using exchange rates in effect at the end of the period. Aggregate
exchange gains and losses arising from the translation of foreign assets and liabilities are included in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) in stockholders' equity. Foreign subsidiaries that use the U.S. dollar as their functional
currency remeasure monetary assets and liabilities using exchange rates in effect at the end of the period. In addition,
transactions that are denominated in non-functional currency are remeasured using exchange rates in effect at the end of
the period. Exchange gains and losses arising from the remeasurement of monetary assets and liabilities are included in
other income (expense), net in the consolidated statements of operations. Non-monetary assets and liabilities are carried at
their historical values.
Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Comprehensive income (loss) consists of two components, net income (loss) and other comprehensive income (loss).
Other comprehensive income (loss) refers to gains and losses that are recorded as an element of stockholders’ equity but
are excluded from net income (loss). The Company’s other comprehensive income (loss) consists of foreign currency
translation adjustments and change in net unrealized gain (loss) on marketable securities, net of tax.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 89
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Income Taxes
The Company records income taxes using the asset and liability method, which requires the recognition of deferred
tax assets and liabilities for the expected tax consequences of temporary differences between the tax bases of assets and
liabilities for financial reporting purposes and amounts recognized for income tax purposes. In estimating future tax
consequences, generally all expected future events other than enactments or changes in the tax law or rates are
considered. Valuation allowances are provided when necessary to reduce deferred tax assets to the amount expected to be
realized.
The Company assesses the realizability of the deferred tax assets to determine release of valuation allowance as
necessary. In the event the Company determines that it is more likely than not that we would be able to realize deferred tax
assets in the future in excess of our net recorded amount, an adjustment to the valuation allowance for the deferred tax
asset would increase income in the period such determination was made. Likewise, should it be determined that additional
amounts of the net deferred tax asset will not be realized in the future, an adjustment to increase the deferred tax asset
valuation allowance will be charged to income in the period such determination is made.
The Company operates in various tax jurisdictions and is subject to audit by various tax authorities. The Company
follows accounting for uncertainty in income taxes which requires that the tax effects of a position be recognized only if it is
“more likely than not” to be sustained based solely on its technical merits as of the reporting date. The Company considers
many factors when evaluating and estimating its tax positions and tax benefits, which may require periodic adjustments and
which may not accurately anticipate actual outcomes.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements
Not Yet Effective
In August 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”) 2020-06, “Debt - Debt with Conversion and
Other Options (subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging - Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (subtopic 815-40),” which
reduces the number of accounting models in ASC 470-20 that require separate accounting for embedded conversion
features. As a result, a convertible debt instrument will be accounted for as a single liability measured at its amortized cost
as long as no other features require bifurcation and recognition as derivatives. By removing those separation models, the
effective interest rate of convertible debt instruments will be closer to the coupon interest rate. Further, the diluted net
income per share calculation for convertible instruments will require the Company to use the if-converted method. The
treasury stock method should no longer be used to calculate diluted net income per share for convertible instruments. The
Company will adopt the new guidance in the annual period beginning January 1, 2022, on a modified retrospective basis.
On the date of adoption, the Company expects to record a net decrease to additional paid-in capital by approximately
$207.9 million, net of tax to remove the equity component separately recorded for the conversion features associated with
the convertible debt instruments and equity component associated with the issuance costs, an increase of approximately
$244.5 million in the carrying value of its convertible debt instrument to reflect the full principal amount of the Notes
outstanding net of issuance costs, a decrease to deferred tax liability of approximately $62.3 million, and a decrease of
approximately $25.7 million, net of tax to accumulated deficit. These estimates could change as the Company continues to
progress with the implementation of the standard.
In October 2021, the FASB issued ASU 2021-08, "Business Combinations (Topic 805): Accounting for Contract
Assets and Contract Liabilities from Contracts with Customers" (“ASU 2021-08”). The standard requires an acquirer in a
business combination to recognize and measure contract assets and contract liabilities acquired in a business combination
in accordance with ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, as if it had originated the contracts. The standard is
effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years, beginning after December 15, 2022. Early adoption is
permitted. The Company does not expect the adoption of ASU 2021-08 to have a significant impact on its consolidated
financial statements and plans to adopt the standard effective January 1, 2023.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 90
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
3.    REVENUE RECOGNITION
Disaggregated Revenue
The Company has one major business activity, which is the design, manufacture and sale of solutions for the solar
photovoltaic (“PV”) industry. Disaggregated revenue by primary geographical market and timing of revenue recognition for
the Company’s single product line are as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Primary geographical markets:
U.S. $ 1,108,801  $ 637,879  
International 273,248  136,546  
Total $ 1,382,049  $ 774,425  
Timing of revenue recognition:
Products delivered at a point in time $ 1,323,960  $ 728,254  
Products and services delivered over time 58,089  46,171  
Total $ 1,382,049  $ 774,425  
Contract Balances
Receivables, and contract assets and contract liabilities from contracts with customers are as follows:
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In thousands)
Receivables $ 333,626  $ 182,165  
Short-term contract assets (Prepaid expenses and other assets) 23,508  17,879  
Long-term contract assets (Other assets) 69,583  51,986  
Short-term contract liabilities (Deferred revenues, current) 62,670  47,665  
Long-term contract liabilities (Deferred revenues, non-current) 187,186  125,473  
The Company receives payments from customers based upon contractual billing schedules. Accounts receivable are
recorded when the right to consideration becomes unconditional. Contract assets include deferred product costs and
commissions associated with the deferred revenue and will be amortized along with the associated revenue. The Company
had no asset impairment charges related to contract assets in the year ended December 31, 2021.
Significant changes in the balances of contract assets (prepaid expenses and other assets) as of December 31, 2021
are as follows (in thousands):
Contract Assets
Contract Assets, beginning of period $ 69,865  
Amount recognized (21,894 )
Increase 45,120  
Contract Assets, end of period $ 93,091  
Contract liabilities are recorded as deferred revenue on the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and include
payments received in advance of performance obligations under the contract and are realized when the associated revenue
is recognized under the contract.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 91
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Significant changes in the balances of contract liabilities (deferred revenues) as of December 31, 2021 are as follows
(in thousands):
Contract Liabilities
Contract Liabilities, beginning of period $ 173,138  
Revenue recognized (64,793 )
Increase due to billings 141,511  
Contract Liabilities, end of period $ 249,856  
Remaining Performance Obligations
Estimated revenue expected to be recognized in future periods related to performance obligations that are unsatisfied
or partially unsatisfied at the end of the reporting period are as follows:
December 31,
2021
(In thousands)
Fiscal year:
2022 $ 62,671  
2023 55,497  
2024 50,300  
2025 43,362  
2026 27,607  
Thereafter 10,419  
Total $ 249,856  
4.    INVENTORY
Inventory consists of the following:
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In thousands)
Raw materials $ 25,429  $ 10,140  
Finished goods 48,971  31,624  
Total inventory $ 74,400  $ 41,764  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 92
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
5.    PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT, NET
Property and equipment consist of the following:
Estimated Useful
LifeDecember 31,
2021 2020
(Years) (In thousands)
Equipment and machinery 3-10 $ 95,365  $ 63,411  
Furniture and fixtures 5-10 3,197  2,532  
Computer equipment 3-5 5,861  2,972  
Capitalized software costs 3-5 28,118  17,004  
Building and leasehold improvements 3-10 12,546  9,021  
Land 114 — 
Construction in process 14,332  9,747  
Total 159,533  104,687  
Less accumulated depreciation and amortization (77,366 ) (61,702 )
Property and equipment, net $ 82,167  $ 42,985  
Depreciation expense for property and equipment for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was
$16.7 million, $9.7 million and $7.3 million, respectively.
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, unamortized capitalized software costs were $12.6 million and $4.8 million,
respectively.
6.    BUSINESS COMBINATIONS
Acquisition of ClipperCreek, Inc. (“ClipperCreek”)
On December 31, 2021, the Company completed the acquisition of 100% of the shares of ClipperCreek, a privately-
held company. ClipperCreek offers electric vehicle (“EV”) charging solutions for residential and commercial customers in the
U.S. As part of the purchase price, the Company paid approximately $113.1 million in cash on December 31, 2021. The
Company expects this acquisition will allow the Company to enter into the growing EV charging market and provides for
cross-selling opportunities.
The acquisition has been accounted for as a business combination under the acquisition method, and accordingly, the
total purchase price is allocated to the tangible and identifiable intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on
their respective fair values on the acquisition date.
In addition to the purchase price summarized above, the Company will be obligated to issue up to approximately
$40.0 million in shares of common stock of the Company payable in the first quarter of 2023, subject to achievement of
certain revenue and operational targets. As the additional payments require continuous employment of certain key
employees of ClipperCreek and are subject to other conditions, these payments are being accounted for as post-
combination expense and will be recognized ratably over the one year period presuming conditions will be met.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 93
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes the preliminary estimated fair values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed at
the acquisition date, which are subject to change within the measurement period as the fair value assessments are finalized
(in thousands):
Net tangible assets acquired $ 8,387  
Intangible assets 37,800  
Goodwill 66,916  
Net assets acquired $ 113,103  
The excess of the consideration paid over the fair values assigned to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed
represents the goodwill resulting from the acquisition. Goodwill is primarily attributable to expected synergies in the
Company’s solar offerings and cross-selling opportunities. The entire goodwill amount is expected to be deductible for U.S.
federal income tax purposes over 15 years.
Intangible assets consist primarily of trade name and order backlog. Trade name intangible is attributable to
marketing goods and services under the ClipperCreek brand and order backlog pertains to purchase orders with customers
yet to be fulfilled.
The following table shows the fair value of the separately identifiable intangible assets at the time of acquisition and
the period over which each intangible asset will be amortized:
Preliminary Fair
Value Useful Life
(In thousands) (Years)
Order backlog$ 600 Based on actual
shipments
Trade name 37,200  5
Total identifiable intangible assets $ 37,800  
The consolidated unaudited proforma revenue and net income for the two years presented below, which includes the
acquisition of ClipperCreek, assuming the acquisition occurred on January 1, 2020, were (in thousands);
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
Net revenues $ 1,401,803  $ 790,791  
Net income $ 145,798  $ 139,126  
The Company incurred and accrued costs related to this acquisition of $0.5 million that were recorded in general and
administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31,
2021.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 94
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Acquisition of 365 Pronto, Inc. (“365 Pronto”)
On December 13, 2021, the Company completed the acquisition of 100% of the shares of 365 Pronto, a privately-
held company. 365 Pronto provides an online platform for clean technology installation and service landscape by matching
asset owners with an on-demand qualified workforce in the U.S. As part of the purchase price, the Company paid
approximately $69.9 million in cash on December 13, 2021. The Company expects this acquisition will offer installers an
online platform to service their operations and maintenance contracts and provides access to a nationwide qualified
supplemental labor pool that can perform service calls.
The acquisition has been accounted for as a business combination under the acquisition method, and accordingly, the
total purchase price is allocated to the tangible and identifiable intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on
their respective fair values on the acquisition date. The results of operations of 365 Pronto have been included in the
Company’s consolidated statement of operations from the acquisition date.
In addition to the purchase price above, the Company will be obligated to pay up to approximately $11.0 million in
shares of the Company’s common stock in the first half of 2023 subject to achievement of certain revenue, operational and
employment targets. As nature of additional payments represents an in-substance service period of certain key employees
of 365 Pronto and are subject to other conditions, these payments are being accounted for as post-combination expense
and will be recognized ratably over the term of measurement period presuming conditions will be met.
The following table summarizes the preliminary estimated fair values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed at
the acquisition date, which are subject to change within the measurement period as the fair value assessments are finalized
(in thousands):
Net tangible assets acquired $ 38 
Intangible assets 19,500  
Deferred tax liabilities (2,906 )
Goodwill 53,280  
Net assets acquired $ 69,912  
The excess of the consideration paid over the fair values assigned to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed
represents the goodwill resulting from the acquisition. Goodwill is primarily attributable to expected synergies in the
Company’s solar offerings and cross-selling opportunities. None of the goodwill is expected to be deductible for U.S. federal
income tax purposes.
Intangible assets consist primarily of developed technology and customer relationship intangibles. Intangible assets
attributable to developed technology include a combination of unpatented technology, trade secrets, computer software and
research processes that represent the foundation for the existing and planned new products to facilitate the generation of
new content. Customer relationship intangibles relate to 365 Pronto’s software ability to sell current and future offerings, as
well as products built around the current offering, to its existing customers.
The following table shows the fair value of the separately identifiable intangible assets at the time of acquisition and
the period over which each intangible asset will be amortized:
Preliminary Fair
Value Useful Life
(In thousands) (Years)
Developed technology $ 18,400  5
Customer relationship 1,100  5
Total identifiable intangible assets $ 19,500  
Pro forma financial information has not been presented for the 365 Pronto acquisition as the impact to the Company’s
consolidated financial statements was not material.
The Company incurred and accrued costs related to this acquisition of $0.5 million that were recorded in general and
administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31,
2021.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 95
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Acquisition of DIN Engineer Service LLP’s (“DIN”) Solar Design Services Business
On March 31, 2021, the Company completed its acquisition of DIN’s solar design services business. DIN's solar
design services business provides outsourced proposal drawings and permit plan sets for residential solar installers in
North America and will enhance the Company’s digital transformation effort. As part of the purchase price, the Company
paid approximately $24.8 million in cash at closing on March 31, 2021.The Company expects this acquisition will provide
installers new services by providing proposal drawing and permit plan sets.
The acquisition has been accounted for as a business combination under the acquisition method; accordingly, the
total purchase price is allocated to the tangible and identifiable intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on
their respective fair values on the acquisition date. The results of operations of DIN’s solar design services business have
been included in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations from the acquisition date.
In addition to the purchase price summarized above, the Company will be obligated to pay up to i) approximately
$5.0 million in equal monthly installments over the course of one year following the acquisition date and ii) approximately
$5.0 million payable on the one year anniversary following the acquisition date subject to achievement of certain revenue
and operational targets. As both additional payments require continuous employment of certain key employees of DIN and
are subject to other conditions, these payments are being accounted for as post-combination expense and are recognized
ratably over the term of measurement period.
The following table summarizes the fair values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed at the acquisition date
(in thousands):
Net tangible assets acquired $ 1,281 
Intangible assets 11,700 
Goodwill 11,804 
Net assets acquired $ 24,785  
The excess of the consideration paid over the fair values assigned to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed
represents the goodwill resulting from the acquisition. Goodwill is primarily attributable to expected synergies in the
Company’s solar offerings and cross-selling opportunities. None of the goodwill is expected to be deductible for U.S. federal
income tax purposes.
Intangible assets consist primarily of customer relationship intangibles. Customer relationship intangibles relate to the
ability of the acquired DIN solar design services business to sell current and future offering, as well as products built around
the current offering, to its existing customers.
The following table shows the fair value of the separately identifiable intangible assets at the time of acquisition and
the period over which each intangible asset will be amortized:
Preliminary Fair
Value Useful Life
(In thousands) (Years)
Customer relationship $ 11,700  5
Pro forma financial information has not been presented for the DIN's solar design services business acquisition as the
impact to the Company’s consolidated financial statements was not material.
The Company incurred costs related to this acquisition of $1.9 million that were recorded in general and
administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31,
2021, respectively.
Acquisition of Sofdesk Inc. (“Sofdesk”)
On January 25, 2021, the Company completed the acquisition of 100% of the shares of Sofdesk, a privately-held
company. Sofdesk provides design tools and services software for residential solar installers and roofing companies and will
enhance the Company’s digital transformation efforts. The Company expects this acquisition will offer installers design,
proposal and permitting services of home energy solutions.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 96
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
As part of the purchase price, the Company (i) paid approximately $32.0 million in cash on January 25, 2021 and (ii)
is liable for up to approximately $3.7 million of contingent consideration payable during the first quarter of 2022, of which the
Company recorded a liability of approximately $3.5 million representing the fair value of the contingent consideration.
The contingent consideration is subject to remeasurement at each reporting period until paid. The acquisition date fair
value of the purchase price was approximately $35.5 million, which consisted of the following (in thousands):
Cash consideration $ 31,988  
Fair value of contingent consideration 3,500  
Total $ 35,488  
In addition to the purchase price discussed above, the Company will be obligated to pay up to approximately $3.7 million,
during the first quarter of 2022, subject to continued employment of key employees of Sofdesk. As this payment is
contingent upon the continuous service of the key employees, it is being accounted for as a post-combination expense and
is recognized ratably over the term of measurement period.
The acquisition has been accounted for as a business combination under the acquisition method, and accordingly, the
total purchase price is allocated to the tangible and identifiable intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on
their respective fair values on the acquisition date. The results of operations of Sofdesk have been included in the
Company’s consolidated statement of operations from the acquisition date.
The following table summarizes the fair values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed at the acquisition date,
(in thousands):
Net tangible assets acquired $ 1,441  
Intangible assets 9,200  
Deferred tax asset 457 
Goodwill 24,390  
Net assets acquired $ 35,488  
The excess of the consideration paid over the fair values assigned to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed
represents the goodwill resulting from the acquisition. Goodwill is primarily attributable to expected synergies in the
Company’s solar offerings and cross-selling opportunities. None of the goodwill is expected to be deductible for U.S. federal
income tax purposes.
Intangible assets consist primarily of developed technology, customer relationship intangibles and trade name
intangibles. Intangible assets attributable to developed technology include a combination of unpatented technology, trade
secrets, computer software and research processes that represent the foundation for the existing and planned new
products to facilitate the generation of new content. Customer relationship intangibles relate to Sofdesk’s software ability to
sell current and future offerings, as well as products built around the current offering, to its existing customers. Trade name
intangibles are attributable to marketing goods and services under the Solargraf and Roofgraf brands.
The following table shows the fair value of the separately identifiable intangible assets at the time of acquisition and
the period over which each intangible asset will be amortized:
Preliminary Fair
Value Useful Life
(In thousands) (Years)
Developed technology $ 6,900  5
Customer relationship 1,800  5
Trade name 500 5
Total identifiable intangible assets $ 9,200  TM TM
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 97
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Pro forma financial information has not been presented for the Sofdesk acquisition as the impact to the Company’s
consolidated financial statements was not material.
The Company incurred costs related to this acquisition of $2.0 million that were recorded in general and
administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31,
2021.
7.    GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
The Company’s goodwill as of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020 are as follows:
GoodwillDecember 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In thousands)
Goodwill, beginning of period $ 24,783  $ 24,783  
Goodwill acquired 156,390  — 
Currency translation adjustment 81 — 
Goodwill, end of period $ 181,254  $ 24,783  
The Company’s purchased intangible assets as of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020 are as follows:
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Gross AdditionsAccumulated
Amortization Net Gross AdditionsAccumulated
Amortization Net
(In thousands)
Intangible assets:
Other indefinite-lived
intangibles $ 286 $ — $ — $ 286 $ 286 $ — $ — $ 286 
Intangible assets with
finite lives:
Developed technology 13,100  25,550  (8,958 ) 29,692  13,100  — (5,276 ) 7,824  
Customer relationships 26,421  14,600  (11,448 ) 29,573  23,100  3,321  (5,723 ) 20,698  
Trade names — 37,700  (93) 37,607  — — — — 
Order backlog — 600 — 600 — — — — 
Total purchased
intangible assets $39,807  $78,450  $(20,499 )$97,758  $36,486  $ 3,321  $(10,999 )$28,808  
Amortization expense related to finite-lived intangible assets are as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Developed technology $ 3,681  $ 2,183  
Customer relationships 5,726  2,909  
Trade names 93 — 
Total amortization expense $ 9,500  $ 5,092  
Amortization of developed technology, customer relationships and trade names is recorded to cost of sales and sales
and marketing expense.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 98
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The expected future annual amortization expense of intangible assets as of December 31, 2021 is presented below
(in thousands):
December 31,
2021
Fiscal year:
2022 $ 22,212  
2023 21,856  
2024 19,059  
2025 17,744  
2026 14,185  
Thereafter 2,416  
Total $ 97,472  
8.    CASH EQUIVALENTS AND MARKETABLE SECURITIES
The marketable securities consist of the following (in thousands):
As of December 31, 2021
Amortized CostGross Unrealized
GainsGross Unrealized
LossesFair Value Cash and Cash
EquivalentsMarketable
Securities
Money market funds $ 35,789  $ — $ — $ 35,789  $ 35,789  $ — 
Certificate of Deposit 16,001  — (2) 15,999  6,000  9,999  
Commercial paper 215,964  — (114) 215,850  26,997  188,853  
Corporate notes and
bonds 199,244  — (872) 198,372  760 197,612  
U.S. Treasuries 14,999  — (1) 14,998  — 14,998  
U.S. Government agency
securities 487,743  — (1,870 ) 485,873  — 485,873  
Total $ 969,740  $ — $ (2,859 )$ 966,881  $ 69,546  $ 897,335  
The following table summarizes the contractual maturities of the Company’s marketable securities as of
December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
Amortized Cost Fair Value
Due within one year $ 533,237  $ 532,689  
Due within one to three years 436,503  434,192  
Total $ 969,740  $ 966,881  
All available-for-sale securities have been classified as current, based on management's intent and ability to use the
funds in current operations.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 99
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
9.     ACCRUED LIABILITIES
Accrued liabilities consist of the following:
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In thousands)
Salaries, commissions, incentive compensation and benefits $ 13,062  $ 6,634  
Customer rebates and sales incentives 79,038  36,622  
Freight 20,522  10,300  
Operating lease liabilities, current 3,830  4,542  
Liability due to supply agreements 14,653  5,500  
Contingent consideration 3,710  — 
Post combination expense accrual 8,602  — 
Other 14,495  12,944  
Total accrued liabilities $ 157,912  $ 76,542  
10.    WARRANTY OBLIGATIONS
The Company’s warranty activities were as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Warranty obligations, beginning of period $ 45,913  $ 37,098  $ 31,294  
Accruals for warranties issued during period 18,098  7,021  5,244  
Changes in estimates 19,414  9,954  8,591  
Settlements (15,073 ) (12,811 ) (10,881 )
Increase due to accretion expense 4,654  3,255  2,326  
Other 371 1,396  524 
Warranty obligations, end of period 73,377  45,913  37,098  
Less: current portion (19,395 ) (11,260 ) (10,078 )
Non-current $ 53,982  $ 34,653  $ 27,020  
Changes in Estimates
On a quarterly basis, the Company uses the best and most complete underlying information available, following a
consistent, systematic and rational methodology to determine its warranty obligations. The Company considers all available
evidence to assess the reasonableness of all key assumptions underlying its estimated warranty obligations for each
generation of microinverter. The changes in estimates discussed below resulted from consideration of new or additional
information becoming available and subsequent developments. Changes in estimates included in the table above were
comprised of the following:
2021
In 2021, the Company recorded $19.4 million in warranty expense from changes in estimates, of which $11.6 million
relates to continuing analysis of field performance data and diagnostic root-cause failure analysis primarily relating to its
prior generation products, and $7.8 million relates to the timing of cost reduction assumptions for replacement products as
the Company prioritizes servicing current sales demand and the increase in component costs due to global supply
constraints.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 100
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
2020
In 2020, the Company recorded a $8.8 million increase to warranty expense based on continuing analysis of field
performance data and diagnostic root-cause failure analysis primarily relating to its prior generation products. The Company
also recorded additional warranty expense of $1.2 million related to unit costs for prior generation microinverter replacement
driven by tariffs and labor reimbursement costs expected to be paid to third party installers performing replacement
services.
2019
In 2019, the Company recorded a $5.5 million increase to warranty expense related to cost increases primarily driven
by increased U.S. tariffs announced during 2019 for its products manufactured in China. The Company also recorded
additional warranty expense of $3.1 million based on continuing analysis of field performance data and diagnostic root-
cause failure analysis primarily relating to its second and third generation products, partially offset by improved failure rates
for its IQ7 series.
11.    FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
The accounting guidance defines fair value as the price that would be received from selling an asset or paid to
transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. When determining the fair
value measurements for assets and liabilities recorded at fair value, the Company considers the principal or most
advantageous market in which it would transact and considers assumptions that market participants would use when pricing
the asset or liability, such as inherent risk, transfer restrictions, and risk of nonperformance.
The fair value hierarchy requires an entity to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
unobservable inputs when measuring fair value. An asset’s or liability’s categorization within the fair value hierarchy is
based upon the lowest level of input that is significant to the fair value measurement. Three levels of inputs may be used to
measure fair value:
•Level 1 - Valuations based on quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities that the Company is
able to access. Since valuations are based on quoted prices that are readily and regularly available in an active
market, valuation of such assets or liabilities do not entail a significant degree of judgment.
•Level 2 - Valuations based on one or more quoted prices in markets that are not active or for which all significant
inputs are observable, either directly or indirectly.
•Level 3 - Valuations based on inputs that are unobservable and significant to the overall fair value measurement.
The following table presents assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis using the above input
categories:
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 101
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(In thousands)
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Assets:
Cash and cash equivalents:
Money market funds $ 35,789  $ — $ — $ 654,699  $ — $ — 
Certificate of deposit — 6,000  — — — — 
Commercial paper — 26,997  — — — — 
Corporate notes and bonds — 760 — — — — 
Marketable securities:
Certificate of deposit — 9,999  — — — — 
Commercial paper — 188,853  — — — — 
Corporate notes and bonds — 197,612  — — — — 
U.S. Government agencies — 485,873  — — — — 
U.S. Treasuries — 14,998  — — — — 
Other assets
Investments in debt securities — — 41,042  — — — 
Total assets measured at fair value $ 35,789  $ 931,092  $ 41,042  $ 654,699  $ — $ — 
Liabilities:
Accrued liabilities
Contingent consideration $ — $ — $ 3,710  $ — $ — $ — 
Warranty obligations
Current — — 14,612  — — 8,267  
Non-current — — 36,395  — — 20,469  
Total warranty obligations
measured at fair value — — 51,007  — — 28,736  
Total liabilities measured at fair value $ — $ — $ 54,717  $ — $ — $ 28,736  
Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025
The Company carries the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025 (as defined below) at face value less
unamortized discount and issuance costs on its consolidated balance sheets. The fair value of the Notes due 2028, Notes
due 2026 and Notes due 2025 was $594.4 million, $642.3 million and $240.0 million, respectively, as of December 31, 2021
based on the closing trading prices per $100 principal amount as of the last day of trading for the period. The Company
considers the fair value of the Notes due 2028, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2025 to be a Level 2 measurement as they
are not actively traded.
Equity investments without readily determinable fair value
In December 2020, the Company invested approximately $5.0 million in a privately-held company without readily
determinable market value, which is included in “Other assets” in the consolidated balance sheets. The Company has
elected the measurement alternative for equity investments that do not have readily determinable fair values. The Company
did not record an impairment charge on its investment during the year ended December 31, 2021, as no events or changes
in circumstances were identified which could result as an indicator for impairment. Further, there were no observable price
changes in orderly transactions for the identical or a similar investment of the same issuer during the year ended
December 31, 2021. Equity investments without readily determinable fair value are classified within Level 3 in the fair value
hierarchy because the Company estimates the value based on valuation methods using a combination of observable and
unobservable inputs, including valuation ascribed to the issuing company in subsequent financing rounds, volatility in the
results of operations of the issuers and rights and obligations of the securities the Company holds.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 102
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Investments in debt securities
In January 2021, the Company invested approximately $25.0 million in a privately-held company. The Company
concluded the investment qualifies as an investment in a debt security, as it accrues interest and principal plus accrued
interest becomes payable back to the Company at certain dates unless it is converted to equity at a pre-determined price.
As the investment includes a conversion option, the Company has elected to account for this investment under the fair
value option and any change in fair value of the investment is recognized in “Other income (expense), net” in the
Company’s consolidated statement of operations for that period. Further, the Company has concluded that the Company’s
investment in a debt security is considered to be a Level 3 measurement due to the use of significant unobservable inputs
in the valuation model. The fair value was determined using discounted cash flow methodology and assumptions include
implied yield and change in estimated term of investment being held-to-maturity.
In June 2021, the Company invested approximately $20.0 million in secured convertible promissory notes issued by a
privately-held company. The investment qualifies as an investment in a debt security and will accrete interest and principal
plus accrued interest becomes payable at certain dates unless it is converted to equity at a pre-determined price. As the
investment includes a conversion option, the Company has elected to account for this investment under the fair value option
and any change in fair value of the investment is recognized in “Other income (expense), net” in the Company’s
consolidated statement of operations for that period. During the fourth quarter of 2021, the Company received $26.6 million
in cash in full settlement of $20.0 million principal amount of promissory notes and $6.6 million towards accrued and unpaid
interest and change in control premium per contract terms. The $6.6 million was recognized as other income in “Other
(expense) income, net” in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations.
In September 2021, the Company invested approximately $13.0 million in secured convertible promissory notes
issued by the stockholders of a privately-held company. The investment qualifies as an investment in a debt security and
will accrete interest and principal plus accrued interest that becomes payable at certain dates unless it is converted to
equity at a pre-determined price. As the investment includes a conversion option, the Company has elected to account for
this investment under the fair value option and any change in fair value of the investment is recognized in “Other income
(expense), net” in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations for that period. Further, the Company has concluded
that the Company’s investment in a debt security is considered a Level 3 measurement due to the use of significant
unobservable inputs in the valuation model. Principal plus accrued interest receivable of the investment approximates the
fair value.
Investment in debt securities are recorded in “Other Assets” on the accompanying consolidated balance sheet as of
December 31, 2021. The changes in the balance in investments in debt securities during the period are as follows:
Year Ended
December 31,
2021
(In thousands)
Balance at beginning of period $ — 
Investment 58,000  
Fair value adjustments included in other (expense) income, net 9,611  
Settlement (26,569 )
Balance at end of period $ 41,042  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 103
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Contingent consideration
The estimated fair value of the contingent consideration incurred in connection with the Company’s acquisition of
Sofdesk is considered a Level 3 measurement due to the use of significant unobservable inputs. These unobservable inputs
include probability assessment of expected future customer count over the period in which the obligation is expected to be
settled. The value was determined using a discounted risk-neutral expected (probability-weighted) cash flow methodology.
The resulting expected contingent consideration payment is discounted back to present value using the Company’s cost of
debt. The fair value of contingent consideration arrangement is reassessed quarterly based on assumptions used in the
Company’s latest projections and input provided by management. Any change in the fair value estimate, which could
include accretion of interest expense due to passage of time as well as any changes in the inputs to the model, is recorded
in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations for that period.
The following table reflects the activity for the Company’s contingent consideration liabilities measured at fair value
using Level 3 inputs for the year ended December 31, 2021:
Year Ended
December 31,
2021
(In thousands)
Balance at beginning of period $ — 
Addition 3,500  
Fair value adjustments included in other income (expense), net 210 
Balance at end of period $ 3,710  
Warranty obligations.
Fair Value Option for Warranty Obligations Related to Microinverters and Other Products Sold Since January
1, 2014
The Company estimates the fair value of warranty obligations by calculating the warranty obligations in the same
manner as for sales prior to January 1, 2014 and applying an expected present value technique to that result. The expected
present value technique, an income approach, converts future amounts into a single current discounted amount. In addition
to the key estimates of failure rates, claim rates and replacement costs, the Company used certain Level 3 inputs which are
unobservable and significant to the overall fair value measurement. Such additional assumptions included a discount rate
based on the Company’s credit-adjusted risk-free rate and compensation comprised of a profit element and risk premium
required of a market participant to assume the obligation.
The following table provides information regarding changes in nonfinancial liabilities related to the Company’s
warranty obligations measured at fair value on a recurring basis using significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) for the
periods indicated.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Balance at beginning of period $ 28,736  $ 19,806  
Accruals for warranties issued during period 18,098  7,021  
Changes in estimates 10,844  5,039  
Settlements (11,248 ) (7,781 )
Increase due to accretion expense 4,654  3,255  
Other (77) 1,396  
Balance at end of period $ 51,007  $ 28,736  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 104
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Quantitative and Qualitative Information about Level 3 Fair Value Measurements
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, the significant unobservable inputs used in the fair value
measurement of the Company’s liabilities designated as Level 3 are as follows:
Percent Used
(Weighted Average)
Item Measured at Fair Value Valuation TechniqueDescription of Significant
Unobservable InputDecember 31,
2021December 31,
2020
Warranty obligations for
microinverters sold since January 1,
2014Discounted cash
flowsProfit element and risk premium 15% 15%
Credit-adjusted risk-free rate 12% 13%
Sensitivity of Level 3 Inputs - Warranty Obligations
Each of the significant unobservable inputs is independent of the other. The profit element and risk premium are
estimated based on requirements of a third-party participant willing to assume the Company’s warranty obligations. The
credit‑adjusted risk‑free rate (“discount rate”) is determined by reference to the Company’s own credit standing at the fair
value measurement date. Increasing the profit element and risk premium input by 100 basis points would result in no
material change to the liability. Decreasing the profit element and risk premium by 100 basis points would result in a
$0.9 million reduction of the liability. Increasing the discount rate by 100 basis points would result in a $2.9 million reduction
of the liability. Decreasing the discount rate by 100 basis points would result in a $2.3 million increase to the liability.
12.    RESTRUCTURING    
Restructuring expense consist of the following:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Redundancy and employee severance and benefit arrangements $ — $ — $ 1,575  
Asset impairments — — 1,124  
Lease loss reserves (benefit) — — (100)
Total restructuring charges $ — $ — $ 2,599  
2018 Plan
In the third quarter of 2018, the Company began implementing restructuring actions (the “2018 Plan”) to lower its
operating expenses. The restructuring actions include reorganization of the Company’s global workforce, elimination of
certain non-core projects and consolidation of facilities. The Company completed its restructuring activities under the 2018
Plan in 2019.
The following table presents the details of the Company’s restructuring charges under the 2018 Plan for the period
indicated:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Redundancy and employee severance and benefit arrangements $ — $ — $ 1,575  
Asset impairments — — 1,124  
Lease loss reserves (benefit) — — (100)
Total restructuring charges $ — $ — $ 2,599  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 105
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
13.    DEBT
The following table provides information regarding the Company’s debt.
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In thousands)
Convertible notes
Notes due 2028 $ 575,000  $ — 
Less: unamortized discount and issuance costs (149,411 ) — 
Carrying amount of Notes due 2028 425,589  — 
Notes due 2026 632,500  — 
Less: unamortized discount and issuance costs (111,433 ) — 
Carrying amount of Notes due 2026 521,067  — 
Notes due 2025 102,175  320,000  
Less: unamortized discount and issuance costs (16,123 ) (64,979 )
Carrying amount of Notes due 2025 86,052  255,021  
Notes due 2024 — 88,140 
Less: unamortized discount and issuance costs — (19,119 )
Carrying amount of Notes due 2024 — 69,021  
Notes due 2023 5,000  5,000  
Less: unamortized issuance costs (62) (102)
Carrying amount of Notes due 2023 4,938  4,898  
Sale of long-term financing receivable recorded as debt — 1,925  
Total carrying amount of debt 1,037,646  330,865  
Less: current portion of convertible notes and long-term financing receivable recorded as debt (86,052 ) (325,967 )
Debt, non-current $ 951,594  $ 4,898  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 106
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Convertible Senior Notes due 2028
On March 1, 2021, the Company issued $575 million aggregate principal amount of 0.0% convertible senior notes
due 2028 (the “Notes due 2028”). The Notes due 2028 will not bear regular interest, and the principal amount of the Notes
due 2028 will not accrete. The Notes due 2028 are general unsecured obligations and are governed by an indenture
between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The Notes due 2028 will mature on March 1, 2028,
unless earlier repurchased by the Company or converted at the option of the holders. The Company received approximately
$566.4 million in net proceeds, after deducting the initial purchasers’ discount, from the issuance of the Notes due 2028.
The initial conversion rate for the Notes due 2028 is 3.5104 shares of common stock per $1,000 principal amount of
the Notes due 2028 (which represents an initial conversion price of approximately $284.87 per share). The conversion rate
for the Notes due 2028 will be subject to adjustment upon the occurrence of certain specified events but will not be adjusted
for any accrued and unpaid special interest, if any. In addition, if a make-whole fundamental change or a redemption with
respect to the Notes due 2028 occurs prior to the maturity date, under certain circumstances as specified in the relevant
indenture, the Company will increase the conversion rate for the Notes due 2028 by a number of additional shares of the
Company’s common stock for a holder that elects to convert its notes in connection with such make-whole fundamental
change or redemption. Upon conversion, the Company will settle conversions of the Notes due 2028 through payment or
delivery, as the case may be, of cash, shares of its common stock or a combination of cash and shares of its common
stock, at the Company’s election.
The Company may not redeem the Notes due 2028 prior to September 6, 2024. The Company may redeem for cash
all or any portion of the Notes due 2028, at the Company’s election, on or after September 6, 2024, if the last reported sale
price of the Company’s common stock has been greater than or equal to 130% of the conversion price then in effect for the
Notes due 2028 (i.e. $370.33, which is 130% of the current conversion price for the Notes due 2028) for at least 20 trading
days (whether or not consecutive) during any 30 consecutive trading day period ending on, and including, the trading day
immediately preceding the date on which the Company provides notice of redemption. The redemption price will equal
100% of the principal amount of the Notes due 2028 to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid special interest, if any to, but
excluding, the relevant redemption date. No sinking fund is provided for the Notes due 2028.
The Notes due 2028 may be converted on any day prior to the close of business on the business day immediately
preceding September 1, 2027, in multiples of $1,000 principal amount, at the option of the holder only under any of the
following circumstances: (1) during any calendar quarter commencing after the calendar quarter ending on June 30, 2021
(and only during such calendar quarter), if the last reported sale price of the Company’s common stock for at least 20
trading days (whether or not consecutive) during a period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on, and including, the last
trading day of the immediately preceding calendar quarter is greater than or equal to 130% of the conversion price for the
Notes due 2028 (i.e., $370.33 which is 130% of the current conversion price for the Notes due 2028) on each applicable
trading day; (2) during the five business day period after any five consecutive trading day period (the “Measurement
Period”) in which the “trading price” (as defined in the relevant indenture) per $1,000 principal amount of notes for each
trading day of the Measurement Period was less than 98% of the product of the last reported sale price of the Company’s
common stock and the conversion rate for the Notes due 2028 on each such trading day; (3) if the Company calls any or all
of the Notes due 2028 for redemption, at any time prior to the close of business on the scheduled trading day immediately
preceding the redemption date; or (4) upon the occurrence of specified corporate events. On and after September 1, 2027
until the close of business on the second scheduled trading day immediately preceding the maturity date of March 1, 2028,
holders of the Notes due 2028 may convert their notes at any time, regardless of the foregoing circumstances. Upon the
occurrence of a fundamental change (as defined in the relevant indenture), holders may require the Company to
repurchase all or a portion of their Notes due 2028 for cash at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes to
be repurchased plus any accrued and unpaid special interest, if any, to, but excluding, the fundamental change repurchase
date.
In accounting for the issuance of the Notes due 2028 on March 1, 2021, the Company separated the Notes due 2028
into liability and equity components. The carrying amount of the liability component of approximately $415.0 million was
calculated by using a discount rate of 4.77%, which was the Company’s borrowing rate on the date of the issuance of the
Notes due 2028 for a similar debt instrument without the conversion feature. The carrying amount of the equity component
of approximately $160.0 million, representing the
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 107
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
conversion option, was determined by deducting the fair value of the liability component from the par value of the Notes due
2028. The equity component of the Notes due 2028 is included in additional paid-in capital in the consolidated balance
sheet and is not remeasured as long as it continues to meet the conditions for equity classification. The difference between
the principal amount of the Notes due 2028 and the liability component (the “debt discount”) is amortized to interest
expense using the effective interest method over the term of the Notes due 2028.
The Company separated the Notes due 2028 into liability and equity components which resulted in a tax basis
difference associated with the liability component that represents a temporary difference. The Company recognized the
deferred taxes of $40.1 million for the tax effect of that temporary difference as an adjustment to the equity component
included in additional paid-in capital in the consolidated balance sheet.
Debt issuance costs for the issuance of the Notes due 2028 were approximately $9.1 million, consisting of initial
purchasers' discount and other issuance costs. In accounting for the transaction costs, the Company allocated the total
amount incurred to the liability and equity components using the same proportions as the proceeds from the Notes due
2028. Transaction costs attributable to the liability component were approximately $6.6 million, which were recorded as debt
issuance cost (presented as contra debt in the consolidated balance sheet) and are being amortized to interest expense
over the term of the Notes due 2028. The transaction costs attributable to the equity component were
approximately $2.5 million and were netted with the equity component in stockholders’ equity. As of December 31, 2021, the
unamortized deferred issuance cost for the Notes due 2028 was $5.8 million on the consolidated balance sheet.
The following table presents the total amount of interest cost recognized in the statement of operations relating to the
Notes due 2028:
Year Ended
December 31,
2021
(In thousands)
Amortization of debt discount $ 16,401  
Amortization of debt issuance costs 785 
Total interest cost recognized $ 17,186  
The effective interest rate on the liability component on the Notes due 2028 was 4.77% for the year ended
December 31, 2021, which remains unchanged from the date of issuance. The remaining unamortized debt discount was
$143.6 million as of December 31, 2021 and will be amortized over approximately 6.2 years from December 31, 2021.
Notes due 2028 Hedge and Warrant Transactions
In connection with the offering of the Notes due 2028, the Company entered into privately-negotiated convertible note
hedge transactions (“Notes due 2028 Hedge”) pursuant to which the Company has the option to purchase a total of
approximately 2.0 million shares of its common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments), which is the same number of
shares initially issuable upon conversion of the Notes due 2028, at a price of $284.87 per share, which is the initial
conversion price of the Notes due 2028. The total cost of the convertible note hedge transactions was approximately
$161.6 million. The convertible note hedge transactions are expected generally to reduce potential dilution to the
Company’s common stock upon any conversion of the Notes due 2028 and/or offset any cash payments the Company is
required to make in excess of the principal amount of converted notes, as the case may be.
Additionally, the Company separately entered into privately-negotiated warrant transactions (the “2028 Warrants”)
whereby the Company sold warrants to acquire approximately 2.0 million shares of the Company’s common stock (subject
to anti-dilution adjustments) at an initial strike price of $397.91 per share. The Company received aggregate proceeds of
approximately $123.4 million from the sale of the 2028 Warrants. If the market value per share of the Company’s common
stock, as measured under the 2028 Warrants, exceeds the strike price of the 2028 Warrants, the 2028 Warrants will have a
dilutive effect on the Company’s earnings per share, unless the Company elects, subject to certain conditions, to settle the
2028 Warrants in cash. Taken together, the purchase of the Notes due 2028 Hedge and the sale of the 2028 Warrants are
intended to reduce potential dilution from the
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 108
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
conversion of the Notes due 2028 and to effectively increase the overall conversion price from $284.87 to $397.91 per
share. The 2028 Warrants are only exercisable on the applicable expiration dates in accordance with the Notes due 2028
Hedge. Subject to the other terms of the Warrants, the first expiration date applicable to the Notes due 2028 Hedge is
June 1, 2028, and the final expiration date applicable to the Notes due 2028 Hedge is July 27, 2028.
Given that the transactions meet certain accounting criteria, the Notes due 2028 Hedge and the 2028 Warrants
transactions are recorded in stockholders’ equity, and they are not accounted for as derivatives and are not remeasured
each reporting period.
Convertible Senior Notes due 2026
On March 1, 2021, the Company issued $575.0 million aggregate principal amount of 0.0% convertible senior notes
due 2026 (the “Notes due 2026”). In addition, on March 12, 2021, the Company issued an additional $57.5 million
aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2026 pursuant to the initial purchasers’ full exercise of the over-allotment
option for additional Notes due 2026. The Notes due 2026 will not bear regular interest, and the principal amount of the
Notes due 2026 will not accrete. The Notes due 2026 are general unsecured obligations and are governed by an indenture
between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The Notes due 2026 will mature on March 1, 2026,
unless earlier repurchased by the Company or converted at the option of the holders. The Company received approximately
$623.0 million in net proceeds, after deducting the initial purchasers’ discount, from the issuance of the Notes due 2026.
The initial conversion rate for the Notes due 2026 is 3.2523 shares of common stock per $1,000 principal amount of
the Notes due 2026 (which represents an initial conversion price of approximately $307.47 per share). The conversion rate
for the Notes due 2026 will be subject to adjustment upon the occurrence of certain specified events but will not be adjusted
for accrued and unpaid interest. In addition, if a make-whole fundamental change or a redemption with respect to the Notes
due 2026 occurs prior to the maturity date, under certain circumstances as specified in the relevant indenture, the Company
will increase the conversion rate for the Notes due 2026 by a number of additional shares of the Company’s common stock
for a holder that elects to convert its notes in connection with such make-whole fundamental change or redemption. Upon
conversion, the Company will settle conversions of Notes due 2026 through payment or delivery, as the case may be, of
cash, shares of its common stock or a combination of cash and shares of its common stock, at the Company’s election.
The Company may not redeem the Notes due 2026 prior to the September 6, 2023. The Company may redeem for
cash all or any portion of the Notes due 2026, at the Company’s election, on or after September 6, 2023, if the last reported
sale price of the Company’s common stock has been greater than or equal to 130% of the conversion price then in effect for
the Notes due 2026 (i.e., $399.71, which is 130% of the current conversion price for the Notes due 2026) for at least 20
trading days (whether or not consecutive) during a period of 30 consecutive trading day period ending on, and including, the
trading day immediately preceding the date on which the Company provides notice of redemption. The redemption price will
equal 100% of the principal amount of the Notes due 2026 to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid special interest, if any,
to, but excluding, the relevant redemption date for the Notes due 2026. The redemption price will be increased as described
in the relevant indentures by a number of additional shares of the Company in connection with such optional redemption by
the Company. No sinking fund is provided for the Notes due 2026.
The Notes due 2026 may be converted on any day prior to the close of business on the business day immediately
preceding September 1, 2025, in multiples of $1,000 principal amount, at the option of the holder only under any of the
following circumstances: (1) during any calendar quarter commencing after the calendar quarter ending on June 30, 2021
(and only during such calendar quarter), if the last reported sale price of the Company’s common stock for at least 20
trading days (whether or not consecutive) during a period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on, and including, the last
trading day of the immediately preceding calendar quarter is greater than or equal to 130% of the conversion price of the
Notes due 2026 (i.e., $399.71, which is 130% of the current conversion price for the Notes due 2026) on each applicable
trading day; (2) during the five business day period after any five consecutive trading day period (the “measurement period”)
in which the “trading price” (as defined in the relevant indenture) per $1,000 principal amount of notes for each trading day
of the measurement period was less than 98% of the product of the last reported sale price of the Company’s common
stock and the conversion rate for Notes due 2026 on each such trading day; (3) if the Company calls any or all of the Notes
due 2026 for redemption, at any time prior to the close of business on the scheduled trading day immediately preceding the
redemption date; or
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 109
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(4) upon the occurrence of specified corporate events. On and after September 1, 2025 until the close of business on the
second scheduled trading day immediately preceding the maturity date of March 1, 2026, holders of the Notes due 2026
may convert their notes at any time, regardless of the foregoing circumstances. Upon the occurrence of a fundamental
change (as defined in the relevant indenture), holders may require the Company to repurchase all or a portion of their Notes
due 2026 for cash at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes to be repurchased plus any accrued and
unpaid special interest, if any, to, but excluding, the fundamental change repurchase date.
In accounting for the issuance of the Notes due 2026 on March 1, 2021, the Company separated the Notes due 2026
into liability and equity components. The carrying amount of the liability component of approximately $509.0 million was
calculated by using a discount rate of 4.44%, which was the Company’s borrowing rate on the date of the issuance of the
Notes due 2026 for a similar debt instrument without the conversion feature. The carrying amount of the equity component
of approximately $123.5 million, representing the conversion option, was determined by deducting the fair value of the
liability component from the par value of the Notes due 2026. The equity component of the Notes due 2026 is included in
additional paid-in capital in the consolidated balance sheet and is not remeasured as long as it continues to meet the
conditions for equity classification. The difference between the principal amount of the Notes due 2026 and the liability
component (the “debt discount”) is amortized to interest expense using the effective interest method over the term of the
Notes due 2026.
The Company separated the Notes due 2026 into liability and equity components which resulted in a tax basis
difference associated with the liability component that represents a temporary difference. The Company recognized the
deferred taxes of $31.0 million for the tax effect of that temporary difference as an adjustment to the equity component
included in additional paid-in capital in the consolidated balance sheet.
Debt issuance costs for the issuance of the Notes due 2026 were approximately $10.0 million, consisting of initial
purchasers' discount and other issuance costs. In accounting for the transaction costs, the Company allocated the total
amount incurred to the liability and equity components using the same proportions as the proceeds from the Notes due
2026. Transaction costs attributable to the liability component were approximately $8.0 million, which were recorded as debt
issuance cost (presented as contra debt in the consolidated balance sheet) and are being amortized to interest expense
over the term of the Notes due 2026. The transaction costs attributable to the equity component were
approximately $2.0 million and were netted with the equity component in stockholders’ equity. As of December 31, 2021, the
unamortized deferred issuance cost for the Notes due 2026 was $6.7 million on the consolidated balance sheet.
The following table presents the total amount of interest cost recognized in the statement of operations relating to the
Notes due 2026:
Year Ended
December 31,
2021
(In thousands)
Amortization of debt discount $ 18,735  
Amortization of debt issuance costs 1,347  
Total interest cost recognized $ 20,082  
The effective interest rate on the liability component of Notes due 2026 was 4.44% for the year ended December 31,
2021, which remains unchanged from the date of issuance. The remaining unamortized debt discount was $104.8 million as
of December 31, 2021, and will be amortized over approximately 4.2 years from December 31, 2021.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 110
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Notes due 2026 Hedge and Warrant Transactions
In connection with the offering of the Notes due 2026 (including in connection with the issuance of additional Notes
due 2026 upon the initial purchasers’ exercise of their over-allotment option), the Company entered into privately-negotiated
convertible note hedge transactions (the “Notes due 2026 Hedge”) pursuant to which the Company has the option to
purchase a total of approximately 2.1 million shares of its common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments), which is the
same number of shares initially issuable upon conversion of the Notes due 2026, at a price of $307.47 per share, which is
the initial conversion price of the Notes due 2026. The total cost of the Notes due 2026 Hedge was approximately
$124.6 million. The Notes due 2026 Hedge are expected generally to reduce potential dilution to the Company’s common
stock upon any conversion of the Notes due 2026 and/or offset any cash payments the Company is required to make in
excess of the principal amount of converted notes, as the case may be.
Additionally, the Company separately entered into privately-negotiated warrant transactions, including in connection
with the issuance of additional Notes due 2026 upon the initial purchasers’ exercise of their over-allotment option (the “2026
Warrants”), whereby the Company sold warrants to acquire approximately 2.1 million shares of the Company’s common
stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments) at an initial strike price of $397.91 per share. The Company received aggregate
proceeds of approximately $97.4 million from the sale of the 2026 Warrants. If the market value per share of the Company’s
common stock, as measured under the 2026 Warrants, exceeds the strike price of the Warrants, the 2026 Warrants will
have a dilutive effect on the Company’s earnings per share, unless the Company elects, subject to certain conditions, to
settle the 2026 Warrants in cash. Taken together, the purchase of the Notes due 2026 Hedge and the sale of the 2026
Warrants are intended to reduce potential dilution from the conversion of the Notes due 2026 and to effectively increase the
overall conversion price from $307.47 to $397.91 per share. The 2026 Warrants are only exercisable on the applicable
expiration dates in accordance with the 2026 Warrants. Subject to the other terms of the 2026 Warrants, the first expiration
date applicable to the Warrants is June 1, 2026, and the final expiration date applicable to the 2026 Warrants is July 27,
2026.
Given that the transactions meet certain accounting criteria, the Notes due 2026 hedge and the warrants transactions
are recorded in stockholders’ equity, and they are not accounted for as derivatives and are not remeasured each reporting
period.
Convertible Senior Notes due 2025
On March 9, 2020, the Company issued $320.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025. The Notes
due 2025 are general unsecured obligations and bear interest at an annual rate of 0.25% per year, payable semi-annually
on March 1 and September 1 of each year, beginning September 1, 2020. The Notes due 2025 are governed by an
indenture between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The Notes due 2025 will mature on
March 1, 2025, unless earlier repurchased by the Company or converted at the option of the holders. The Company may
not redeem the notes prior to the maturity date, and no sinking fund is provided for the notes. The Notes due 2025 may be
converted, under certain circumstances as described below, based on an initial conversion rate of 12.2637 shares of
common stock per $1,000 principal amount (which represents an initial conversion price of $81.54 per share). The
conversion rate for the Notes due 2025 will be subject to adjustment upon the occurrence of certain specified events but will
not be adjusted for accrued and unpaid interest. In addition, upon the occurrence of a make-whole fundamental change (as
defined in the relevant indenture), the Company will, in certain circumstances, increase the conversion rate by a number of
additional shares for a holder that elects to convert its notes in connection with such make-whole fundamental change. The
Company received approximately $313.0 million in net proceeds, after deducting the initial purchasers’ discount, from the
issuance of the Notes due 2025.
The Notes due 2025 may be converted prior to the close of business on the business day immediately preceding
September 1, 2024, in multiples of $1,000 principal amount, at the option of the holder only under the following
circumstances: (1) during any calendar quarter commencing after the calendar quarter ending on June 30, 2020 (and only
during such calendar quarter), if the last reported sale price of the Company’s common stock for at least 20 trading days
(whether or not consecutive) during a period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on, and including, the last trading day of
the immediately preceding calendar quarter is greater than or equal to 130% of the conversion price on each applicable
trading day; (2) during the five business day period after any five consecutive trading day period (the “measurement period”)
in which the “trading price” (as defined in the relevant indenture) per
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 111
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
$1,000 principal amount of notes for each trading day of the measurement period was less than 98% of the product of the
last reported sale price of the Company’s common stock and the conversion rate on each such trading day; or (3) upon the
occurrence of specified corporate events. On and after September 1, 2024 until the close of business on the second
scheduled trading day immediately preceding the maturity date of March 1, 2025, holders may convert their notes at any
time, regardless of the foregoing circumstances. Upon the occurrence of a fundamental change (as defined in the relevant
indenture), holders may require the Company to repurchase all or a portion of their Notes due 2025 for cash at a price equal
to 100% of the principal amount of the notes to be repurchased plus any accrued and unpaid interest to, but excluding, the
fundamental change repurchase date.
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the sale price of the Company’s common stock was greater than or equal to
$106.00 (130% of the notes conversion price) for at least 20 trading days (whether consecutive or not) during a period
of 30 consecutive trading days preceding the quarter-ended December 31, 2021 and 2020. As a result, as of January 1,
2021, the Notes due 2025 are convertible at the holders’ option through March 31, 2022. Accordingly, the Company
classified the net carrying amount of the Notes due 2025 of $86.1 million and $255.0 million as Debt, current on the
consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. From January 1, 2022 through the date this
Annual Report on Form 10-K is available to be issued, the Company has not received any requests for conversion of the
Notes due 2025.
For the period from March 9, 2020, the issuance date, through May 19, 2020, the number of authorized and unissued
shares of the Company’s common stock that are not reserved for other purposes was less than the maximum number of
underlying shares that would be required to settle the Notes due 2025 into equity. Accordingly, unless and until the
Company had a number of authorized shares that were not issued or reserved for any other purpose that equaled or
exceeded the maximum number of underlying shares (the “Share Reservation Condition”), the Company would have been
required to pay to the converting holder in respect of each $1,000 principal amount of notes being converted solely in cash
in an amount equal to the sum of the daily conversion values for each of the 20 consecutive trading days during the related
observation period. However, following satisfaction of the Share Reservation Condition, the Company could settle
conversions of notes through payment or delivery, as the case may be, of cash, shares of the Company’s common stock or
a combination of cash and shares of its common stock, at the Company’s election. As further discussed below, the
Company satisfied the Share Reservation Condition during May 2020.
In accounting for the issuance of the Notes due 2025, on March 9, 2020, the conversion option of the Notes due 2025
was deemed an embedded derivative requiring bifurcation from the Notes due 2025 (the “host contract”) and separate
accounting as an embedded derivative liability, as a result of the Company not having the necessary number of authorized
but unissued shares of its common stock available to settle the conversion option of the Notes due 2025 in shares. The
proceeds from the Notes due 2025 were first allocated to the embedded derivative liability and the remaining proceeds were
then allocated to the host contract. On March 9, 2020, the carrying amount of the embedded derivative liability of $68.7
million representing the conversion option was determined using the Binomial Lattice model and the remaining $251.3
million was allocated to the host contract. The difference between the principal amount of the Notes due 2025 and the fair
value of the host contract (the “debt discount”) is amortized to interest expense using the effective interest method over the
term of the Notes due 2025.
On May 20, 2020, at the Company’s annual meeting of stockholders, the stockholders approved an amendment to
the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of the Company’s
common stock, par value $0.00001 per share, from 150,000,000 shares to 200,000,000 shares (the “Amendment”). The
Amendment became effective upon filing with the Secretary of State of Delaware on May 20, 2020. As a result, the
Company satisfied the Share Reservation Condition. The Company may now settle the Notes due 2025 and warrants
issued in conjunction with the Notes due 2025 through payment or delivery, as the case may be, of cash, shares of its
common stock or a combination of cash and shares of its common stock, at the Company’s election. Accordingly, on
May 20, 2020, the embedded derivative liability was remeasured at a fair value of $116.3 million and was then reclassified
to additional paid-in-capital in the consolidated balance sheet in the second quarter of 2020 and is no longer remeasured as
long as it continues to meet the conditions for equity classification. The Company recorded the change in the fair value of
the embedded derivative in other expense, net in the consolidated statement of operations during the year ended
December 31, 2020.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 112
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The Company separated the Notes due 2025 into liability and equity components which resulted in a tax basis
difference associated with the liability component that represents a temporary difference. The Company recognized the
deferred taxes of $0.2 million for the tax effect of that temporary difference as an adjustment to the equity component
included in additional paid-in capital in the consolidated balance sheet.
Debt issuance costs for the issuance of the Notes due 2025 were approximately $7.6 million, consisting of initial
purchasers' discount and other issuance costs. In accounting for the transaction costs, the Company allocated the total
amount incurred to the Notes due 2025 host contract. Transaction costs were recorded as debt issuance cost (presented as
contra debt in the consolidated balance sheet) and are being amortized to interest expense over the term of the Notes due
2025.
Partial repurchase of Notes due 2025
Concurrently with the offering of the Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028, the Company entered into separately- and
privately-negotiated transactions to repurchase approximately $217.7 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due
2025. The Company paid $217.7 million in cash and issued approximately 1.67 million shares of its common stock to the
holders of the repurchased notes with an aggregate fair value of $302.7 million, representing the conversion value in excess
of the principal amount of the Notes due 2025, which were fully offset by shares received from the Company’s settlement of
the associated note hedging arrangements discussed below. The total amount of $217.7 million paid to partially settle the
repurchases of the Notes due 2025 was allocated between the liability and equity components of the amount extinguished
by determining the fair value of the liability component immediately prior to the note repurchases and allocating that portion
of the conversion price to the liability component in the amount of $184.5 million. The residual of the conversion price of
$4.3 million of the repurchased Notes due 2025, net of inducement loss of $37.5 million for additional shares issued, was
allocated to the equity component of the repurchased Notes due 2025 as an increase of additional paid-in capital. The fair
value of the note settlement for such repurchases was calculated using a discount rate of 4.35%, representing an estimate
of the Company's borrowing rate at the date of repurchase with a remaining expected life of approximately 4.1 years. As
part of the settlement of the repurchase of the Notes due 2025, the Company wrote-off the $38.5 million unamortized debt
discount and $4.1 million debt issuance cost apportioned to the principal amount of Notes due 2025 repurchased. The
Company recorded a loss on partial settlement of the repurchased Notes due 2025 of $9.4 million in Other income
(expense), net in the year ended December 31, 2021, representing the difference between the consideration attributed to
the liability component and the sum of the net carrying amount of the liability component and unamortized debt issuance
costs. Further, the Company also recorded loss on inducement of $37.5 million in Other income (expense), net in the year
ended December 31, 2021, representing the difference between the fair value of the shares that would have been issued
under the original conversion terms with respect to the repurchased Notes due 2025.
During the second quarter of 2021, $0.1 million in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025 were converted,
and the principal amount of the converted Notes due 2025 was repaid in cash. In connection with such conversions during
the second quarter of 2021, the Company also issued 485 shares of its common stock to the holders of the converted Notes
due 2025, with an aggregate fair value of $0.1 million, representing the conversion value in excess of the principal amount
of the Notes due 2025, which were fully offset by shares received from the settlements of the associated note hedging
arrangements. Following the repurchase transactions summarized above, as of December 31, 2021, $102.2 million
aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025 remained outstanding.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 113
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents the total amount of interest cost recognized relating to the Notes due 2025:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Contractual interest expense $ 342 $ 649 
Amortization of debt discount 5,529  10,072  
Amortization of debt issuance costs 661 1,229  
Total interest cost recognized $ 6,532  $ 11,950  
The derived effective interest rate on the Notes due 2025 host contract was determined to be 5.18%, which remains
unchanged from the date of issuance. The remaining unamortized debt discount was $14.6 million and $58.6 million as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively, and will be amortized over approximately 3.2 years from December 31, 2021.
Notes due 2025 Hedge and Warrant Transactions
In connection with the offering of the Notes due 2025, the Company entered into privately-negotiated convertible note
hedge transactions (the “Notes due 2025 Hedge”) pursuant to which the Company has the option to purchase a total of
approximately 3.9 million shares of its common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments), which is the same number of
shares initially issuable upon conversion of the notes, at a price of $81.54 per share, which is the initial conversion price of
the Notes due 2025. The total cost of the convertible note hedge transactions was approximately $89.1 million. The
convertible note hedge transactions are expected generally to reduce potential dilution to the Company’s common stock
upon any conversion of the Notes due 2025 and/or offset any cash payments the Company is required to make in excess of
the principal amount of converted notes, as the case may be.
Additionally, the Company separately entered into privately-negotiated warrant transactions in connection with the
offering of the Notes due 2025 (the “2025 Warrants”) whereby the Company sold warrants to acquire approximately
3.9 million shares of the Company’s common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments) at an initial strike price of $106.94
per share. The Company received aggregate proceeds of approximately $71.6 million from the sale of the 2025 Warrants. If
the market value per share of the Company’s common stock, as measured under the 2025 Warrants, exceeds the strike
price of the 2025 Warrants, the 2025 Warrants will have a dilutive effect on the Company’s earnings per share, unless the
Company elects, subject to certain conditions, to settle the 2025 Warrants in cash. Taken together, the purchase of the
convertible note hedges in connection with the Notes due 2025 Hedge and the sale of the 2025 Warrants are intended to
reduce potential dilution from the conversion of the Notes due 2025 and to effectively increase the overall conversion price
from $81.54 to $106.94 per share. The 2025 Warrants are only exercisable on the applicable expiration dates in accordance
with the agreements relating to each of the 2025 Warrants. Subject to the other terms of the 2025 Warrants, the first
expiration date applicable to the 2025 Warrants is June 1, 2025, and the final expiration date applicable to the 2025
Warrants is September 23, 2025.
During the first quarter of 2021, in connection with the repurchase of $217.7 million aggregate principal amount of the
Notes due 2025 summarized above, the Company entered into partial unwind agreements with respect to certain of the
Notes due 2025 Hedge and the 2025 Warrants. In connection with these unwind transactions, the Company received
shares of the Company’s common stock as a termination payment for the portion of the Notes due 2025 Hedge that were
unwound, and the Company issued shares of its common stock as a termination payment for the portion of the 2025
Warrants that were unwound. As a result of the unwind agreements for the Notes due 2025 Hedge and the 2025 Warrants,
the Company received 1.9 million of the Company’s common stock from the Notes due 2025 Hedge settlement and issued
1.8 million of the Company’s common stock from the 2025 Warrants that were unwound. Following the unwind transactions
summarized above, as of December 31, 2021, options to purchase approximately 1.3 million shares of common stock
remained outstanding under the Notes due 2025 Hedge, and 2025 Warrants exercisable to purchase approximately
1.3 million shares remained outstanding.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 114
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
For the period from March 9, 2020, the issuance date of the Notes due 2025 Hedge and 2025 Warrants, through May
19, 2020, the number of authorized and unissued shares of the Company’s common stock that are not reserved for other
purposes was less than the maximum number of underlying shares that will be required to settle the Notes due 2025
through the delivery of shares of the Company’s common stock. Accordingly, the Notes due 2025 Hedge and 2025
Warrants could only be settled on net cash settlement basis. As a result, the Notes due 2025 Hedge and 2025 Warrants
were classified as a Convertible notes hedge asset and Warrants liability, respectively, in the consolidated balance sheet
and the change in fair value of derivatives was included in other expense, net in the consolidated statement of operations.
On May 20, 2020, at the Company’s annual meeting of stockholders, the stockholders approved the Amendment and
satisfied the Share Reservation Condition (as discussed above), and as a result, the Convertible notes hedge asset and
Warrants liabilities were remeasured at a fair value of $117.1 million and $96.4 million, respectively, and were then
reclassified to additional paid-in-capital in the consolidated balance sheet in the second quarter of 2020 and is no longer
remeasured as long as they continue to meet the conditions for equity classification. The change in the fair value of the
Convertible notes hedge asset and Warrants liability were recorded in other expense, net in the consolidated statements of
operations during the twelve months ended December 31, 2020.
Convertible Senior Notes due 2024
On June 5, 2019, the Company issued $132.0 million aggregate principal amount of 1.0% convertible senior notes
due 2024 (the “Notes due 2024”). The Notes due 2024 are general unsecured obligations and bear interest at an annual
rate of 1.0% per year, payable semi-annually on June 1 and December 1 of each year, beginning December 1, 2019. The
Notes due 2024 are governed by an indenture between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The
Notes due 2024 will mature on June 1, 2024, unless earlier repurchased by the Company or converted at the option of the
holders. The Company may not redeem the notes prior to the maturity date, and no sinking fund is provided for the notes.
The Notes due 2024 may be converted, under certain circumstances as described below, based on an initial conversion
rate of 48.7781 shares of common stock per $1,000 principal amount (which represents an initial conversion price of
$20.50 per share). The conversion rate for the Notes due 2024 will be subject to adjustment upon the occurrence of certain
specified events but will not be adjusted for accrued and unpaid interest. In addition, upon the occurrence of a make-whole
fundamental change (as defined in the relevant indenture), the Company will, in certain circumstances, increase the
conversion rate by a number of additional shares for a holder that elects to convert its notes in connection with such make-
whole fundamental change. The Company received approximately $128.0 million in net proceeds, after deducting the initial
purchasers’ discount, from the issuance of the Notes due 2024.
For accounting of Company’s Notes due 2024, refer Note 13. “Debt,” of the notes to consolidated financial statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, $88.1 million in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024 were
converted or repurchased by the Company, and the principal amount of the converted and repurchased Notes due 2024
was repaid in cash. Of the $88.1 million in aggregate principal amount, $25.5 million in aggregate principal amount of Notes
due 2024 were repurchased by the Company pursuant to separately- and privately-negotiated exchange agreements
entered into in March 2021 concurrently with the issuance of Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028. In connection with such
conversions and repurchases, during the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company also issued 3.8 million shares of its
common stock to the holders of the converted and repurchased Notes due 2024, with an aggregate fair value of
$669.5 million, representing the conversion value in excess of the principal amount of the Notes due 2024. The total amount
of $88.1 million paid to settle the conversions and repurchases of the Notes due 2024 during 2021 was allocated between
the liability and equity components of the amount extinguished by determining the fair value of the liability component
immediately prior to the notes settlement and allocating that portion of the conversion price to the liability component in the
amount of $79.5 million. The residual of the conversion price of $8.7 million was allocated to the equity component of the
Notes due 2024 as a reduction of additional paid-in capital. As part of the settlement of the conversions and repurchases,
the Company wrote-off the $16.8 million unamortized debt discount and $1.4 million debt issuance cost apportioned to the
principal amount of Notes due 2024 were converted and repurchased. The Company also recorded a loss on partial
settlement of the converted and repurchased Notes due 2024 of $9.6 million in Other income (expense), net in the year
ended December 31, 2021, representing the difference between the
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 115
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
consideration attributed to the liability component and the sum of the net carrying amount of the liability component and
unamortized debt issuance costs. Following the conversions and repurchases summarized above, the Notes due 2024 are
no longer outstanding.
The following table presents the total amount of interest cost recognized in the statement of operations relating to the
Notes due 2024:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Contractual interest expense $ 8 $ 1,284  
Amortization of debt discount 772 6,325  
Amortization of debt issuance costs 74 646 
Total interest cost recognized $ 854 $ 8,255  
Notes due 2024 Hedge and Warrant Transactions
In connection with the offering of the Notes due 2024, the Company entered into privately-negotiated convertible note
hedge transactions (the “Notes due 2024 Hedge”) pursuant to which the Company has the option to purchase a total of
approximately 6.4 million shares of its common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments), which is the same number of
shares initially issuable upon conversion of the notes, at a price of $20.50 per share, which is the initial conversion price of
the Notes due 2024. The total cost of the convertible note hedge transactions was approximately $36.3 million. The Notes
due 2024 Hedge transactions are expected generally to reduce potential dilution to the Company’s common stock upon any
conversion of the Notes due 2024 and/or offset any cash payments the Company is required to make in excess of the
principal amount of converted notes, as the case may be.
Additionally, the Company separately entered into privately-negotiated warrant transactions in connection with the
offering of the Notes due 2024 (the “2024 Warrants”) whereby the Company sold warrants to acquire approximately
6.4 million shares of the Company’s common stock (subject to anti-dilution adjustments) at an initial strike price of $25.23
per share. The Company received aggregate proceeds of approximately $29.8 million from the sale of the 2024 Warrants. If
the market value per share of the Company’s common stock, as measured under the 2024 Warrants, exceeds the strike
price of the 2024 Warrants, the 2024 Warrants will have a dilutive effect on the Company’s earnings per share, unless the
Company elects, subject to certain conditions, to settle the 2024 Warrants in cash. Taken together, the purchase of the
Notes due 2024 Hedge transactions and the sale of the 2024 Warrants are intended to reduce potential dilution from the
conversion of the Notes due 2024 and to effectively increase the overall conversion price from $20.50 to $25.23 per share.
The 2024 Warrants are only exercisable on the applicable expiration dates in accordance with the 2024 Warrants. Subject
to the other terms of the 2024 Warrants, the first expiration date applicable to the 2024 Warrants is September 1, 2024, and
the final expiration date applicable to the 2024 Warrants is April 22, 2025.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, in connection with the repurchase of $25.5 million aggregate principal
amount of the Notes due 2024 summarized above, the Company entered into partial unwind agreements with respect to
certain of the Notes due 2024 Hedge and received 1.1 million shares of its common stock as a termination payment for the
portion of the Notes due 2024 Hedge that were unwound.
In addition to the unwind transactions discussed above, the Company also received 2.7 million shares of the
Company’s common stock from the Notes due 2024 Hedge settlements as a result of the conversion of $62.6 million in
aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024 in 2021. In addition, the Company entered into partial unwind
agreements with respect to certain of the 2024 Warrants in connection with the repurchase and conversion of $88.1 million
in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2024 during 2021 and issued 3.8 million shares of its common stock as a
termination payment for the portion of the 2024 Warrants that were unwound. Following the transactions summarized
above, Notes due 2024 Hedge and 2024 Warrants are no longer outstanding.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 116
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Convertible Senior Notes due 2023
In August 2018, the Company sold $65.0 million aggregate principal amount of 4.0% convertible senior notes due
2023 (the “Notes due 2023”) in a private placement. On May 30, 2019, the Company entered into separately and privately-
negotiated transactions with certain holders of the Notes due 2023 resulting in the repurchase and exchange, as of June 5,
2019, of $60.0 million aggregate principal amount of the notes in consideration for the issuance of 10,801,080 shares of
common stock and separate cash payments totaling $6.0 million. As of both December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020,
$5.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2023 remained outstanding.
The remaining outstanding Notes due 2023 are general unsecured obligations and bear interest at a rate of 4.0% per
year, payable semi-annually on February 1 and August 1 of each year. The Notes due 2023 are governed by an indenture
between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The remaining outstanding Notes due 2023 will
mature on August 1, 2023, unless earlier repurchased by the Company or converted at the option of the holders. The
Company may not redeem the remaining Notes due 2023 prior to the maturity date, and no sinking fund is provided for such
notes. The remaining Notes due 2023 are convertible, at a holder’s election, in multiples of $1,000 principal amount, into
shares of the Company’s common stock based on the applicable conversion rate. The initial conversion rate for such notes
is 180.018 shares of common stock per $1,000 principal amount of notes (which is equivalent to an initial conversion price
of approximately $5.56 per share). The conversion rate and the corresponding conversion price are subject to adjustment
upon the occurrence of certain events but will not be adjusted for any accrued and unpaid interest. Holders of the remaining
Notes due 2023 who convert their notes in connection with a make-whole fundamental change (as defined in the applicable
indenture) are, under certain circumstances, entitled to an increase in the conversion rate. Additionally, in the event of a
fundamental change, holders of the remaining Notes due 2023 may require the Company to repurchase all or a portion of
their notes at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of notes, plus any accrued and unpaid interest, including any
additional interest to, but excluding, the repurchase date. Holders may convert all or any portion of their Notes due 2023 at
their option at any time prior to the close of business on the business day immediately preceding the maturity date, in
multiples of $1,000 principal amount.
The following table presents the amount of interest cost recognized relating to the contractual interest coupon and the
amortization of debt issuance costs of the Notes due 2023.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Contractual interest expense $ 200 $ 200 
Amortization of debt issuance costs 40 40 
Total interest costs recognized $ 240 $ 240 
Sale of Long-Term Financing Receivables
The Company entered into an agreement with a third party in the fourth quarter of 2017 to sell certain current and
future receivables at a discount. In December 2017, the third party made an initial purchase of receivables that resulted in
net proceeds to the Company of $2.8 million. This transaction was recorded as debt on the accompanying consolidated
balance sheets, and the debt balance was relieved in January 2019 as the underlying receivables were settled. During the
year ended December 31, 2018, the third party made three additional purchases of receivables that resulted in total net
proceeds to the Company of $5.6 million. These transactions were recorded as debt on the accompanying consolidated
balance sheets, and the total associated debt balance was relieved by December 2021 as the underlying receivables are
settled. As of December 31, 2021, the total sale of long-term financing receivable recorded as debt are no longer
outstanding.
14.    COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Operating Leases
The Company leases office facilities under noncancelable operating leases that expire on various dates through
2032, some of which may include options to extend the leases for up to 12 years.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 117
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The components of lease expense are presented as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Operating lease costs $ 7,049  $ 5,332  
The components of lease liabilities are presented as follows:
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In thousands)
Operating lease liabilities, current (Accrued liabilities) $ 3,830  $ 4,542  
Operating lease liabilities, non-current (Other liabilities) 11,920  15,209  
Total operating lease liabilities $ 15,750  $ 19,751  
Supplemental lease information:
Weighted average remaining lease term 5.9 years 6.4 years
Weighted average discount rate 7.4% 7.7%
Supplemental cash flow and other information related to operating leases, are as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 5,855  $ 4,762  
Non-cash investing activities:
Lease liabilities arising from obtaining right-of-use assets $ 708 $ 10,625  
Undiscounted cash flows of operating lease liabilities as of December 31, 2021 are as follows:
Lease Amounts
(In thousands)
Year:
2022 $ 4,771  
2023 4,160  
2024 3,198  
2025 2,422  
2026 1,395  
Thereafter 2,680  
Total lease payments 18,626  
Less: imputed lease interest (2,876 )
Total lease liabilities $ 15,750  
As of December 31, 2021, we have an additional operating lease commitment of $5.6 million for an office lease that
has not yet commenced. The operating lease commitment will commence in the first quarter of 2022 with a lease term of
10.0 years.
Purchase Obligations
The Company has contractual obligations related to component inventory that its contract manufacturers procure on
its behalf in accordance with its production forecast as well as other inventory related purchase commitments. As of
December 31, 2021, these purchase obligations totaled approximately $424.6 million.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 118
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Litigation
The Company is subject to various legal proceedings relating to claims arising out of its operations that have not been
fully resolved. The outcome of litigation is inherently uncertain. If one or more legal matters were resolved against the
Company in a reporting period for amounts above management’s expectations, the Company’s business, results of
operations, financial position and cash flows for that reporting period could be materially adversely affected. As of
December 31, 2021 and February 11, 2022, the Company is not currently a party to any matters that management expects
will have an adverse material effect on the Company’s consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
Contingencies
On March 26, 2020, the Office of the United States Trade Representative (the “USTR”) announced certain exclusion
requests related to tariffs on Chinese imported microinverter products that fit the dimensions and weight limits within a
Section 301 Tariff exclusion under U.S. note 20(ss)(40) to subchapter III of chapter 99 of the Harmonized Tariff Schedule of
the United States (the “Tariff Exclusion”). The Tariff Exclusion applies to covered products under the China Section 301 Tariff
Actions (“Section 301 Tariffs”) taken by the USTR exported from China to the United States from September 24, 2018 until
August 7, 2020. Accordingly, the Company sought refunds totaling approximately $38.9 million plus approximately
$0.6 million accrued interest on tariffs previously paid from September 24, 2018 to March 31, 2020 for certain microinverters
that qualify for the Tariff Exclusion. The refund request was subject to review and approval by the U.S. Customs and Border
Protection; therefore, the Company assessed the probable loss recovery in the year ended December 31, 2020 was equal
to the approved refund requests available to the Company.
As of December 31, 2020, the Company had received $24.8 million of tariff refunds and accrued for the remaining
$14.7 million tariff refunds that were approved, however, not yet received on or before December 31, 2020. As of March 31,
2021, the Company received the remaining $14.7 million tariff refunds. For the year ended December 31, 2020, the
Company recorded $38.9 million as a reduction to cost of revenues in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations
as the approved refunds relate to paid tariffs previously recorded to cost of revenues, therefore, the Company recorded the
corresponding approved tariff refunds as credits to cost of revenues in the fourth quarter of 2020. For the year ended
December 31, 2020, the Company recorded the $0.6 million accrued interest as interest income in the consolidated
statement of operations. The tariff refund receivable of zero and $14.7 million was recorded as a reduction of accounts
payable to Flex Ltd. and affiliates (“Flex”), the Company’s manufacturing partner and the importer of record who will first
receive the tariff refunds, on the Company’s consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020,
respectively.
The Tariff Exclusion expired on August 7, 2020 and those microinverter products now are subject to tariffs. The
Company also continues to pay Section 301 Tariffs on its storage and communication products and other accessories
imported from China which are not subject to the Tariff Exclusion.
15.    STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
On May 19, 2021, at the Company’s annual meeting of stockholders, the stockholders approved an amendment to
the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of the Company’s
common stock, par value $0.00001 per share, from 200,000,000 shares to 300,000,000 shares (the “Amendment”). The
Amendment became effective upon filing with the Secretary of State of Delaware on May 19, 2021.
In April 2020, the Company’s board of directors authorized the repurchase of up to $200.0 million of the Company’s
common stock, exclusive of brokerage commissions (the “2020 Repurchase Program”). During the second quarter of 2021,
the Company repurchased and subsequently retired approximately 1.7 million shares of common stock from the open
market at an average cost of $117.47 per share for a total of $200.0 million. The transaction is recorded as “Repurchase of
common stock” in the accompanying consolidated statements of changes in stockholders’ equity.
In May 2021, the board of directors authorized a new share repurchase program (the “2021 Repurchase Program”)
pursuant to which the Company may repurchase up to an additional $500.0 million of the Company’s common stock.
Purchases may be completed from time to time in the open market or through structured repurchase agreements with third
parties. The program may be discontinued or amended at any time and expires on May 13,
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 119
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
2024. During the fourth quarter of 2021, the Company repurchased and subsequently retired approximately 1.5 million
shares of common stock from the open market at an average cost of $196.98 per share for a total of $300.0 million. As of
December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $200.0 million remaining for repurchase of shares under the 2021
Repurchase Program.
16.    STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
2011 Plan
Under the 2011 Equity Incentive Plan (the “2011 Plan”), the Company could initially issue up to 2,643,171 shares of
its common stock pursuant to stock options, stock appreciation rights (“SARS”), restricted stock awards (“RSA”), RSUs,
PSUs, and other forms of equity compensation, or collectively, stock awards, all of which may be granted to employees,
including officers, and to non-employee directors and consultants. Options granted under the 2011 Plan before August 1,
2012 generally expire 10 years after the grant date and options granted thereafter generally expire 7 years after the grant
date. Equity awards granted under the 2011 Plan generally vest over a 4-year period from the date of grant based on
continued employment. As of May 19, 2021, no further stock options or other stock awards may be granted under the 2011
Plan.
2021 Plan
On May 19, 2021, at the 2021 annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, the stockholders approved the 2021
Equity Incentive Plan (the “2021 Plan”), as the successor to the 2011 Plan. The 2021 Plan provides for the grant of
incentive stock options, SARS, RSAs, RSUs, PSUs other stock awards. Eligible participants under the 2021 Plan include
Company’s employees, directors and consultants. The 2021 Plan provides, among other things, that the number of shares
of the Company’s common stock, $0.00001 par value per share (“Common Stock”), reserved for issuance under the 2021
Plan (subject to adjustment for certain changes in the Company’s capitalization) is equal to: (A) the sum of (i) 9,100,456
newly reserved shares of Common Stock and (ii) 5,256,517 Returning Shares (as defined below) as such shares become
available from time to time as set forth in the 2021 Plan. “Returning Shares” means shares subject to any outstanding
award granted under the 2011 Plan (“Prior Plan Award”) that are (i) not issued because such Prior Plan Award or any
portion thereof expires or otherwise terminates without all of the shares covered by such Prior Plan Award having been
issued, or is settled in cash; (ii) forfeited back to or repurchased by the Company because of a failure to vest; or (iii)
reacquired or withheld (or not issued) by the Company to satisfy the purchase price of, or a tax withholding obligation in
connection with, a Prior Plan Award that is a Full Value Award (as defined in the 2021 Plan). As a result of the approval of
the 2021 Plan, no additional awards may be granted from the 2011 Plan. As of December 31, 2021, 7,963,894 shares
remained available for issuance pursuant to future grants under the 2021 Plan.
2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan
The 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (“ESPP”) became effective immediately upon the execution and delivery of
the underwriting agreement for the Company’s initial public offering on March 29, 2012. The ESPP authorized the issuance
of 669,603 shares of the Company’s common stock pursuant to purchase rights granted to employees. The number of
shares of common stock reserved for issuance will automatically increase, on each January 1, by a lesser of
(i) 330,396 shares of the Company’s common stock or (ii) 1.0% of the total number of shares of the Company’s common
stock outstanding on December 31 of the preceding calendar year, as determined by the Company’s board of directors. At
the Annual Meeting of Stockholders held on May 18, 2017 the Company’s stockholders approved a one-time amendment to
the Company’s ESPP to increase the aggregate number of shares available for purchase by 400,000 shares and to
increase the annual automatic minimum increase in shares reserved for issuance from 330,396 to 700,000 shares effective
January 1, 2018. As of December 31, 2021, 1,754,231 shares remained available for future issuance under the ESPP. On
January 1, 2022, the shares available for issuance under the ESPP automatically increased by 700,000 shares.
The ESPP is implemented by concurrent offering periods and each offering period may contain up to four interim
purchase periods. In general, offering periods consist of the 24-month periods commencing on each May 15 and
November 15 of a calendar year.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 120
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Generally, all full-time employees in Australia, Canada, China, France, Germany, India, Mexico, New Zealand, the
Netherlands and the United States, including executive officers, are eligible to participate in the ESPP. The ESPP permits
eligible employees to purchase the Company’s common stock through payroll deductions, which may not exceed 15% of
the employee’s total compensation subject to certain limits. Stock may be purchased under the plan at a price equal to 85%
of the fair market value of the Company’s stock on either the date of purchase or the first day of an offering period,
whichever is lower. A two‑year look-back feature in the Company’s ESPP causes an offering period to reset if the fair value
of the Company’s common stock on a purchase date is less than that on the initial offering date for that offering period. The
reset feature, when triggered, will be accounted for as a modification to the original offering, resulting in additional expense
to be recognized over the 24-month period of the new offering. During any calendar year, participants may not purchase
shares of common stock having a value greater than $25,000, based on the fair market value per share of the common
stock at the beginning of an offering period.
Valuation of Equity Awards
Stock Options
The fair value of each option granted was estimated on the date of grant using the Black-Scholes option-pricing
model with the following assumptions:
•Expected term - The expected term of the option awards represents the period of time between the grant date of
the option awards and the date the option awards are either exercised, converted or canceled, including an
estimate for those option awards still outstanding. The Company used the simplified method, as permitted by the
SEC for companies with a limited history of stock option exercise activity, to determine the expected term for its
option grants.
•Expected volatility - The expected volatility was calculated based on the Company’s historical stock prices,
supplemented as necessary with historical volatility of the common stock of several peer companies with
characteristics similar to those of the Company.
•Risk-free interest rate - The risk-free interest rate was based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect at the time
of grant and with a maturity that approximated the Company’s expected term.
•Dividend yield - The dividend yield was based on the Company’s dividend history and the anticipated dividend
payout over its expected term.
The following table presents the weighted-average grant date fair value of options granted for the periods presented
and the assumptions used to estimate those values using a Black-Scholes option pricing model.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Weighted average grant date fair value ** $ 38.45 $ 9.16
Expected term (in years) ** 3.8 3.8
Expected volatility ** 86.4% 89.1%
Annual risk-free rate of return ** 0.1% 2.1%
Dividend yield ** —% —%
**    No stock options were granted during the year ended December 31, 2021.
Restricted Stock Units
The fair value of the Company’s RSU awards granted is based upon the closing price of the Company’s stock price
on the date of grant.
Performance Stock Units
The fair value of the Company’s non-market PSU awards granted was based upon the closing price of the Company’s
stock price on the date of grant. The fair value of awards of the Company’s PSU awards containing
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 121
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
market conditions was determined using a Monte Carlo simulation model based upon the terms of the conditions, the
expected volatility of the underlying security, and other relevant factors.
Stock-based Compensation Expense
Stock-based compensation expense for all stock-based awards expected to vest is measured at fair value on the date
of grant and recognized ratably over the requisite service period. The following table summarizes the components of total
stock-based compensation expense included in the consolidated statements of operations for the periods presented.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Cost of revenues $ 7,366  $ 3,759  $ 1,650  
Research and development 33,927  12,701  4,897  
Sales and marketing 37,434  11,548  5,678  
General and administrative 35,559  14,495  7,216  
Restructuring — — 735 
Total $ 114,286  $ 42,503  $ 20,176  
Income tax benefit included in the provision for incomes taxes $ 97,129  $ 61,389  $ 8,185  
The following table summarizes the various types of stock-based compensation expense for the periods presented.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Stock options, RSUs and PSUs $ 110,142  $ 39,841  $ 19,216  
Employee stock purchase plan 4,144  2,662  960 
Total $ 114,286  $ 42,503  $ 20,176  
As of December 31, 2021, there was approximately $254.6 million of total unrecognized stock-based compensation
expense related to unvested equity awards, which are expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.8
years.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 122
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Equity Awards Activity
Stock Options
The following is a summary of stock option activity.
Number of
Shares
OutstandingWeighted-
Average
Exercise Price
per ShareWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
TermAggregate
Intrinsic
Value 
(In thousands) (Years) (In thousands)
Outstanding at December 31, 2018 6,772  $ 1.76 
Granted 43 14.58  
Exercised (2,616 ) 1.22 $ 31,093  
Canceled (102) 4.07 
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 4,097  $ 2.18 
Granted 11 64.17  
Exercised (1,494 ) 2.74 $ 114,089  
Canceled (82) 6.94 
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 2,532  $ 1.96 
Granted — — 
Exercised (267) 2.44 $ 42,091  
Canceled (1) 0.83 
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 2,264  $ 1.90 2.8 $ 409,834  
Vested and expected to vest at December 31, 2021 2,264  $ 1.90 2.8 $ 409,834  
Exercisable at December 31, 2021 2,262  $ 1.90 2.8 $ 409,550  
(1)    The intrinsic value of options exercised is based upon the value of the Company’s stock at exercise. The intrinsic value
of options outstanding, vested and expected to vest, and exercisable as of December 31, 2021 is based on the
closing price of the last trading day during the period ended December 31, 2021. The Company’s stock fair value
used in this computation was $182.94 per share.
The following table summarizes information about stock options outstanding at December 31, 2021.
Options Outstanding Options Exercisable
Range of Exercise PricesNumber of
SharesWeighted-
Average
Remaining
LifeWeighted-
Average
Exercise
PriceNumber of
SharesWeighted-
Average
Exercise
Price
(In thousands) (Years) (In thousands)
$0.70 —– $ 1.11 486 3.3 $ 0.86 486 $ 0.85 
$1.29 —– $ 1.29 1,000  2.7 1.29 1,000  1.28 
$1.31 —– $ 1.31 556 2.3 1.31 556 1.31 
$1.53 —– $ 14.58 211 3.1 5.65 209 5.65 
$64.17  —– $ 64.17 11 5.4 64.17  11 64.17  
Total 2,264  2.8 $ 1.90 2,262  $ 1.90 (1)
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 123
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Restricted Stock Units
The following is a summary of RSU activity.
Number of
Shares
OutstandingWeighted-
Average
Fair Value
per Share at
Grant DateWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
TermAggregate
Intrinsic
Value 
(In thousands) (Years) (In thousands)
Outstanding at December 31, 2018 4,352  $ 3.52 
Granted 2,112  11.50  
Vested (1,707 ) 3.87 $ 27,156  
Canceled (494) 4.81 
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 4,263  $ 7.19 
Granted 1,550  55.66  
Vested (2,085 ) 7.26 $ 125,578  
Canceled (140) 19.47  
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 3,588  $ 27.61  
Granted 1,301  179.88  
Vested (1,979 ) 20.47  $ 364,665  
Canceled (124) 88.50  
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 2,786  $ 100.73  1.2 $ 509,864  
Expected to vest at December 31, 2021 2,786  $ 100.73  1.2 $ 509,864  
(1)    The intrinsic value of RSUs vested is based upon the value of the Company’s stock when vested. The intrinsic value of
RSUs outstanding and expected to vest as of December 31, 2021 is based on the closing price of the last trading day
during the period ended December 31, 2021. The Company’s stock fair value used in this computation was
$182.94 per share.(1)
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 124
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Performance Stock Units
The following is a summary of PSU activity.
Number of
Shares
OutstandingWeighted-
Average
Fair Value
per Share at
Grant DateWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
TermAggregate
Intrinsic
Value 
(In thousands) (Years) (In thousands)
Outstanding at December 31, 2018 1,330  $ 4.66 
Granted 1,052  9.48 
Vested (1,063 ) 4.62 $ 10,818  
Canceled (364) 5.16 
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 955 $ 9.83 
Granted 989 31.12  
Vested (1,450 ) 10.20  $ 52,144  
Canceled — — 
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 494 $ 51.10  
Granted 715 131.60  
Vested (494) 59.19  $ 91,803  
Canceled (270) 52.75  
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 445 $ 169.82  0.2 $ 81,456  
(1)    The intrinsic value of PSUs vested is based upon the value of the Company’s stock when vested. The intrinsic value of
PSUs outstanding and expected to vest as of December 31, 2021 is based on the closing price of the last trading day
during the period ended December 31, 2021. The Company’s stock fair value used in this computation was
$182.94 per share.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
A summary of ESPP activity for the years presented is as follows: (in thousands, except per share data):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Proceeds from common stock issued under ESPP $ 6,832  $ 4,304  $ 1,692  
Shares of common stock issued 235 347 315 
Weighted-average price per share $ 29.12  $ 12.41  $ 5.37 
17.    INCOME TAXES
The domestic and foreign components of income before income taxes consisted of the following:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
United States $ 102,886  $ 112,727  $ 85,520  
Foreign 18,042  6,683  4,594  
Income before income taxes $ 120,928  $ 119,410  $ 90,114  (1)
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 125
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The income taxes (benefit) for the years presented is as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Current:
Federal $ — $ — $ — 
State 488 636 327 
Foreign 6,232  1,896  1,589  
6,720  2,532  1,916  
Deferred:
Federal (28,398 ) (13,445 ) (56,959 )
State (4,380 ) (3,672 ) (17,458 )
Foreign 1,537  — 1,467  
(31,241 ) (17,117 ) (72,950 )
Income taxes (benefit) $ (24,521 )$ (14,585 )$ (71,034 )
A reconciliation of the income taxes (benefit) provision and the amount computed by applying the statutory federal
income tax rate of 21% to income before income taxes for the years presented is as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Income tax (benefit) provision at statutory federal rate $ 27,681  $ 25,076  $ 18,929  
State taxes, net of federal benefit 489 (3,098 ) (17,197 )
Change in valuation allowance — — (71,300 )
Foreign tax rate and tax law dif ferential 1,073  611 1,206  
Tax credits (15,632 ) (5,835 ) (1,803 )
Stock-based compensation (80,950 ) (50,818 ) (8,072 )
Other permanent items 178 (253) 31 
Other nondeductible/nontaxable items 2,316  1,525  2,765  
Uncertain tax positions 6,911  1,530  504 
GILTI — — 1,086  
Section 162(m) 25,812  11,469  2,817  
Convertible note settlements 8,223  — — 
Warrant mark-to-mark adjustment (622) 5,208  — 
Income tax (benefit) $ (24,521 )$ (14,585 )$ (71,034 )
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 126
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
A summary of significant components of the Company’s deferred tax assets and liabilities as of December 31, 2021
and 2020 is as follows:
December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
Deferred tax assets:
Allowances and reserves $ 18,764  $ 13,146  
Net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards 65,699  53,116  
Stock-based compensation 12,935  4,598  
Deferred revenue 27,778  20,765  
Fixed assets and intangibles 39,711  8,706  
Sec. 163(j) interest carryforward 10,749  4,401  
Other 1,609  7,007  
Subtotal 177,245  111,739  
Total deferred tax assets 177,245  111,739  
Deferred tax liabilities:
Goodwill (31,805 ) (1,719 )
Unremitted foreign earnings (2,226 ) (7)
Deferred cost of goods sold (23,713 ) (17,545 )
Total deferred tax liabilities (57,744 ) (19,271 )
Net deferred tax asset $ 119,501  $ 92,468  
The Company's accounting for deferred taxes involves the evaluation of a number of factors concerning the
realizability of the Company's deferred tax assets. Assessing the realizability of deferred tax assets is dependent upon
several factors, including the likelihood and amount, if any, of future taxable income in relevant jurisdictions during the
periods in which those temporary differences become deductible. The Company's management forecasts taxable income
by considering all available positive and negative evidence including its history of operating income or losses and its
financial plans and estimates which are used to manage the business. These assumptions require significant judgment
about future taxable income. The amount of deferred tax assets considered realizable is subject to adjustment in future
periods if estimates of future taxable income are reduced.
The Company has net operating loss carryforwards for federal and California income tax purposes of approximately
$153.9 million and $92.8 million, respectively, as of December 31, 2021. The federal and state net operating loss
carryforwards, if not utilized, will expire beginning in 2036 and 2029, respectively.
The Company has approximately $17.3 million of federal research credit and $9.8 million of state research credit
carryforwards. The federal credits begin to expire in 2026 and the state credits can be carried forward indefinitely.
Utilization of some of the federal and state net operating loss and credit carryforwards are subject to annual
limitations due to the “change in ownership” provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and similar state provisions.
The Company has completed a Section 382 analysis through December 31, 2021, which indicated no such change has
occurred through December 31, 2021.
The accounting for uncertain tax positions prescribes a recognition threshold and measurement attribute for the
financial statement recognition and measurement of a tax position taken or expected to be taken in a tax return. The
Company is required to recognize in the financial statements the impact of a tax position, if that position is more-likely-than-
not of being sustained on audit, based on the technical merits of the position. The Company recorded a net charge for
unrecognized tax benefits in 2021 of $12.5 million.
The Company does not have any tax positions for which it is reasonably possible the total amount of gross
unrecognized tax benefits will increase or decrease over the next year. The unrecognized tax benefits may increase or
change during the next year for items that arise in the ordinary course of business.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 127
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
A tabular reconciliation of the total amounts of unrecognized tax benefits for the years presented is as follows (in
thousands):
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Unrecognized tax benefits—at beginning of year $ 8,421  $ 6,589  $ 6,325  
Increases in balances related to tax positions taken in prior years 4,391  — — 
Decreases in balances related to tax positions taken in prior years — — (370)
Increases in balances related to tax positions taken in current year 8,301  2,006  771 
Lapses in statutes of limitations (209) (174) (137)
Unrecognized tax benefits—at end of year $ 20,904  $ 8,421  $ 6,589  
The Company includes interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits within the income tax benefit
(provision). In the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, the total amount of gross interest and penalties
accrued in each year was immaterial. Both the unrecognized tax benefits and the associated interest and penalties that are
not expected to result in payment or receipt of cash within one year are classified as other non-current liabilities in the
consolidated balance sheets. In connection with tax matters, the Company’s interest and penalty expense recognized
in 2021, 2020 and 2019 in the consolidated statements of operations was immaterial.
The Company’s tax returns continue to remain effectively subject to examination by U.S. federal authorities for the
years 2006 through 2021 and by California state authorities for the years 2006 through 2021 due to use and carryovers of
net operating losses and credits.
18.    CONCENTRATION OF CREDIT RISK AND MAJOR CUSTOMERS
The Company is potentially subject to financial instrument concentration of credit risk through its cash, cash
equivalents, marketable securities, and accounts receivable. The Company places its cash, cash equivalents and
marketable securities with high quality institutions and performs periodic evaluations of their relative credit standing.
Accounts receivable can be potentially exposed to a concentration of credit risk with its major customers. As of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, amounts due from one customer represented approximately 38% and 36%, respectively, of
the total accounts receivable balance.
In 2021, one customer accounted for approximately 34% of total net revenues. In 2020, one customer accounted for
approximately 29% of total net revenues. In 2019, two customers accounted for approximately 21% and 12% of total net
revenues.
19.    NET INCOME PER SHARE
Basic net income per share is computed by dividing net income by the weighted average number of shares of
common stock outstanding during the period. Diluted net income per share is computed in a similar manner, but it also
includes the effect of potential common shares outstanding during the period, when dilutive. Potential common shares
include Stock Options, RSUs, PSUs, shares to be purchased under the Company’s ESPP, the Notes due 2023, Notes due
2024, Notes due 2025, Notes due 2026, Notes due 2028, 2024 Warrants, 2025 Warrants, 2026 Warrants, and the 2028
Warrants. See Note 13. “Debt,” of the notes to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
The dilutive effect of potentially dilutive common shares is reflected in diluted earnings per share by application of the
treasury stock method for stock options, RSUs, PSUs, the Notes due 2024, the Notes due 2025, the Notes due 2026, the
Notes due 2028, the 2024 Warrants, the 2025 Warrants, the 2026 Warrants and the 2028 Warrants. To the extent these
potential common shares are antidilutive, they are excluded from the calculation of diluted net income per share.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 128
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents the computation of basic and diluted net income per share for the periods presented.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands, except per share data)
Numerator:
Net income $ 145,449  $ 133,995  $ 161,148  
Notes due 2023 interest and financing costs, net 177 177 1,088  
Adjusted net income $ 145,626  $ 134,172  $ 162,236  
Denominator:
Shares used in basic per share amounts:
Weighted average common shares outstanding 134,025  125,561  116,713  
Shares used in diluted per share amounts:
Weighted average common shares outstanding 134,025  125,561  116,713  
Effect of dilutive securities:
Employee stock-based awards 4,918  6,997  8,964  
Notes due 2023 900 900 5,516  
Notes due 2024 768 4,449  451 
2024 W arrants 647 4,011  — 
Notes due 2025 929 — — 
2025 W arrants 691 — — 
Weighted average common shares outstanding for diluted calculation 142,878  141,918  131,644  
Basic and diluted net income per share
Net income per share, basic $ 1.09 $ 1.07 $ 1.38 
Net income per share, diluted $ 1.02 $ 0.95 $ 1.23 
The following outstanding shares of common stock equivalents were excluded from the calculation of the diluted net
income per share attributable to common stockholders because their effect would have been antidilutive.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(In thousands)
Employee stock-based awards 32 43 185 
Notes due 2028 1,082  — — 
2028 W arrants 2,184  — — 
Notes due 2026 1,328  — — 
2026 W arrants 2,225  — — 
Notes due 2025 — 197 
2025 Warrants — 1,254  — 
2024 W arrants — — 300 
Total 6,851  1,494  485 
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 129
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Diluted earnings per share for the year ended December 31, 2021 includes the dilutive effect of stock options, RSUs,
PSUs, shares to be purchased under the ESPP, the Notes due 2023, the Notes due 2024, the 2024 Warrants, the Notes
due 2025 and the 2025 Warrants. Certain common stock issuable under stock options, RSUs, PSUs, the Notes due 2026,
the 2026 Warrants, the Notes due 2028 and the 2028 Warrants have been omitted from the diluted net income per share
calculation because including such shares would have been antidilutive.
Diluted earnings per share for the year ended December 31, 2020 includes the dilutive effect of stock options, RSUs,
PSUs, shares to be purchased under the ESPP, the Notes due 2023, the Notes due 2024 and the 2024 Warrants. Certain
common stock issuable under stock options, RSUs, PSUs, Notes due 2025 and the 2025 Warrants have been omitted from
the diluted net income per share calculation because including such shares would have been antidilutive.
Diluted earnings per share for the year ended December 31, 2019 includes the dilutive effect of stock options, RSUs,
PSUs, shares to be purchased under the ESPP, the Notes due 2023 and Notes due 2024. Certain common stock issuable
under stock options, RSUs, PSUs and warrants issued in conjunction with the Notes due 2024 have been omitted from the
diluted net income per share calculation because including such shares would have been antidilutive.
Since the Company has the intent and ability to settle the aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2025, Notes
due 2026 and Notes due 2028 in cash and any excess in shares of the Company’s common stock, the Company uses the
treasury stock method for calculating any potential dilutive effect of the conversion spread on diluted net income per share,
if applicable. In order to compute the dilutive effect, the number of shares included in the denominator of diluted net income
per share is determined by dividing the conversion spread value of the “in-the-money” Notes due 2025, Notes due 2026 and
Notes due 2028 by the Company’s average share price during the period and including the resulting share amount in the
diluted net income per share denominator. The conversion spread will have a dilutive impact on net income per share of
common stock when the average market price of the Company’s common stock for a given period exceeds the conversion
price of $81.54, $307.47 and $284.87 per share for the Notes due 2025, Notes due 2026 and Notes due 2028, respectively.
20.    SEGMENT AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION
The Company’s chief operating decision maker is the Chief Executive Officer. The Chief Executive Officer reviews
financial information presented on a consolidated basis. The Company has one business activity, which entails the design,
development, manufacture and sale of solutions for the solar PV industry. There are no segment managers who are held
accountable for operations, operating results or plans for levels or components below the consolidated unit level.
Accordingly, management has determined that the Company has a single operating and reportable segment.
See Note 3. “Revenue Recognition,” for the table presenting net revenues (based on the destination of shipments).
The following table presents long-lived assets by geographic region as of and for the periods presented:
Long-Lived Assets
December 31,
2021 2020
(In thousands)
United States $ 37,685 $ 19,870 
India 17,490  4,371 
China 12,906  9,948 
Mexico 8,735  4,808 
New Zealand 4,622  3,837 
Other 729 151 
Total $ 82,167  $ 42,985  
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 130
Table of Contents
ENPHASE ENERGY, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
21.    RELATED PARTY
In 2018, a member of the Company’s board of directors and one of its principal stockholders, Thurman John Rodgers,
purchased $5.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2023 in a concurrent private placement. As of both
December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, $5.0 million aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2023 were
outstanding. For additional information related to this purchase, see Note 13. “Debt,” for additional information related to this
purchase.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 131
Table of Contents
Item 9.    Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A.    Controls and Procedures
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We carried out an evaluation required by the Exchange Act, under the supervision and with the participation of our
principal executive officer and principal financial officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure
controls and procedures, as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act, as of the end of the period covered by this
report. Based on this evaluation, our principal executive officer and principal financial officer concluded that our disclosure
controls and procedures were effective to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be disclosed by us in
the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time
periods specified in the Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms and to provide reasonable assurance that
such information is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our principal executive officer and
principal financial officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures.
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting in
providing reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the
Exchange Act. Management has assessed the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of December
2020 based on criteria set forth in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013). As a result of this assessment, management concluded that, as of
December 2021, our internal control over financial reporting was effective. The Company’s independent registered public
accounting firm, Deloitte & Touche LLP, has issued an audit report on our internal control over financial reporting, which
appears in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the most recent quarter
ended December 31, 2021 that materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over
financial reporting. We have not experienced any material impact to our internal controls over financial reporting despite the
fact that most of our employees are continuing to work remotely due to the COVID-19 pandemic. We continue to monitor
and assess the impact of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic on our internal controls to minimize the impact on their design
and operating effectiveness.
Limitations on Controls
Our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting are designed to provide
reasonable assurance of achieving their objectives as specified above. Management does not expect, however, that our
disclosure controls and procedures or our internal control over financial reporting will prevent or detect all errors and fraud.
Any control system, no matter how well designed and operated, is based upon certain assumptions and can provide only
reasonable, not absolute, assurance that its objectives will be met. Further, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute
assurance that misstatements due to error or fraud will not occur or that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any,
within the Company have been detected.
Item 9B.    Other Information
None.
Item 9C.    Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
None.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 132
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required regarding our directors is incorporated by reference from the information contained in the
section entitled “Election of Directors” in our definitive Proxy Statement for the 2022 Annual Meeting of Stockholders (our
“Proxy Statement”), a copy of which will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on or before April 30, 2022.
The information required regarding our executive officers is incorporated by reference from the information contained
in the section entitled “Management” in our Proxy Statement.
The information required regarding Section 16(a) beneficial ownership reporting compliance is incorporated by
reference from the information contained in the section entitled “Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports” in our Proxy Statement.
The information required with respect to procedures by which security holders may recommend nominees to our
board of directors, and the composition of our Audit Committee, and whether we have an “audit committee financial expert,”
is incorporated by reference from the information contained in the section entitled “Information Regarding the Board of
Directors and Corporate Governance” in our Proxy Statement.
Code of Conduct
We have a written code of conduct that applies to all our executive officers, directors and employees. Our Code of
Conduct is available on our website at http://investor.enphase.com/corporate-governance. A copy of our Code of Conduct
may also be obtained free of charge by writing to our Secretary, Enphase Energy, Inc., 47281 Bayside Parkway, Fremont,
CA 94538. If we make any substantive amendments to our Code of Conduct or grant any waiver from a provision of the
Code of Conduct to any executive officer or director, we intend to promptly disclose the nature of the amendment or waiver
on our website.
Item 11.    Executive Compensation
The information required regarding the compensation of our directors and executive officers is incorporated by
reference from the information contained in the sections entitled “Executive Compensation,” “Director Compensation” and
“Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation” in our Proxy Statement.
Item 12.    Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
The information required regarding security ownership of our 5% or greater stockholders and of our directors and
executive officers is incorporated by reference from the information contained in the section entitled “Security Ownership of
Certain Beneficial Owners and Management” in our Proxy Statement.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The information required regarding securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans is
incorporated by reference from the information contained in the section entitled “Equity Compensation Plan Information” in
our Proxy Statement.
Item 13.    Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
The information required regarding related transactions is incorporated herein by reference from the information
contained in the section entitled “Transactions With Related Persons” and, with respect to director independence, the
section entitled “Election of Directors” in our Proxy Statement.
Item 14.    Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information required is incorporated by reference from the information contained in the sections entitled “Principal
Accountant Fees and Services” and “Pre-Approval Policies and Procedures” in the Proposal entitled “Ratification of
Selection of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” in our Proxy Statement.
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 133
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15.    Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Consolidated Financial Statements
The information concerning our consolidated financial statements, and Report of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm required by this Item is incorporated by reference herein to the section of this Annual Report on Form 10-K
in Part II, Item 8, Consolidated Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
No schedules are provided because they are not applicable, not required under the instructions, or the requested
information is shown in the financial statements or related notes thereto.
Exhibits
Incorporation by Reference
Exhibit
NumberExhibit Description Form SEC File No. Exhibit Filing DateFiled
Herewith
2.1Asset Purchase Agreement Among SunPower
Corporation and Enphase Energy, Inc. dated June
12, 2018.8-K 001-35480 2.1 6/12/2018
3.1Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of
Enphase Energy, Inc.8-K 001-35480 3.1 4/6/2012
3.2Certificate of Amendment of the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Enphase
Energy, Inc.10-Q 001-35480 3.1 8/9/2017
3.3Certificate of Amendment of the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Enphase
Energy, Inc.10-Q 001-35480 2.1 8/6/2018
3.4    
Certificate of Amendment of the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Enphase
Energy, Inc.8-K001-35480 3.1 5/27/2020
3.5    
Certificate of Amendment of the Amended and
Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Enphase
Energy, Inc.S-8 333-181382 4.5 5/19/2021
3.6Amended and Restated Bylaws of Enphase Energy,
Inc.S-1/A 333-174925 3.5 3/12/2012
4.1Specimen Common Stock Certificate of Enphase
Energy, Inc.S-1/A 333-174925 4.1 3/12/2012
4.2Indenture, dated August 17, 2018, between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association.8-K 001-35480 4.1 8/17/2018
4.3Form of 4.00% Convertible Senior Note due 2023
(included in Exhibit 4.2).8-K 001-35480 4.1 8/17/2018
4.4Indenture, dated June 5, 2019, between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association.8-K 001-35480 4.1 6/5/2019
4.5    
Indenture, dated March 9, 2020, between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association.8-K 001-35480 4.1 3/9/2020
4.6    
Form of 0.25% Convertible Senior Note due 2025
(included in Exhibit 4.1).8-K 001-35480 4.2 3/9/2020
4.7Indenture, dated March 1, 2021, between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association.8-K 001-35480 4.1 3/1/2021
4.8Indenture, dated March 1, 2021, between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association.8-K 001-35480 4.2 3/1/2021
4.9Form of 0% Convertible Senior Note due 2026
(included in Exhibit 4.8).8-K 001-35480 4.1 3/1/2021
4.10Form of 0% Convertible Senior Note due 2028
(included in Exhibit 4.9).8-K 001-35480 4.2 3/1/2021
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 134
Table of Contents
4.11Description of Registrant’s Securities Registered
Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended.X
10.1Form of Indemnification Agreement by and between
Enphase Energy, Inc. and each of its directors and
officers.S-1/A 333-174925 10.1 8/24/2011
10.22021 Equity Incentive Plan and forms of agreement
thereunder.S-8 333-181382 99.1 5/19/2021
10.32011 Equity Incentive Plan, as amended, and forms
of agreement thereunder.DEF 14A 001-35480 Appendix A 3/18/2016
10.4 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan, as amended. DEF 14A 001-35480 Appendix A 3/31/2017
10.5Flextronics Logistics Services Agreement by and
between Enphase Energy, Inc. and Flextronics
America, LLC, dated May 1, 2009.S-1 333-174925 10.17 6/15/2011
10.6Amendment #1 to the Flextronics Logistics Services
Agreement, by and between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and Flextronics America, LLC, dated July 28, 2016.10-Q 001-35480 10.4 11/2/2016
10.7Flextronics Manufacturing Services Agreement by
and between Enphase Energy, Inc. and Flextronics
Industrial, Ltd., dated March 1, 2009, as amended.S-1 333-174925 10.18 6/15/2011
10.8Master Development and Production Agreement by
and between Enphase Energy, Inc. and Fujitsu
Microelectronics America, Inc., dated August 19,
2009.10-Q 001-35480 10.1 5/6/2015
10.9License and Technology Transfer Agreement by and
between Enphase Energy, Inc. and Ariane Controls,
Inc., dated December 21, 2007.S-1 333-174925 10.2 6/15/2011
10.10Software License Agreement by and between PVI
Solutions, Inc. (subsequently known as Enphase
Energy, Inc.) and DCD, Digital Core Design, dated
May 8, 2007, as amended.S-1 333-174925 10.21 6/15/2011
10.11 Non-employee Director Compensation Policy. 10-K 001-35480 10.11 2/16/2021
10.12Offer Letter by and between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and David Ranhoff, dated December 1, 2017.8-K 001-35480 10.1 12/5/2017
10.13 Severance and Change in Control Benefit Plan. 10-Q 001-35480 10.5 5/8/2013
10.14Securities Purchase Agreement, by and among
Enphase Energy, Inc. and the purchasers identified
on Exhibit A thereto, dated January 9, 2017.8-K 001-35480 10.1 1/10/2017
10.15Offer Letter by and between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and Eric Branderiz, dated December 1, 2018.10-Q 001-35480 10.1 8/6/2018
10.16Securities Purchase Agreement, dated August 14,
2018, by and between Enphase Energy, Inc. and the
Rodgers Massey Revocable Trust dtd 4/4/11.8-K 001-35480 10.2 8/17/2018
10.17 Performance Bonus Program Summary. 8-K 001-35480 10.1 2/6/2019
10.18Stockholders Agreement, dated as of August 9, 2018,
by and between Enphase Energy, Inc. and SunPower
Corporation.SC 13D 005-86790 SC 13D 8/20/2018
10.19Master Supply Agreement, dated August 9, 2018,
between Enphase Energy, Inc. and SunPower
Corporation.8-K/A 001-35480 99.1 10/23/2018
10.20Amendment No. 1 to Master Supply Agreement,
dated December 10, 2018, by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and SunPower Corporation.10-K 001-34166 10.74 2/14/2019
10.21Amendment No. 2 to Master Supply Agreement,
dated June 12, 2018, by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and SunPower Corporation.10-K 001-35480 10.21 2/16/2021+
+
+
+
+
+
+
+
+
†
†
#
10.22Amendment No. 3 to Master Supply Agreement,
dated June 12, 2018, by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and SunPower Corporation.10-K 001-35480 10.22 2/16/2021#
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 135
Table of Contents
10.23Consent and Waiver to Stockholders Agreement
dated October 15, 2020, by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc., SunPower Corporation, SunPower
Equity Holdings, LLC and Total SE.10-K 001-35480 10.23 2/16/2021
10.24Salcomp Manufacturing Services Agreement by and
between Enphase Energy, Inc. and Salcomp
Manufacturing India Private Ltd., dated October 1,
2019.10-K 001-35480 10.24 2/16/2021
10.25Bayside Parkway Lease by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and Dollinger Bayside Associates, dated
April 12, 2018.10-K 001-35480 10.45 3/15/2019
10.26Bayside Parkway Lease by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and Dollinger Bayside Associates,
amendment dated March 17, 2020.10-K 001-35480 10.26 2/16/2021
10.27Bayside Parkway Lease by and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and Dollinger Bayside Associates,
amendment dated May 9, 2020.10-K 001-35480 10.27 2/16/2021
10.28Form of Convertible Note Hedge Transaction
Confirmation (2020).8-K 001-35480 10.2 3/9/2020
10.29 Form of Warrant Confirmation (2020). 8-K 001-35480 10.3 3/9/2020
10.30Form of Convertible Note Hedge Transaction
Confirmation (2021).8-K 001-35480 10.2 3/1/2021
10.31 Form of Warrant Confirmation (2021). 8-K 001-35480 10.3 3/1/2021
10.32Additional Call Option Transaction Confirmations
(2021).8-K 001-35480 10.1 3/15/2021
10.33 Additional Warrant Confirmations (2021). 8-K 001-35480 10.2 3/15/2021
10.34Purchase Agreement, dated March 4, 2020 by and
among the Registrant and Barclays Capital Inc.8-K 001-35480 10.3 3/9/2020
10.35 Form of Exchange Agreement for the 2025 Notes. 8-K 001-35480 10.5 3/1/2021
10.36Partial Unwind Agreements for Base Call Option
Confirmations dated May 30, 2019 and Additional Call
Option Confirmations dated June 4, 2019, made as of
February 24, 2021, between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and Barclays Capital Inc. and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and Credit Suisse Capital LLC.8-K 001-35480 10.6 3/1/2021
10.37Partial Unwind Agreements for Base Warrants
Confirmations dated May 30, 2019 and Additional
Warrants Confirmations dated June 4, 2019, made as
of February 24, 2021, between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and Barclays Capital Inc. and between Enphase
Energy, Inc. and Credit Suisse Capital LLC.8-K 001-35480 10.7 3/1/2021
10.38Partial Unwind Agreements for Base Call Option
Confirmations dated March 4, 2020, made as of
February 24, 2021, between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and Barclays Capital Inc., between Enphase Energy,
Inc. and Credit Suisse Capital LLC, and between
Enphase Energy, Inc. and Goldman Sachs & Co. LLC.8-K 001-35480 10.8 3/1/2021
10.39Partial Unwind Agreements for Base Warrants
Confirmations dated March 4, 2020, made as of
February 24, 2021, between Enphase Energy, Inc.
and Barclays Capital Inc., between Enphase Energy,
Inc. and Credit Suisse Capital LLC, and between
Enphase Energy, Inc. and Goldman Sachs & Co. LLC.8-K 001-35480 10.9 3/1/2021
10.40Partial Unwind Agreement for Base Call Option
Confirmations dated May 30, 2018 and Additional
Warrants Confirmation dated June 4, 2019, made as
of March 4, 2021, between Enphase Energy, Inc. and
Barclays Bank PLC8-K 001-35480 10.1 3/8/2021#
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 136
Table of Contents
10.41Offer Letter, dated January 16, 2018, and 2019 Merit
Focal Review, dated May 10, 2019, to Jeffery McNeil.10-Q 001-35480 10.4 7/30/2019
21.1 List of Subsidiaries of the Registrant X
23.1Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent
Registered Public Accounting FirmX
24.1Power of Attorney (incorporated by reference to the
signature page of this Annual Report on Form 10-K).X
31.1Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to
Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a).X
31.2Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to
Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a).X
32.1*Certification of Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350
as Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
101.INS XBRL Instance Document. X
101.SCH XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document. X
101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
Document.X
101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
Document.X
101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
Document.X
101.PRE XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Document. X
104Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline
XBRL and contained in Exhibits 101)X
+    Management compensatory plan or arrangement.
†    Confidential treatment has been granted for certain portions of this exhibit. Omitted information has been filed
separately with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
#    Certain portions of this exhibit have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K.
*    The certifications attached as Exhibit 32.1 accompany this annual report on Form 10-K pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and shall not be deemed “filed”
by Enphase Energy, Inc. for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.+
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 137
Table of Contents
Item 16.    Form 10-K Summary
Not Applicable
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 138
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized on February 11, 2022.
Enphase Energy , Inc.
By: /s/ BADRINARA YANAN KOTHANDARAMAN
Badrinarayanan Kothandaraman
President and Chief Executive Of ficer
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 139
Table of Contents
POWER OF ATTORNEY
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that each person whose signature appears below constitutes and
appoints Badrinarayanan Kothandaraman and Eric Branderiz, jointly and severally, as his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact
and agents, with full power of substitution and resubstitution, for him and in his name, place and stead, in any and all
capacities, to sign any and all amendments to this Annual Report on Form 10-K and to file the same, with all exhibits
thereto, and other documents in connection therewith, with the Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said
attorneys-in-fact and agents full power and authority to do and perform each and every act and thing requisite or necessary
to be done in and about the premises hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or his
substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause to be done by virtue hereof.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities on the dates indicated.
Signature Title Date
/s/ BADRINARA YANAN KOTHANDARAMANPresident and Chief Executive Of ficer
(Principal Executive Of ficer)February 11, 2022
Badrinarayanan Kothandaraman
/s/ ERIC BRANDERIZ Executive V ice President and Chief Financial
Officer
(Principal Financial Of ficer)February 11, 2022
Eric Branderiz
/s/ MANDY  YANG Vice President, Chief Accounting Of ficer and
Treasurer
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)February 11, 2022
Mandy Yang
/s/ STEVEN J. GOMO Director February 11, 2022
Steven J. Gomo
/s/ JAMIE HAENGGI Director February 11, 2022
Jamie Haenggi
/s/ BENJAMIN KOR TLANG Director February 11, 2022
Benjamin Kortlang
/s/ JOESEPH MALCHOW Director February 11, 2022
Joseph Malchow
/s/ RICHARD MORA Director February 11, 2022
Richard Mora
/s/ THURMAN JOHN RODGERS Director February 11, 2022
Thurman John Rodgers
Enphase Energy , Inc. | 2021 Form 10-K | 140
